UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGT ON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period from                      to                     
Commission file number 001-00812
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 06-0570975
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
 870 Winter Street, Waltham, Massachusetts 02451
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(781)522-3000
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock ($1 par value) RTX New York Stock Exchange
(CUSIP 75513E 101)
2.150% Notes due 2030 RTX 30 New York Stock Exchange
(CUSIP 75513E AB7)
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes  
☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes  
¨    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes  ☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes   ☒    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ☐
Non-Accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐
Emerging Growth Company ☐
1
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes   ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting Common Stock held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2020 was approximately
$93,495,749,819, based on the New York Stock Exchange closing price for such shares on that date. For purposes of this
calculation, the Registrant has assumed that its directors and executive officers are affiliates.
At January 29, 2021, there were 1,519,478,134 shares of Common Stock outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement for its 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareowners are incorporated by
reference in Part II and III of this Form 10-K.
2
Table of Contents
INDEX
PART I
Item 1. Business 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 13
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 27
Item 2. Properties 28
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 28
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 29
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities30
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 32
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 33
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 63
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 65
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 133
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 133
Item 9B. Other Information 133
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 134
Item 11. Executive Compensation 135
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 135
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 135
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 136
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 137
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 143
SIGNATURES
Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries’ names, abbreviations thereof, logos, and product and service designators
are all either the registered or unregistered trademarks or tradenames of Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries.
Names, abbreviations of names, logos, and products and service designators of other companies are either the registered or
unregistered trademarks or tradenames of their respective owners. References to internet web sites in this Form 10-K are provided
for convenience only. Information available through these web sites is not incorporated by reference into this Form 10-K.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
General
Raytheon Technologies Corporation is an aerospace and defense company that provides advanced systems and services for
commercial, military and government customers worldwide. The terms “we,” “us,” “our,” “Raytheon Technologies,” “RTC” and
the “Company” mean Raytheon Technologies Corporation, unless the context indicates another meaning. We serve commercial and
government customers in both the original equipment and aftermarket parts and services segments of the aerospace industry. Our
defense business serves both domestic and international customers as a prime contractor or subcontractor on a broad portfolio of
defense and related programs for military and government customers. Formerly known as United Technologies Corporation (UTC),
Raytheon Technologies was incorporated in Delaware in 1934 and represents the combination of UTC’s aerospace businesses and
Raytheon Company through the Separation Transactions and Distributions and Raytheon Merger in April 2020, as described in
more detail below.
The following description of our business should be read in conjunction with “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, including the information contained therein under the
heading “Business Overview.”
Separation Transactions and Distributions. On April 3, 2020, UTC completed the separation of its business into three
independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (such
separations, the “Separation Transactions”). UTC distributed all of the outstanding shares of Carrier common stock and all of the
outstanding shares of Otis common stock to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business
on March 19, 2020, the record date for the distributions (the “Distributions”) effective at 12:01 a.m., Eastern Time, on April 3,
2020. The historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both
continuing operations and segment results for all periods presented.
Raytheon Merger. On April 3, 2020, following the completion of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, pursuant to an
Agreement and Plan of Merger dated June 9, 2019, as amended, UTC and Raytheon Company completed their all-stock merger of
equals transaction (the “Raytheon Merger”). Upon closing of the Raytheon Merger, Raytheon Company became a wholly owned
subsidiary of UTC, which changed its name to “Raytheon Technologies Corporation.”
Business Segments
Our operations are classified into four principal business segments: Collins Aerospace Systems, Pratt & Whitney, Raytheon
Intelligence & Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense, with each segment comprised of groups of similar operations.
Collins Aerospace Systems. Collins Aerospace Systems (Collins Aerospace) is a leading global provider of technologically
advanced aerospace and defense products and aftermarket service solutions for aircraft manufacturers, airlines, and regional,
business and general aviation, as well as for defense and commercial space operations. Collins Aerospace’s product lines include
integrated avionics systems, communications systems, navigation systems, electric power generation, management and distribution
systems, environmental control systems, flight control systems, air data and aircraft sensing systems, engine control systems,
engine nacelle systems, including thrust reversers and mounting pylons, interior and exterior aircraft lighting, aircraft seating and
cargo systems, landing systems, including landing gear, wheels and braking systems, hoists and winches, fire and ice detection and
protection systems, actuation systems, engine components, and propeller systems. Collins Aerospace also designs, produces and
supports cabin interior, communications and aviation systems, oxygen systems, food and beverage preparation, storage and galley
systems, lavatory and wastewater management systems. Collins Aerospace solutions support human space exploration with
environmental control and power systems and extravehicular activity suits and support government and defense customer missions
by providing airborne intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance systems, test and training range systems, crew escape systems,
and simulation and training solutions. Collins Aerospace also provides information management services through worldwide voice
and data communication networks and solutions. Aftermarket services include spare parts, overhaul and repair, engineering and
technical support, training and fleet management solutions, and information management services.
Collins Aerospace sells aerospace and defense products and services to aircraft manufacturers, airlines and other aircraft operators,
the U.S. and foreign governments, defense contractors, maintenance, repair and overhaul providers, and independent distributors
around the world. Collins Aerospace’s largest customers are Boeing and Airbus with combined sales, prior to discounts and
incentives, of 21%, 27% and 31% of total Collins Aerospace segment sales in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
In 2020, Collins Aerospace was awarded significant contracts for all four of the Future Vertical Lift (FVL) platforms, the Next
Generation Ejection Seat (the ACES 5), Ground Based Strategic Deterrent, Bell H-1 Tail Drive System, the Next-Gen APU
4
Table of Contents
Fuel Nozzle, and the Mounted Assured Positioning, Navigation and Timing System (MAPS GenII). Our products supported the
first flight of the Boeing 777X, and enabled entry into service for the Embraer Praetor 500 and 600. Collins also delivered the first
production Nacelle Enhancement Program (NEP) nacelle configuration on A350-900/1000. Significant product development
activity continues, including major systems for Boeing’s T-7A and VC-25B, the Irkut MC-21, the Dassault Falcon 6X, the
Leonardo AW249, the Xian MA700, and the COMAC C919. Other significant development work includes Iridium Next, high-
frequency (HF) Next, 6th-gen military aircraft, Tactical Combat Training Systems Increment II, NASA deep space exploration
systems, distributed pulse oxygen system, Confident to Fly technologies, and the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) CLEEN II
demonstrator.
Pratt & Whitney. Pratt & Whitney is among the world’s leading suppliers of aircraft engines for commercial, military, business jet
and general aviation customers. Pratt & Whitney’s Commercial Engines and Military Engines businesses design, develop, produce
and maintain families of large engines for wide- and narrow-body and large regional aircraft for commercial customers and for
fighter, bomber, tanker and transport aircraft for military customers. Pratt & Whitney’s small engine business, Pratt & Whitney
Canada (P&WC), is among the world’s leading suppliers of engines powering regional airlines, general and business aviation, as
well as helicopters. Pratt & Whitney also produces, sells and services military and commercial auxiliary power units. Pratt &
Whitney provides fleet management services and aftermarket maintenance, repair and overhaul services in all of these segments.
Pratt & Whitney sells products and services principally to aircraft manufacturers, airlines and other aircraft operators, aircraft
leasing companies and the U.S. and foreign governments. Pratt & Whitney’s largest customer by sales is Airbus, with sales, prior to
discounts and incentives, of 30%, 31% and 36% of total Pratt & Whitney segment sales in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Pratt & Whitney produces the PW1000G Geared Turbofan engine family, the first of which, the PW1100G-JM, entered into service
in January 2016. The PW1000G Geared Turbofan engine has demonstrated a significant reduction in fuel burn and noise levels and
lower environmental emissions when compared to legacy engines. The PW1100G-JM engine is offered on the Airbus A320neo
family of aircraft. PW1000G Geared Turbofan engine models also power the Airbus A220 passenger aircraft and Embraer’s E-Jet
E2 family of aircraft and have been selected to power the new Irkut MC-21 passenger aircraft. Mitsubishi and Pratt & Whitney
have signed a contract in recognition of the formal pause in MRJ70 and MRJ90 engine development for the SpaceJet program. In
addition, P&WC’s PW800 engine has been selected to exclusively power Gulfstream’s new G500 and G600 business jets, as well
as to power Dassault’s new Falcon 6X business jet, which is scheduled to enter into service in 2022.
Pratt & Whitney is under contract to produce and sustain the F135 engine for the U.S. government’s F-35 Joint Program Office to
power the single-engine F-35 Lightning II aircraft (commonly known as the Joint Strike Fighter) produced by Lockheed Martin.
F135 propulsion system configurations are used for the U.S Air Force’s F-35A, the U.S. Marine Corps’ F-35B and the U.S. Navy’s
F-35C jets. F135 engines are also used on F-35 aircraft purchased by Joint Strike Fighter partner countries and foreign military
sales countries. Pratt & Whitney is also under contract to build engines for the U.S. Air Force’s B-21 long-range strike bomber and
to develop next-generation adaptive engines for the U.S. Air Force.
The development of new engines and improvements to current production engines present important growth opportunities for Pratt
& Whitney. In view of the risks and costs associated with developing new engines, Pratt & Whitney has entered into some
collaboration arrangements in which revenues, costs and risks are shared with third parties. At December 31, 2020, the interests of
third-party collaboration participants in Pratt & Whitney-directed commercial jet engine programs ranged, in the aggregate per
program, from approximately 13% to 49%. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item
8 of this Form 10-K for a description of our accounting for collaboration arrangements. Pratt & Whitney also continues to enhance
its programs through performance improvement measures and product base expansion.
In 2020, Pratt & Whitney reached significant milestones on the Geared Turbofan (GTF) engine program, including achieving an
industry-leading engine dispatch reliability rate of 99.98% for the GTF engines for the Airbus A320neo. The GTF engine family
now powers more than 900 aircraft across 50 airlines and three aircraft platforms: Airbus A320neo family, Airbus A220 and
Embraer E-Jets E2 family. Pratt & Whitney also delivered the 50,000th PT6 turboprop engine in the General Aviation segment.
Also in 2020, Pratt & Whitney received a significant number of contract awards for the F135 program, which powers all three
variants of the F-35 Lightning II fighter aircraft. F135 production milestones achieved included the delivery of the 600th and 700th
production engines. From a sustainment perspective, the F135 team supported the activation of half a dozen bases and ships around
the world, including the first U.S. Navy aircraft carrier ready to deploy with F-35C aircraft on board. Significant activity continues
on Adaptive Engine Transition Program, 6th-gen propulsion, and other development programs.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS) is a global leading developer and provider of integrated
sensor and communication systems for advanced missions, advanced training, and cyber and software solutions to intelligence,
defense, federal and commercial customers. RIS capabilities include space-based sensors and data processing systems; multi-
5
Table of Contents
domain intelligence solutions; electronic warfare solutions, including high-energy laser weapons systems; command and control
systems; modernization, training and mission support services; and advanced cyber analytics, systems defense and services.
RIS serves as a prime contractor or major subcontractor on contracts with the U.S. Intelligence Community, U.S. Department of
Defense (DoD), Department of Homeland Security, the FAA, National Aeronautics and Space Administration, and other
international and classified customers.
In 2020, RIS continued to invest in advancing its current products and services and developing next generation capabilities to meet
evolving customer missions. Significant advancements include laser technologies; intelligence surveillance and reconnaissance
electro-optical/infrared (EO/IR) products; radar for 5th and 6th generation aircraft; classified space mission systems; offensive and
defensive cyber solutions; and the Next Generation Jammer system. RIS continued to grow its classified business, receiving a
number of significant contracts. In addition, in December 2020, RIS completed its previously announced acquisition of Blue
Canyon Technologies, a leading provider of small satellites and spacecraft components to the U.S. Air Force, NASA, and the
Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA).
Raytheon Missiles & Defense. Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD) is a leading designer, developer, integrator producer and
sustainer of integrated air and missile defense systems; defensive and combat solutions; large land- and sea-based radars;
command, control, communications and intelligence solutions; and naval and undersea sensor solutions for the U.S. and foreign
government customers. RMD’s integrated air and missile defense systems include the proven Patriot missile defense system and
next-generation radar systems to defeat advanced threats. Its defensive solutions include counter-unmanned aircraft systems and
ship defense systems. Its combat solutions include precision munitions, missiles, hypersonics, high power microwave and other
weapons. Its command, control, communications and intelligence solutions include integrated, networked, actionable combat
solutions for air and land combat commanders. RMD’s naval and undersea solutions include combat and ship electronic and
sensing systems, as well as undersea sensing and effects solutions. Its sustainment solutions include maintenance, depot support,
training and predictive analytics services.
RMD serves as a prime contractor or major subcontractor on numerous programs with the U.S. DoD, including the U.S. Navy, U.S.
Army, Missile Defense Agency, and U.S. Air Force, and international governments.
In 2020, the following programs and awards continued to drive revenue and strategic imperatives for RMD growth: the Lower Tier
Air and Missile Defense System (LTAMDS), the Advanced Medium Range Air-to-Air Missile (AMRAAM), the Standard Missile
Family (Standard Missile 2 (SM-2), Standard Missile 3 (SM-3) and Standard Missile 6 (SM-6)), Tomahawk variants, the Patriot
Engineering Services, the Qatar National Advanced Surface-to-Air Missile System (NASAMS), the Air and Missile Defense Radar
(AMDR)/SPY-6, Poland Patriot, the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia Transportable Radar Surveillance and Control Model 2 (KSA TPY-
2), the Air Intercept Missile (AIM-9X), Qatar Early Warning Radar (EWR), Army Navy/Transportable Radar Surveillance and
Control Model 2 (AN/TPY-2)and Phalanx SeaRAM. The Missile Defense Agency (MDA) awarded RMD significant contracts for
AN/TPY-2 radars and the SM-3 missile. In addition, RMD was down-selected in the competition for the sole provider for the Long
Range Stand Off (LRSO) Strike Initiative and the U.S. Air Force approved RMD’s StormBreaker smart weapon for fielding on the
F-15 Eagle. Also, as part of a historic MDA demonstration, RMD’s advanced SM-3 Block IIA ballistic missile defense interceptor
intercepted and destroyed an intercontinental ballistic missile target outside Earth’s atmosphere for the first time ever.
Other Matters Relating to Our Business
As worldwide businesses, our operations can be affected by a variety of economic, industry and other factors, including those
described in this section, in Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” in
Item 1, “Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results,” and in Item 1A, “Risk Factors” in this Form 10-K.
COVID-19 Pandemic. In March 2020, the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) was declared a pandemic by the World Health
Organization and a national emergency by the U.S. government. Our business and operations and the industries in which we
operate have been significantly impacted by public and private sector policies and initiatives in the U.S. and worldwide to address
the transmission of COVID-19, such as the imposition of travel restrictions and the adoption of remote working, as well as public
sentiments regarding air travel. In particular, the unprecedented decrease in air travel resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic is
adversely affecting our airline and airframer customers, and their demand for the products and services of our Collins Aerospace
and Pratt & Whitney segments. Our airline customers have reported significant reductions in fleet utilization, aircraft grounding
and unplanned retirements, and have deferred and, in some cases, cancelled, new aircraft deliveries. They have shifted to cash
conservation behaviors such as deferring engine maintenance due to lower flight hours and aircraft utilization, requesting extended
payment terms, deferring delivery of new aircraft and spare engines and requesting discounts on engine maintenance. Some airline
customers have filed for bankruptcy due to their inability to meet their financial obligations.
6
Table of Contents
Additionally, we are seeing purchase order declines in line with publicly communicated aircraft production volumes as original
equipment manufacturer (OEM) customers delay and cancel orders.
In response to the COVID-19 impacts on our businesses, we have been and continue to actively mitigate costs and adjust
production schedules to accommodate these declines in demand. We have also been taking actions to preserve capital and protect
the long-term needs of our businesses, including cutting discretionary spending, significantly reducing capital expenditures and
research and development spend, suspending our share buyback program in 2020, deferring merit increases and implementing
temporary pay reductions, freezing non-essential hiring, repositioning employees to defense work, furloughing employees when
needed, and reducing personnel. Our former Raytheon Company businesses, Raytheon Intelligence & Space and Raytheon Missiles
& Defense, although experiencing minor impacts, have not experienced significant business disruptions as a result of the COVID-
19 pandemic.
For additional information related to the COVID-19 pandemic, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors” in this Form 10-K.
Raytheon Merger Integration. We continue to make progress on our integration activities to realize the benefits of the Raytheon
Merger, including synergies, cost savings, innovation and enterprise-wide technology sharing opportunities (including technology-
driven revenue synergies) and operational efficiencies. We continue to integrate our business processes and systems, identify and
mature technology and revenue synergy opportunities, achieve significant cost savings, harmonize our organizational model and
policies, as well as promote a strong single-company culture. Numerous aspects of these activities will continue into 2021.
Sales and Customers
We have substantial U.S. government sales, which we conduct through all four of our business segments. Raytheon Intelligence &
Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense together represent a significant portion of those sales. In addition, as a global company, all
four of our business segments have substantial international sales.
U.S. Government Sales. Our U.S. government sales were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Sales to the U.S. government $ 25,962 $ 9,094 $ 6,560 
Sales to the U.S. government as a percentage of total net sales 46 % 20 % 19 %
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government. See “Note 22: Segment Financial Data” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
information.
International Sales. Our international sales were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total international sales $ 22,027 $ 23,952 $ 19,035 
Total international sales as a percentage of total net sales 39 % 53 % 55 %
(1)    Includes foreign military sales through the U.S. government. See “Note 22: Segment Financial Data” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
information.
Backlog. Backlog, which is equivalent to our remaining performance obligations (RPO), represents the aggregate amount of total
contract transaction price related to firm orders that are unsatisfied or partially unsatisfied. Segment backlog does not include
intercompany backlog. Our backlog by segment was as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Collins Aerospace Systems $ 23,005 $ 26,260 
Pratt & Whitney 78,135 85,183 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 18,676 — 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 29,593 — 
Our consolidated RPO also includes the RPO of certain smaller non-reportable segments, which are not reflected in the table above.
Approximately 70% of our consolidated backlog as of December 31, 2020 is not expected to be realized as sales in the next twelve
months.
Defense backlog primarily relates to backlog with government customers and is included within our total backlog. At December 31,
2020, our defense backlog was approximately 45% of total backlog.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
7
Table of Contents
Competition
All of our businesses are subject to significant competition. Our businesses compete on a variety of factors such as price, delivery
schedule, past performance, reliability, customer service, product development, innovation and technology. Many of our
competitors have substantial financial resources and significant technological capabilities. Further, some non-U.S. competitors
receive government research and development assistance, marketing subsidies and other assistance for their products beyond the
assistance that may be available to us as a U.S. company. In addition, the competitive landscapes in the industry segments we serve
continue to evolve with trends such as increased vertical integration by competitors and customers and the emergence of more
commercial competitors on defense development programs.
Our aerospace businesses compete with numerous domestic and foreign manufacturers, customers and companies that obtain
regulatory agency approval to manufacture spare parts. Customer selections of aircraft engines, components and systems can also
have a significant impact on future sales of parts and services. In addition, the U.S. government’s and other governments’ policies
of purchasing parts from suppliers other than the original equipment manufacturer affect military spare parts sales. Some
competitors may offer substantial discounts and other financial incentives, performance and operating cost guarantees, and
participation in financing arrangements in an effort to compete for the aftermarket associated with these products.
Our defense businesses compete with numerous U.S. and foreign companies in most defense and government electronics, space,
information technology and technical services and support segments. We frequently partner on defense programs with our major
suppliers, some of whom are, from time to time, competitors on other programs.
People
As a technology and innovation-driven global company, RTC depends on a highly educated and skilled workforce. We seek to
advance a diverse, equitable and inclusive work environment for all employees. Our ability to attract, develop and retain the best
talent, particularly those with technical, engineering and science backgrounds or experience, is critical for us to execute our strategy
and grow our businesses. In addition to providing market competitive compensation and benefits, we invest in our workforce
through education, training and development programs. Additionally, we regularly conduct succession planning to ensure that we
continue to cultivate the leadership pipeline of talent needed to execute our strategy.
We continuously monitor the hiring, retention and management of our employees by business and function. We regularly conduct
confidential surveys to seek feedback from our employees and use those results to improve our workplace. In addition, we have
industry-leading health and safety as well as ethics and compliance programs to help mitigate associated employee risks.
As of December 31, 2020, our global employee population consisted of a total of approximately 181,000 employees, including
approximately 61,000 engineers and approximately 41,000 employees represented by labor unions and other employee
representative bodies. Our employees are located in 71 countries, with approximately 71% of our employees located in the U.S.,
approximately 4% of our employees located in Canada, approximately 14% of our employees located in Europe, approximately 9%
of our employees located in the Asia Pacific region, approximately 1% of our employees located in the Middle East and North
Africa region and approximately 1% of our employees located in other regions.
In 2020, our workforce was significantly impacted by the Separation Transactions, the Raytheon Merger and the COVID-19
pandemic.
Upon completion of the Separation Transactions, a total of approximately 122,000 former UTC employees became employees of
Carrier and Otis. Further, as a result of the Raytheon Merger, 71,000 Raytheon Company employees joined the 124,000 employees
of UTC’s aerospace businesses as RTC employees. Following the Raytheon Merger, we have undertaken a number of actions to
reduce our workforce and achieve cost synergies while retaining key talent necessary for RTC’s success. We are working towards a
harmonized set of human resources systems and applications, programs and processes that will enable employees to more easily
move across our businesses and functions and advance their careers within RTC. We also have engaged in additional succession
planning as a result of the changes in our senior management team in connection with the Separation Transactions and the
Raytheon Merger.
In addition, we have taken extraordinary measures to protect our workforce in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. We
implemented extensive safety protocols to support our essential employees required to work onsite. We also enabled approximately
100,000 of our employees to work remotely, and we have sought to ensure that they have the technology, flexible work schedules,
dependent care and other services needed during this time to enable them to work effectively from home.
8
Table of Contents
Due to the impact of the pandemic on our businesses in 2020, we have taken a number of actions, including deferring merit
increases and implementing temporary pay reductions, freezing non-essential hiring, repositioning employees to defense work and
making personnel reductions. In particular, Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney have taken steps to adjust their workforces to
align with current and expected demand for their products and services. At Collins Aerospace, 11% of the workforce was impacted
by reductions (excluding divestitures), and at Pratt & Whitney, 13% of the workforce was impacted by reductions. Our RIS and
RMD businesses units have not been as severely impacted by the pandemic as Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney, and
continued to hire in 2020 to support the growth of their businesses.
Research and Development and Operations
Our innovative products and services incorporate advanced technologies. As a result, we invest substantial amounts in research and
development (R&D) activities using our own funds and under contractual arrangements with our customers, to enhance existing
products and services and develop future technologies to meet our customers’ changing needs and requirements, as well as to
address new business opportunities.
We manufacture and service our products in over 240 manufacturing, production or overhaul facilities in approximately 30
countries, including the U.S. In addition, RTC has offices in another 10 countries.
Intellectual Property
We maintain a portfolio of patents, trademarks, copyrights, trade secrets, licenses and franchises related to our businesses. We rely
on a combination of these rights, along with nondisclosure agreements, IT security systems, internal controls and compliance
systems and other measures to protect our intellectual property. The U.S. government and foreign governments have licenses to
certain of our intellectual property, including certain patents, which are developed or used in the performance of government
contracts. Commercial customers also have licenses to certain of our intellectual property largely in connection with the sale of our
products. While our intellectual property rights in the aggregate are important to the operation of each of our businesses, we do not
believe that our business would be materially affected by the expiration of any particular intellectual property right or termination
of any particular intellectual property patent license agreement.
Suppliers and Raw Materials
We are dependent upon the availability of materials and major components and the performance of our suppliers and
subcontractors. Some of our products require relatively scarce raw materials. We generally have not experienced significant
difficulties in procuring the necessary raw materials, components and other supplies for our products, but we may experience
supply impacts related to the COVID-19 pandemic if its impact on commercial aerospace continues. We are monitoring supplier
liquidity and working continuously with our supply base to ensure an adequate source of supply and to reduce costs. We pursue
cost reductions through a number of mechanisms, including consolidating our purchases, reducing the number of suppliers,
strategic global sourcing and competitions among potential suppliers. In some instances, we depend upon a single source of supply
or participate in commodity markets that may be subject to allocations of limited supplies by suppliers. Like other users in the U.S.,
we are largely dependent upon foreign sources for certain raw materials, such as cobalt, tantalum, chromium, rhenium and nickel.
We have a number of ongoing programs to manage this dependence and the accompanying risk, including long-term agreements
and the conservation of materials through scrap reclamation and new manufacturing processes. In addition, in some cases, we must
comply with specific procurement requirements, which may limit the suppliers and subcontractors we may utilize.
Regulatory Matters
Our businesses are subject to extensive regulation in the industries we serve. We deal with numerous U.S. government agencies and
entities, including but not limited to all of the branches of the DoD, the FAA, and the Department of Homeland Security. Similar
government authorities exist in all of the countries in which we do business.
U.S. Government Contracts. As previously discussed, the U.S. government is our largest customer, representing a substantial
majority of our total defense sales. U.S. government contracts are subject to termination by the government, either for convenience
or for default in the event of our failure to perform under the applicable contract. In the case of a termination for convenience, we
would normally be entitled to reimbursement for our allowable costs incurred, termination costs and a reasonable profit. If
terminated by the government as a result of our default, we could be liable for payments made to us for undelivered goods or
services, additional costs the government incurs in acquiring undelivered goods or services from another source and any other
damages it suffers. Our U.S. government contracts generally are subject to the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR), which sets
forth policies, procedures and requirements for the acquisition of goods and services by the U.S. government; department-specific
regulations that implement or supplement the FAR, such as the DoD’s Defense Federal Acquisition Regulation Supplement
(DFARS); and other applicable laws and regulations. These regulations impose a broad range of requirements, many of which are
unique to government contracting, including various procurement, import and export,
9
Table of Contents
security, contract pricing and cost, contract termination and adjustment, audit and product integrity requirements. A contractor’s
failure to comply with these regulations and requirements could result in reductions to the value of contracts, contract modifications
or termination, cash withholds on contract payments, forfeiture of profits, and/or the assessment of civil or criminal penalties and
fines, and could lead to suspension or debarment, for cause, from U.S. government contracting or subcontracting for a period of
time.
For further discussion of risks related to government contracting, including on-going litigation associated with U.S. government
audits and investigations, see Item 1A, “Risk Factors” and Item 3, “Legal Proceedings,” in this Form 10-K and “Note 19:
Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Commercial Aerospace Product Regulation. Our commercial aerospace products generally are subject to regulations by the FAA,
foreign aviation administration authorities and international regulatory bodies, including on production and quality systems,
airworthiness and installation approvals, repair procedures and continuing operational safety. In addition, commercial aerospace
regulations and regulator approaches differ across jurisdictions and changes in such regulations and implementing legislation can
impact our operations.
Environmental Regulation. Our operations are subject to and affected by environmental regulation by federal, state and local
authorities in the U.S. and regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over our international operations, including with respect to the
discharge, treatment, storage, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances and wastes. We use hazardous substances and
generate hazardous wastes in our operations and have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, costs associated with
environmental compliance and management of sites with pollutants. A portion of these costs are eligible for future recovery through
the pricing of our products and services under our contracts with the U.S. government. We do not anticipate that compliance with
current provisions or requirements relating to the protection of the environment or that any payments we may be required to make
for cleanup liabilities will have a material adverse effect upon our cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or results of
operations. Environmental matters are further addressed in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K and “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles”
and “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Most of the U.S. laws governing environmental matters include criminal provisions. If we were convicted of a violation of the
federal Clean Air Act or Clean Water Act, the facility or facilities involved in the violation could be deemed ineligible to be used in
performing any U.S. government contract we are awarded until the Environmental Protection Agency thereafter certifies that the
condition giving rise to the violation has been corrected. We also manage various government-owned facilities on behalf of the U.S.
government. At such facilities, environmental compliance and remediation costs have historically been primarily the responsibility
of the U.S. government and we have relied (and continue to rely with respect to past practices) upon U.S. government funding to
pay such costs.
In addition, we could be affected by future laws or regulations imposed in response to concerns over climate change. Changes in
environmental and climate change laws or regulations, including laws relating to greenhouse gas emissions, could lead to new or
additional investment in product designs and could increase environmental compliance expenditures, including increased energy
and raw materials costs.
For further discussion of risks related to environmental matters and other government regulations, see Item 1A, “Risk Factors” and
Item 3, “Legal Proceedings,” in this Form 10-K and “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Other Applicable Regulations. We conduct our businesses through subsidiaries and affiliates worldwide. As a result, our
businesses and operations are subject to both U.S. and non-U.S. government laws, regulations and procurement policies and
practices, including regulations relating to import-export controls, tariffs, investment, exchange controls, anti-corruption, and cash
repatriation. Our international sales are also subject to varying currency, political and economic risks.
10
Table of Contents
Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results
This Form 10-K contains statements which, to the extent they are not statements of historical or present fact, constitute “forward-
looking statements” under the securities laws. From time to time, oral or written forward-looking statements may also be included
in other information released to the public. These forward-looking statements are intended to provide management’s current
expectations or plans for our future operating and financial performance, based on assumptions currently believed to be valid.
Forward-looking statements can be identified by the use of words such as “believe,” “expect,” “expectations,” “plans,” “strategy,”
“prospects,” “estimate,” “project,” “target,” “anticipate,” “will,” “should,” “see,” “guidance,” “outlook,” “confident,” “on track”
and other words of similar meaning. Forward-looking statements may include, among other things, statements relating to future
sales, earnings, cash flow, results of operations, uses of cash, share repurchases, tax payments and rates, research and development
spending, other measures of financial performance, potential future plans, strategies or transactions, credit ratings and net
indebtedness, other anticipated benefits to RTC of the Rockwell Collins acquisition, the Raytheon Merger or the Separation
Transactions, including estimated synergies and customer cost savings resulting from the Raytheon Merger and the anticipated
benefits and costs of the Separation Transactions and other statements that are not solely historical facts. All forward-looking
statements involve risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or
implied in the forward-looking statements. For those statements, we claim the protection of the safe harbor for forward-looking
statements contained in the U.S. Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such risks, uncertainties and other factors
include, without limitation:
•the effect of economic conditions in the industries and countries in which RTC operates in the U.S. and globally and any
changes therein, including financial market conditions, fluctuations in commodity prices, interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates, levels of end-customer demand in both the commercial and defense segments of the aerospace
industry, levels of air travel, financial condition of commercial airlines, the impact of pandemic health issues (including
COVID-19 and its effects, among other things, on global supply, demand and distribution capabilities as the COVID-19
pandemic continues and results in an increasingly prolonged period of disruption to air travel and commercial activities
generally, and significant restrictions and limitations on businesses, particularly within the aerospace and commercial
airlines industries), aviation safety concerns, weather conditions and natural disasters, the financial condition of our
customers and suppliers, and the risks associated with U.S. government sales (including changes or shifts in defense
spending due to budgetary constraints, spending cuts resulting from sequestration or the allocation of funds to
governmental responses to COVID-19, a government shutdown, or otherwise, and uncertain funding of programs);
•challenges in the development, production, delivery, support, performance, safety, regulatory compliance and realization
of the anticipated benefits (including our expected returns under customer contracts) of advanced technologies and new
products and services;
•the scope, nature, impact or timing of acquisition and divestiture activity, including among other things the integration of
UTC and Raytheon Company’s businesses and the integration of RTC with other businesses acquired before and after the
Raytheon Merger, and realization of synergies and opportunities for growth and innovation and incurrence of related costs
and expenses, including the possibility that the anticipated benefits from the combination of UTC and Raytheon
Company’s businesses or other acquired businesses cannot be realized in full or may take longer to realize than expected,
or the possibility that costs or difficulties related to the integration of UTC’s businesses with Raytheon Company’s or other
acquired businesses will be greater than expected or may not result in the achievement of estimated synergies within the
contemplated time frame or at all;
•RTC’s levels of indebtedness, capital spending and research and development spending;
•future availability of credit and factors that may affect such availability, including credit market conditions and our capital
structure;
•the timing and scope of future repurchases by RTC of its common stock, which are subject to a number of uncertainties
and may be discontinued, accelerated, suspended or delayed at any time due to various factors, including market
conditions and the level of other investing activities and uses of cash;
•delays and disruption in delivery of materials and services from suppliers;
•company and customer-directed cost reduction efforts and restructuring costs and savings and other consequences thereof
(including the potential termination of U.S. government contracts and performance under undefinitized contract actions
and the potential inability to recover termination costs);
•new business and investment opportunities;
•the ability to realize the intended benefits of organizational changes;
•the anticipated benefits of diversification and balance of operations across product lines, regions and industries;
•the outcome of legal proceedings, investigations and other contingencies;
•pension plan assumptions and future contributions;
•the impact of the negotiation of collective bargaining agreements and labor disputes;
•the effect of changes in political conditions in the U.S. and other countries in which RTC and its businesses operate,
11
Table of Contents
including the effect of changes in U.S. trade policies, on general market conditions, global trade policies and currency
exchange rates in the near term and beyond;
•potential changes in policy positions or priorities that emerge from a new U.S. Administration, including changes in DoD
policies or priorities;
•the effect of changes in tax (including U.S. tax reform enacted on December 22, 2017, which is commonly referred to as
the TCJA), environmental, regulatory and other laws and regulations (including, among other things, export and import
requirements such as the International Traffic in Arms Regulations and the Export Administration Regulations, anti-
bribery and anti-corruption requirements, including the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, industrial cooperation agreement
obligations, and procurement and other regulations) in the U.S. and other countries in which RTC and its businesses
operate;
•the ability of RTC to retain and hire key personnel and the ability of our personnel to continue to operate our facilities and
businesses around the world in light of, among other factors, the COVID-19 pandemic; and
•the intended qualification of (1) the Raytheon Merger as a tax-free reorganization and (2) the Separation Transactions and
other internal restructurings as tax-free to UTC and former UTC shareowners, in each case, for U.S. federal income tax
purposes
In addition, this Form 10-K includes important information as to risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results
to differ materially from those expressed or implied in the forward-looking statements. See “Note 19: Commitments and
Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, the section titled “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations” under the headings “Business Overview,” “Critical Accounting Estimates,” “Results of Operations,” and
“Liquidity and Financial Condition,” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, and the sections titled Item 1A, “Risk Factors” and Item 3,
“Legal Proceedings,” of this Form 10-K. This Form 10-K also includes important information as to these factors in the section
titled “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” under the headings
“Restructuring Costs,” “Environmental Matters” and “Governmental Matters,” within Item 7 of this Form 10-K, and in the
“Business” section under the headings “General,” “Description of Business by Segment” and “Other Matters Relating to Our
Business as a Whole.” The forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this report or, in the case of any document
incorporated by reference, the date of that document. We undertake no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking
statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by applicable law. Additional
information as to factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in the forward-looking
statements is disclosed from time to time in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).
12
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Our business, financial condition, operating results and cash flows can be impacted by the factors set forth below, any one of which
could cause our actual results to vary materially from recent results or from our anticipated future results.
INDUSTRY RISKS
Our Business May be Adversely Affected by Changes in Global Economic, Capital Market and Political Conditions.
Our business, financial condition, operating results and cash flows may be adversely affected by changes in global economic
conditions and geopolitical risks, including credit market conditions, levels of consumer and business confidence, commodity
prices, exchange rates, potential changes in policy positions or priorities that emerge from a new U.S. Administration due to a
variety of factors, levels of government spending and deficits, the threat environment, trade policies, political conditions, actual or
anticipated default on sovereign debt and other challenges that could affect the global economy. These economic conditions affect
businesses such as ours in a number of ways. Tightening of credit in financial markets could adversely affect the ability of our
customers and suppliers to obtain financing for significant purchases and operations, could result in a decrease in or cancellation of
orders for our products and services, and could impact the ability of our customers to make payments. Similarly, such tightening of
credit may adversely affect our supplier base and increase the potential for one or more of our suppliers to experience financial
distress or bankruptcy. In addition, geopolitical risks, including changes in the threat environment and political conditions, could
affect government priorities, budgets and policies, which could impact sales of defense and other products and services. Our global
business is also adversely affected by decreases in the general level of economic activity, such as decreases in business and
consumer spending, air travel, the financial strength of airlines and business jet operators, and government procurement.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) Has Affected and Will Continue to Affect Our Business, Supply Chains, Operations and
the Industries in which We Operate.
The COVID-19 pandemic has significantly increased global economic and demand uncertainty. Public and private sector policies
and initiatives in the U.S. and worldwide to address the transmission of COVID-19, such as the imposition of travel restrictions and
the adoption of remote working, have impacted the Company’s business, operations and the industries in which we operate. The
disruption to air travel and commercial activities generally, and significant restrictions and limitations on businesses, attributable to
the COVID-19 pandemic has negatively impacted the global supply, demand and distribution capabilities of the aerospace and
commercial airlines industries. In particular, the decrease in air travel resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic has resulted in the
loss of business and leisure passenger traffic and is adversely affecting our airline and airframer customers, and their demand for
our products and services. Aircraft manufacturers are reducing production rates due to fewer expected aircraft deliveries and
cancelling new airframer programs, and, as a result, demand for our original equipment manufacturer (OEM) products has
decreased. In addition, significant declines in aircraft flight hours are resulting in reduced demand for our aftermarket parts and
services. Moreover, airlines and airline leasing companies have been deferring, and are expected to continue to defer, maintenance
services, which negatively impacts our related revenues. Some airlines have accelerated retirement of certain aircraft, thereby
eliminating our continuing services and negatively impacting our aftermarket revenues with respect to those aircraft. Further, a
significant portion of our long-term support contracts are driven by actual usage, and decreased usage has, and will continue to,
negatively affect our revenues associated with these types of contracts. COVID-19 may also limit the ability of our customers
generally to perform, including in making timely payment to us.
In addition, we provide aircraft financing commitments, in the form of debt or lease financing, to commercial aerospace customers.
COVID-19 may increase the need for these customers to utilize these financing commitments due to the pandemic’s adverse impact
on their businesses or the inability of these customers to obtain more favorable terms from other financing sources. If financing
commitments are exercised, the Company will need to divert cash to satisfy them, and these customers may be unable to make
payments.
The COVID-19 pandemic has impacted, and will continue to impact, the Company’s supply chains, including the ability of
suppliers and vendors to provide their products and services to the Company. At this time, some of our suppliers have reduced or
ceased operations as a result of COVID-19. This supply chain impact could also contribute to performance delays on our customer
obligations and increase our costs.
We are continuing to face operational challenges from the need to protect employee health and safety, workplace disruptions, and
restrictions on the movement of people and goods, at our own facilities and at customers and suppliers. In addition, continued
reduced operations and business disruption – including if significant portions of our workforce or our suppliers’ workforces are
unable to work effectively due to facilities closures, illness, quarantines, government actions or other restrictions – could hinder or
delay our production capabilities generally, and otherwise impede our ability to perform on our obligations to our customers, and
may also result in increased costs to us. The continued spread of COVID-19 may also affect our ability to
13
Table of Contents
hire, develop and retain our talented and diverse workforce, and to maintain our corporate culture. Any costs associated with
COVID-19 may not be fully recoverable or adequately covered by insurance.
The COVID-19 pandemic also may materially impact U.S. government sales, including changes or shifts in defense spending due
to budgetary constraints, the allocation of funds to governmental responses to COVID-19, a failure to complete the government
budget process resulting in a Continuing Resolution (CR) or a government shutdown, or otherwise, and uncertain funding of
programs. COVID-19 has impacted and may further impact the broader economies of affected countries, including negatively
impacting economic growth, and creating volatility and unpredictability in financial and capital markets, foreign currency exchange
rates, and interest rates. These impacts and the resulting volatility and disruption to the global capital markets may increase the cost
of capital and may adversely impact access to capital for the Company and our suppliers and customers including heightened
counter party risks associated with foreign exchange hedging transactions, interest rate swaps, solvency of revolving credit facility
banks and the ability to raise capital both short-term and long-term.
Any of these factors, depending on the severity and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and its effects, could have a material
adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. The ultimate financial impact of the
COVID-19 pandemic is unknown at this time. The extent of such impact depends on future developments, which are highly
uncertain and cannot be predicted in the short- or long-term, including new information which may emerge concerning the scope,
severity and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as any worsening of the pandemic, the effect of mutating strains and
whether additional outbreaks of the pandemic will continue to occur, actions to contain the pandemic’s spread or treat its impact,
timing of the availability of vaccines, and their distribution, acceptance and efficacy, and governmental, business and individual
personal actions taken in response to the pandemic (including restrictions and limitations on travel and transportation, and changes
in leisure and business travel patterns and work environments) among others. Some of these actions and related impacts may be
trends that continue in the future even after the pandemic no longer poses a significant public health risk.
Changes in U.S. Government Defense Spending Could Negatively Impact Our Financial Position, Results of Operations,
Liquidity and Overall Business.
U.S. government sales constitute a significant portion of our consolidated sales. Our U.S. government revenues largely result from
contracts awarded under various U.S. government programs, primarily defense-related programs with the U.S. Department of
Defense (DoD), and a broad range of programs with the U.S. Intelligence Community and other departments and agencies.
Changes in U.S. government defense spending for various reasons, including as a result of potential changes in policy positions or
priorities which may result from the recent U.S. presidential and congressional election, could negatively impact our results of
operations, financial condition and liquidity. Our programs are subject to U.S. government policies, budget decisions and
appropriation processes which are driven by numerous factors including: (1) geopolitical events; (2) macroeconomic conditions;
and (3) the ability of the U.S. government to enact relevant legislation, such as appropriations bills. In recent years, U.S.
government appropriations have been affected by larger U.S. government budgetary issues and related legislation. In previous years
the U.S. government has been unable to complete its budget process before the end of its fiscal year, resulting in both governmental
shut-downs and CRs providing only enough funds for U.S. government agencies to continue operating at prior-year levels. Further,
if the U.S. government debt ceiling is not raised and the national debt reaches the statutory debt ceiling, the U.S. government could
default on its debts. As a result, U.S. government defense spending levels are subject to a wide range of outcomes and are difficult
to predict beyond the near-term due to numerous factors, including the external threat environment, future governmental priorities
and the state of governmental finances. Significant changes in U.S. government defense spending or changes in U.S. government
priorities, policies and requirements could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and
liquidity.
We Face Risks Relating to Our U.S. Government Contracts and the Mix of Our U.S. Government Contracts and Programs that
Could Negatively Impact our Financial Condition, Results of Operations, Liquidity and Overall Business.
The termination of one or more of our contracts, or the occurrence of performance delays, cost overruns, product failures, materials
or components shortages, or contract definitization delays, could negatively impact our results of operations, financial condition
and liquidity.
U.S. government contracts generally permit the government to terminate the contract, in whole or in part, without prior notice, at
the U.S. government’s convenience or for default based on performance. If one of our contracts is terminated for convenience, we
would generally be entitled to payments for our allowable costs and would receive some allowance for profit on the work
performed. If one of our contracts is terminated for default, we would generally be entitled to payments for work accepted by the
U.S. government. A termination arising out of our default could expose us to liability and have a negative impact on our ability to
obtain future contracts and orders. In addition, we are a subcontractor and not the prime contractor on some contracts. In these
arrangements, the U.S. government could terminate the prime contract for convenience or otherwise,
14
Table of Contents
without regard to our performance as a subcontractor. Further, we can give no assurance that we would be awarded new U.S.
government contracts to offset the revenues lost as a result of the termination of any of our contracts.
In addition, because the funding of U.S. government programs is subject to congressional appropriations made on a fiscal year basis
even for multi-year programs, programs are often only partially funded initially and may not continue to be funded in future years.
Appropriation bills may be delayed, which may result in delays to funding, the collection of receivables and our contract
performance due to lack of authorized funds to procure related products and services. Under certain circumstances, we may use our
own funds to meet our customer’s desired delivery dates or other requirements, but we may not be reimbursed. Further, if
appropriations for one of our programs become unavailable, reduced or delayed, the U.S. government may terminate for
convenience our contract or subcontract under that program.
Our U.S. government contracts typically involve the development, application and manufacture of advanced defense and
technology systems and products aimed at achieving challenging goals. New technologies may be untested or unproven and in
some instances, product requirements or specifications may be modified. As a result, we may experience technological and other
performance difficulties, which may result in delays, setbacks, cost overruns or product failures, and could divert our attention or
resources from other projects. Our failure to execute effectively on our development programs could impact our future sales
opportunities. Additionally, in order to win certain U.S. government contracts, we may be required to invest in development prior to
award as our customers demand more mature and proven solutions. These additional investment amounts may not be worthwhile if
we are not chosen for new contract awards.
Our U.S. government contracts are typically either fixed-priced contracts or cost reimbursement contracts. Fixed-price contracts are
predominantly either firm fixed-price (FFP) contracts or fixed-price incentive (FPI) contracts. Under FFP contracts, we receive a
fixed price irrespective of the actual costs we incur and we therefore carry the burden of any cost overruns. Under FPI contracts, we
generally share with the U.S. government savings for cost underruns less than target costs and expenses for cost overruns exceeding
target costs up to a negotiated ceiling price. We carry the entire burden of cost overruns exceeding the ceiling price amount under
FPI contracts. Under cost reimbursable contracts, we are reimbursed for allowable costs and paid a fixed or performance-based fee,
but we are generally not reimbursed for unauthorized costs exceeding a cost ceiling amount or costs not allowable under the
contract or applicable regulations. If we are unable to control costs or if our initial cost estimates are incorrect, our profitability
could be negatively affected, particularly under fixed-price development contracts. We may also experience cost underruns which
would reduce contract value and related expected revenues, and we may be unable to expand the contract scope or secure additional
work to offset the resulting lost revenues. While contracts for development programs with complex design and technical challenges
are typically cost reimbursable, they can be FFP or FPI, which can significantly increase our risk of a potential negative profit
adjustment, as development contracts by nature involve elements that have not been undertaken before and, thus, are highly subject
to future unexpected cost growth. In addition, other contracts in backlog are for the transition from development to production,
which includes starting and stabilizing a manufacturing and test line while the final design is still being validated.
Over the past several years, the DoD has increased its use of Other Transaction Authority (OTA) contracts, under which it awards
research and development work without all of the procurement requirements that typically apply to DoD contracts, including
justification of sole source awards. For example, Raytheon Company was awarded an OTA contract for the Lower Tier Air and
Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS) in late 2019. OTAs may use fixed-price contracts during all phases of the contract, or mandated
contract cost sharing (e.g., one-third of program costs). They may also require non-traditional subcontractor participation and
impose other requirements that differ from our other DoD contracts. If we are unable to perform on our OTA contracts, including
any applicable non-traditional requirements, it could negatively impact our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
From time to time, we may begin performance under an undefinitized contract action with a not-to-exceed price prior to completing
contract negotiations in order to support U.S. government priorities. Uncertainties in final contract price, specifications and terms,
or loss of negotiating leverage associated with particularly long delays in contract definitization, may negatively affect our
profitability.
In addition, as discussed more fully below, our U.S. government contracts also require us to comply with extensive and evolving
procurement rules and regulations and subject us to potential U.S. government audits, investigations, and disputes.
We are also involved in programs that are classified by the U.S. government, which have security requirements that place limits on
our ability to discuss our performance on these programs, including any risks, disputes and claims.
15
Table of Contents
Our International Operations Subject Us to Economic Risk As Our Results of Operations and Liquidity May Be Adversely
Affected by Changes in Foreign Currency Fluctuations, Economic Conditions, Political Factors, Trade Policies, Sales Methods,
and Changes in Local Government Regulation.
We conduct our business on a global basis, with a significant portion of sales derived from international operations, including U.S.
export sales. Changes in local and regional economic conditions, including fluctuations in exchange rates, may affect product
demand and reported profits in our non-U.S. operations where transactions may be denominated in local currencies. In addition,
currency fluctuations may affect the prices we pay suppliers for materials used in our products. As a result, our operating margins
also may be negatively impacted by worldwide currency fluctuations that result in higher costs for certain cross-border transactions.
Our financial statements are denominated in U.S. Dollars. Accordingly, fluctuations in exchange rates may also give rise to
translation gains or losses when financial statements of non-U.S. operating units are translated into U.S. Dollars. A strengthening of
the U.S. Dollar against other major foreign currencies could adversely affect our results of operations.
In our commercial aerospace businesses, the majority of our sales are, consistent with established industry practice, transacted in
U.S. Dollars, while the majority of costs at locations outside the U.S. are incurred in the applicable local currency (principally the
Euro, the Canadian Dollar, the British Pound, and the Polish Zloty). For operating units with U.S. Dollar sales and local currency
costs, there is foreign currency exposure that could impact our results of operations depending on market changes in the exchange
rate of the U.S. Dollar against the applicable foreign currencies. In particular, Pratt & Whitney Canada is especially susceptible to
fluctuations in exchange rates for this reason. To manage certain exposures, we employ long-term hedging strategies associated
with U.S. Dollar sales.
Our international sales and operations are subject to risks associated with local government laws, regulations and policies,
including those related to tariffs and trade barriers, investments, taxation, exchange controls, capital controls, employment
regulations, and cash repatriation. Government policies on international trade and investments such as import quotas, capital
controls, taxes or tariffs, whether adopted by individual governments or regional trade blocs, can affect demand for our products
and services, impact the competitive position of our products or prevent us from being able to manufacture or sell products in
certain countries. The implementation of more restrictive trade policies, including the imposition of tariffs, or the renegotiation of
existing trade agreements by the U.S. or by countries where we sell large quantities of products and services or procure supplies
and other materials incorporated into our products, including in connection with the United Kingdom’s withdrawal from the
European Union, could negatively impact our business, results of operations and financial condition. Ongoing geopolitical
uncertainty and trends such as populism and economic nationalism could negatively impact us. For example, a government’s
adoption of “buy national” policies or retaliation by another government against such policies, such as tariffs, could have a negative
impact on our results of operations.
Our international sales and operations are also sensitive to changes in foreign national priorities, including government budgets, as
well as to regional and local political and economic factors, including volatility in energy prices, changes in threat environments
and geopolitical uncertainties, and changes in U.S. foreign policy. International transactions may involve increased financial and
legal risks due to differing legal systems and customs and contract laws and regulations, and include contractual terms that differ
from those of similar contracts in the U.S. or that may be interpreted differently in foreign countries.
As discussed more fully below, our international sales also require us to comply with U.S. laws, regulations and policies, including
the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR), the Export Administration Regulations (EAR), the Foreign Corrupt Practices
Act (FCPA), and other anti-corruption, sanctions, and export laws and regulations. In addition, in certain foreign countries, our
businesses engage non-employee sales representatives. From time to time, we have disputes with such representatives regarding
claimed commissions and other matters which can result in litigation or arbitration if not resolved amicably.
We conduct business in certain countries primarily for our commercial aerospace businesses including Argentina, Brazil, China,
India, Indonesia, Mexico, Morocco, Poland, Russia, South Africa, Turkey, Ukraine and countries in the Middle East and Central
Asia, that carry high levels of currency, political, compliance and economic risk. We expect that sales to these and other emerging
market customers will continue to account for a significant portion of our commercial aerospace sales in the long term as our
businesses evolve and as these and other developing nations and regions around the world increase their demand for our products,
particularly our aerospace products. Operations in emerging market countries can present many risks, including cultural differences
(such as employment and business practices), volatility in gross domestic product, economic and government instability
(particularly in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia and other Middle East countries), the imposition of exchange and capital controls, and
the risks associated with exporting components manufactured in those countries for incorporation into finished products completed
in other countries. While these factors and their impact are difficult to predict, any one or more of them could have a material
adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or
16
Table of Contents
financial condition. Of note, in 2019 the U.S. government suspended Turkey’s participation in the F-35 Joint Strike Fighter
program because Turkey accepted delivery of the Russian-built S-400 air and missile defense system. The U.S. has imposed, and
may impose additional, sanctions on Turkey as a result of this or other political disputes. Turkish companies supply components,
some of which are sole-sourced, to our aerospace businesses for commercial and military engines and aerospace products, as well
as to our defense businesses. Depending upon the scope and timing of U.S. sanctions on Turkey and potential reciprocal actions, if
any, such sanctions or actions could impact our sources of supply and could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, cash flows or financial condition. In addition, in October 2020, the People’s Republic of China (China) announced that
it may sanction RTC in connection with a possible Foreign Military Sale to Taiwan of six MS-110 Reconnaissance Pods and related
equipment manufactured by Collins Aerospace. Foreign Military Sales are government-to-government transactions that are initiated
by, and carried out at the direction of, the U.S. government. To date, the Chinese government has not imposed sanctions on RTC or
indicated the nature or timing of any future potential sanctions or other actions. If China were to impose sanctions or take other
regulatory action against RTC, our suppliers, teammates or partners, it could potentially disrupt our business operations. The impact
of potential sanctions or other actions by China cannot be determined at this time. From time to time, our businesses have sold, and
are expected to sell in the future additional defense products to Taiwan and we are unable to determine the potential impact, if any,
of any future sanctions or other actions by China in response to these sales.
Our international business faces substantial competition from both U.S. companies and foreign companies. In some instances,
foreign companies may be owned by foreign governments or may receive loans, marketing subsidies and other assistance from
their governments that may not be available to U.S. companies or our foreign subsidiaries. In addition, foreign companies may be
subject to fewer restrictions on technology transfer than U.S. companies.
Our international contracts, particularly for sales of defense products and services, may include industrial cooperation agreements
requiring specific local purchases, manufacturing agreements, technology transfer agreements or financial support obligations,
sometimes in the form of either offset obligations or in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements. Approvals of offset or
ICIP thresholds and requirements may be subjective and time-consuming and may delay contract awards. Offset requirements may,
in certain countries, include the creation of a joint venture with a local company that may control the venture. In addition, certain
customers’ demands are increasing for greater offset or ICIP commitment levels, higher-value content, including the transfer of
technologies and capabilities, and local production and economic development.
Our use of and association with third-party foreign representatives and consultants for international sales, and teaming with
international subcontractors, partners and suppliers in connection with international programs exposes us to various challenges
including risks associated with the FCPA and local antibribery laws and regulations. As a result of the above factors, we could
experience financial penalties and award and funding delays on international programs, our profitability on these programs could be
negatively affected, and we could incur losses on these programs that could negatively impact our results of operations, financial
condition and liquidity.
Our Financial Performance Is Dependent on the Condition of the Aerospace Industry.
Our aerospace businesses constitute a substantial portion of our financial results, and the performance of those businesses is
directly tied to the economic conditions in the commercial aerospace industry, which is cyclical in nature. Capital spending and
demand for aircraft engines, aerospace products and component aftermarket parts and services by commercial airlines, aircraft
operators and aircraft manufacturers are influenced by a wide variety of factors, including current and predicted traffic levels, load
factors, aircraft fuel prices, labor issues, airline profits, airline consolidation, bankruptcies, competition, the retirement of older
aircraft, regulatory changes, terrorism and related safety concerns, general economic conditions, corporate profitability, cost
reduction efforts and remaining performance obligations levels. In particular, tightening of credit in financial markets could
adversely affect the ability of our customers and suppliers to obtain financing for significant purchases and operations, could result
in a decrease in or cancellation of orders for our products and services, and could impact the ability of our customers to make
payments. Similarly, such tightening of credit may adversely affect our supplier base and increase the potential for one or more of
our suppliers to experience financial distress or bankruptcy. Any of these factors could reduce the sales and margins of our
aerospace businesses. Other factors, including future terrorist actions, aviation safety concerns, pandemic health issues or major
natural disasters, could also dramatically reduce the demand for commercial air travel, which could negatively impact the sales and
margins of our aerospace businesses. For example, the COVID-19 pandemic has impacted, and continues to impact, our business,
as described above.
Additionally, because a substantial portion of product deliveries to commercial aerospace customers are scheduled for delivery in
2021 and beyond, changes in economic conditions may cause customers to request that firm orders be rescheduled or canceled. At
times, our aerospace businesses also enter into firm fixed-price or cost-share development contracts, which may require us to bear
cost overruns related to unforeseen technical and design challenges that arise during the development and early production stages of
the program. In addition, our aerospace businesses face intense competition from domestic and
17
Table of Contents
foreign manufacturers of new equipment, and approved non-OEM aftermarket spare parts and repairs. Spare parts sales and
aftermarket service trends are affected by similar factors, including usage, pricing, technological improvements, regulatory changes
and the retirement of older aircraft. Furthermore, because of the lengthy research and development cycle involved in bringing
products in these business segments to market, we cannot predict the economic conditions that will exist when any new product is
ready to enter into service. A reduction in spending in the commercial aviation industry could have a significant effect on the
demand for our products, which could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows
or financial condition.
We Design, Manufacture and Service Products that Incorporate Advanced Technologies; The Introduction of New Products and
Technologies Involves Risks and We May Not Realize the Degree or Timing of Benefits Initially Anticipated; Competition May
Reduce Our Revenues and Segment Share and Limit Our Future Opportunities.
We seek to achieve growth through the design, development, production, sale and support of innovative commercial aerospace and
defense systems and products that incorporate advanced technologies. The product, program and service needs of our customers
change and evolve regularly, and we invest substantial amounts in research and development efforts to pursue advancements in a
wide range of technologies, products and services.
Of particular note, Pratt & Whitney is currently producing and delivering the PW1000G Geared Turbofan engine to power various
aircraft, including the A320neo family of aircraft. The level of orders received for the Geared Turbofan family of engines, coupled
with a requirement to achieve mature production levels in a very short time frame, require significant additional manufacturing and
supply chain capacity. If any of our production ramp-up efforts are delayed, if suppliers cannot timely deliver or perform to our
standards, and/or if we identify or experience issues with in-service engines, we may not meet customers’ delivery schedules,
which could result in material additional costs, including liquidated damages or other liabilities that could be assessed under
existing contracts.
Our ability to realize the anticipated benefits of our technological advancements depends on a variety of factors, including meeting
development, production, certification and regulatory approval schedules; receiving regulatory approvals; execution of internal and
external performance plans; availability of supplier and internally produced parts and materials; performance of suppliers and
subcontractors; availability of supplier and internal facility capacity to perform maintenance, repair and overhaul services on our
products; hiring and training of qualified personnel; achieving cost and production efficiencies; identification of emerging
technological trends for our target end-customers; validation of innovative technologies; risks associated with the development of
complex software; the level of customer interest in new technologies and products; and customer acceptance of products we
manufacture or that incorporate technologies we develop. For example, our customers manufacture end products and larger
aerospace systems that incorporate certain of our aerospace products. These systems and end products may also incorporate
additional technologies manufactured by third parties and involve additional risks and uncertainties. As a result, the performance
and industry acceptance of these larger systems and end products could affect the level of customer interest in and acceptance of
our products in the marketplace.
In addition, many of our products must adhere to strict regulatory and market-driven safety and performance standards in a variety
of jurisdictions. The evolving nature of these standards, along with the long duration of development, production and support
programs, creates uncertainty regarding program profitability, particularly with our aircraft engine products.
Development efforts divert resources from other potential investments in our businesses, and these efforts may not lead to the
development of new technologies or products on a timely basis or meet the needs of our customers as fully as competitive
offerings. In addition, the industries for our products or products that incorporate our technologies may not develop or grow as we
anticipate. We or our customers, suppliers or subcontractors may encounter difficulties in developing and producing new products
and services, and may not realize the degree or timing of benefits initially anticipated or may otherwise suffer significant adverse
financial consequences. Due to the design complexity of our products or those of our customers or third party manufacturers that
incorporate our products into theirs or our customers’ products, we may experience delays in completing the development and
introduction of new products or we may experience the suspension of production after these products enter into service due to
safety concerns. Delays and/or suspension of production could result in increased development costs or deflect resources from other
projects. In particular, we cannot predict with certainty whether, when and in what quantities our aerospace businesses will produce
and sell aircraft engines, aircraft systems and components, and other products currently in development, pending required
certifications or after entry into service.
We operate in highly competitive industries and our competitors may have more extensive or more specialized engineering,
manufacturing, marketing and servicing capabilities than we do. Our contracts are typically awarded on a competitive basis. Our
bids are based upon, among other items, the cost to provide the products and services. To generate an acceptable return on our
investment in these contracts, we must be able to accurately estimate our costs to provide the services and deliver the products and
to be able to complete the contracts in a timely manner. If we fail to accurately estimate our costs or the time required to complete a
contract, the profitability of our contracts may be materially and adversely affected. Some of our
18
Table of Contents
contracts provide for liquidated damages in the event that we are unable to perform and deliver in accordance with the contractual
specifications and schedule. In addition, we may face customer-directed cost reduction targets that could have a material adverse
effect on the profitability of our contracts if these targets are not achieved when required. Moreover, we have seen highly
competitive pricing, in which a bidder may anticipate making a substantial investment in a program in order to win the work. In
addition, with respect to DoD awards in particular, bid protests from unsuccessful bidders on new program awards are frequent.
Generally, a bid protest will delay the start of contract activities, delay earnings, and could result in the award decision being
overturned and require a re-bid of the contract. Highly competitive activity within the commercial aerospace industry has included
substantial discounts and other financial incentives, performance and operating cost guarantees, and participation in financing
arrangements, in order to secure both new engine business and the aftermarket revenues associated with these products.
Furthermore, our competitors, including our customers, may develop competing technologies which gain industry acceptance in
advance of or instead of our products. The possibility also exists that our competitors or customers might develop new technologies
or offerings that might cause our existing technologies and offerings to become obsolete and cause disruption to our business. In
addition, the possibility exists that competitors or customers will develop aftermarket services and aftermarket parts for our
products that attract customers and adversely impact our return on investment on new products. We also anticipate companies
continuing to enhance their competitive position against our defense businesses as a result of continued domestic and cross-border
defense industry consolidation and the expansion of competitors’ capabilities throughout the supply chain through vertical
integration. We are also facing heightened competition domestically and internationally from foreign and multinational firms.
Additionally, some customers, including the DoD, are increasingly turning to commercial contractors, rather than traditional
defense contractors, for information technology and other support work. If we are unable to continue to compete successfully
against our current or future competitors in our core businesses, we may experience declines in revenues and industry segment
share.
Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or financial
condition.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
We Use a Variety of Raw Materials, Supplier-Provided Parts, Components, Sub-Systems and Contract Manufacturing Services
in Our Businesses, and Significant Shortages, Supplier Capacity Constraints, Supplier Production Disruptions or Price
Increases Could Increase Our Operating Costs and Adversely Impact the Competitive Positions of Our Products.
Our reliance on U.S. and non-U.S. suppliers (including third-party manufacturing suppliers, subcontractors and service providers)
and commodity markets to secure raw materials, parts, components and sub-systems used in our products exposes us to volatility in
the prices and availability of these materials and services. In many instances, we depend upon a single source of supply,
manufacturing, services support or assembly, or participate in commodity markets that may be subject to allocations of limited
supplies by suppliers. Our defense businesses are subject to specific procurement requirements that limit the types of materials they
use, which may further limit the suppliers and subcontractors they may utilize. They also must require suppliers to comply with
various DoD cybersecurity requirements. A disruption in deliveries from our suppliers, supplier capacity constraints, supplier
production disruptions, supplier quality issues (such as issues with defects or fraudulent parts), closing, bankruptcy or financial
difficulties of our suppliers, price increases, or decreased availability of raw materials or commodities, including as a result of war,
natural disaster, health pandemic or other business continuity events, could have a material adverse effect on our ability to meet our
commitments to customers or increase our operating costs. We believe that our supply management and production practices are
based on an appropriate balancing of the foreseeable risks and the costs of alternative practices. Nonetheless, price increases,
supplier capacity constraints, supplier production disruptions or the unavailability of some raw materials may have a material
adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition. For example, the COVID-19
pandemic has impacted, and continues to impact, our supply chain, as described above.
Exports and Imports of Certain of Our Products Are Subject to Various Export Control, Sanctions and Import Regulations and
May Require Authorization From the U.S. Department of State, the U.S. Department of Commerce, the U.S. Department of the
Treasury, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, the U.S. Department of Justice or Regulatory Agencies of Other
Countries.
We must comply with various laws and regulations relating to the export and import of products, services and technology from and
into the U.S. and other countries having jurisdiction over our operations. In the U.S., these laws and regulations include, among
others, the EAR administered by the U.S. Department of Commerce, the ITAR administered by the U.S. Department of State,
embargoes and sanctions regulations administered by the U.S. Department of the Treasury, and import regulations administered by
the U.S. Department of Homeland Security and the U.S. Department of Justice. Certain of our products, services and technologies
have military or strategic applications and are on the U.S. Munitions List of the ITAR and the
19
Table of Contents
Commerce Control List of the EAR or are otherwise subject to the EAR, or on the U.S. Munitions Import List and we are required
to obtain licenses and authorizations from the cognizant U.S. government agencies before selling these products outside of the U.S.
or importing these products into the U.S. U.S. foreign policy or foreign policy of other licensing jurisdictions may affect the
licensing process or otherwise prevent us from engaging in business dealings with certain individuals, entities or countries. Any
failure by us, our customers or our suppliers to comply with these laws and regulations could result in civil or criminal penalties,
fines, seizure of our products, adverse publicity, restrictions on our ability to export or import our products, or the suspension or
debarment from doing business with the U.S. government. Moreover, any changes in export control, sanctions or import regulations
may further restrict the export of our products or services, and the possibility of such changes requires constant monitoring to
ensure we remain compliant. Our ability to obtain required licenses and authorizations on a timely basis or at all is subject to risks
and uncertainties, including changing U.S. government foreign policies or laws, delays in Congressional action, or geopolitical and
other factors. If we are not successful in obtaining or maintaining the necessary licenses or authorizations in a timely manner, our
sales relating to those approvals may be prevented or delayed, and revenue and profit previously recognized may be reversed. Any
restrictions on the export or import of our products or product lines could have a material adverse effect on our competitive
position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition.
Our Products Must Meet or Exceed Stringent Performance and Reliability Standards.
Our products and services involve advanced technologies in highly sophisticated products. The impact of a catastrophic product
failure or similar event, particularly in our commercial aerospace business, could be significant. Actual or perceived design or
production issues can result in significant reputational harm to our business, in addition to direct warranty, maintenance and other
costs that may arise. A significant product issue resulting in injuries or death, aircraft grounding or similar systemic consequences
could have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial position and results of operations. We may also incur
increased costs, delayed payments or lost equipment or services revenue in connection with a significant issue with a third party’s
product with which our products are integrated. There can be no assurance that we or our customers or other third parties will not
experience operational process or product failures and other problems, including through manufacturing or design defects, process
or other failures of contractors or third-party suppliers, cyber-attacks or other intentional acts, any of which could result in potential
product, safety, quality, regulatory or environmental risks. If our products do not perform as intended, including with respect to
safety or reliability, the possible consequences include product recalls and product liability claims, significant financial losses,
including fines, as well as a diversion of management attention and reputational damage that could reduce demand for our products
and services. Further, our insurance coverage may not be adequate to cover all related costs and we may not otherwise be fully
indemnified for them.
We Depend On the Recruitment and Retention of Qualified Personnel, and Our Failure to Attract, Train and Retain Such
Personnel and to Maintain our Corporate Culture and High Ethical Standards Could Seriously Harm Our Business.
Due to the specialized nature of our business, our future performance is highly dependent upon the continued services of our key
technical personnel and executive officers, the development of additional management personnel, and the hiring of new qualified
technical, manufacturing, marketing, sales and management personnel for our operations. Our defense business in particular
requires qualified personnel with security clearances due to our classified programs. Competition for personnel is intense and we
may not be successful in attracting, training or retaining qualified personnel with the requisite skills or security clearances. In
addition, certain existing personnel may be required to receive various security clearances and substantial training in order to work
on certain programs or perform certain tasks. Necessary security clearances may be delayed, which may impact our ability to
perform on our U.S. government contracts. Further, we have experienced and may continue to experience personnel reductions as a
result of the COVID-19 pandemic’s impact on our business and a significant percentage of our current workforce is nearing or
eligible for retirement. To the extent that we lose experienced personnel, it is critical that we develop other employees, hire new
qualified personnel and successfully manage the transfer of critical knowledge. In addition, new qualified personnel may have
different expectations from our current workforce, which could result in difficulties attracting and retaining new employees. Loss of
key employees, failure to attract new qualified employees or adequately train them, delays in receiving required security clearances,
or delays in hiring key personnel could seriously harm our business.
We believe that a critical element of our ability to successfully attract, train and retain qualified personnel is our corporate culture,
which we believe fosters innovation, collaboration and a focus on execution, all in an environment of high ethical standards. Our
global operations may present challenges in maintaining these important aspects of our corporate culture. Any failure to maintain
our corporate culture could negatively impact our ability to attract, train and retain essential qualified personnel who are vital to our
business. Further, we rely on our key personnel to lead with integrity and to meet our high ethical standards that promote excellent
performance and cultivate diversity, equity and inclusion. To the extent any of our key personnel were to behave in a way that is
inconsistent with our values, including with respect to product safety or quality, legal or regulatory compliance, financial reporting
or people management, we could experience a materially adverse impact to our reputation and our operating results.
20
Table of Contents
Our Business and Financial Performance May Be Adversely Affected By Cyber-attacks on Information Technology
Infrastructure and Products
Our business may be impacted by disruptions to our own or third-party information technology (IT) infrastructure, which could
result from, among other causes, cyber-attacks on or failures of such infrastructure or compromises to its physical security. We also
encounter attempts to infiltrate our products and services and sabotage or disable their use by our customers.
Cybersecurity threats are evolving and include, but are not limited to, both attacks on our IT infrastructure and attacks on the IT
infrastructure of our customers, suppliers, subcontractors and other third parties with whom we do business routinely, both on
premises and in the cloud, attempting to gain unauthorized access to our confidential or other proprietary information, classified
information, or information relating to our employees, customers and other third parties, or to disrupt our systems or the systems of
third parties. Cybersecurity threats also include attacks targeting the security, integrity and/or availability of the hardware, software
and information installed, stored or transmitted in our products, including after the purchase of those products and when they are
incorporated into third-party products, facilities or infrastructure, and insider threat attacks. Such attacks could disrupt our systems
or those of third parties (including mission critical systems), impact business operations, result in unauthorized release of
confidential or otherwise protected information, and corrupt our data or that of third parties. We have experienced cyber-based
attacks, and due to the evolving threat landscape, may continue to experience them going forward, potentially with more frequency.
The threats we face vary from attacks common to most industries to more advanced and persistent, highly organized adversaries,
including nation states, which target us and other defense contractors. We continue to make investments and adopt measures
designed to enhance our protection, detection, response, and recovery capabilities, and to mitigate potential risks to our technology,
products, services and operations from potential cybersecurity threats. However, given the unpredictability, nature and scope of
cyber-attacks, it is possible that we are unable to prevent cyber attacks, that potential vulnerabilities could go undetected for an
extended period, that we may be unsuccessful in defending an attack against those vulnerabilities, or that we may otherwise be
unable to mitigate customer losses and other potential consequences of these attacks. In addition, some products and services that
we provide to customers, particularly those related to public security, may raise potential liabilities related to privacy and
intellectual property. In some cases we must rely on the safeguards put in place by our customers, suppliers, subcontractors and
other third parties to protect against and report cyber threats. We could potentially be subject to production downtimes, operational
delays, other detrimental impacts on our operations or ability to provide products and services to our customers, the compromise of
confidential information, intellectual property or otherwise protected information, misappropriation, destruction or corruption of
data, security breaches, other manipulation or improper use of our or third-party systems, networks or products, financial losses
from remedial actions, loss of business, or potential liability, penalties, fines and/or damage to our reputation, any of which could
have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition. Some of these
risks may be heightened due to the Company and its suppliers and other third parties operating with a significant number of
employees working remotely. Due to the evolving nature of such risks, the impact of any potential incident cannot be predicted.
Further, our insurance coverage may not be adequate to cover all related costs and we may not otherwise be fully indemnified for
them.
Our Business and Financial Performance May Be Adversely Affected By Threats to Our Physical Security and Other Events
Outside Our Control
We could encounter threats to our physical security, including our facilities and personnel, and threats from terrorism, workplace
violence or similar acts, any of which could disrupt our business. In addition, our business, and the businesses of our suppliers,
subcontractors and service providers and customers, could be disrupted by public health crises, such as pandemics and epidemics,
damaging weather or other acts of nature, or other events outside of our control. Our business may also be impacted by cyber-
attacks on IT infrastructure and products, as discussed above. In addition, our business has been, and continues to be, impacted by
the COVID-19 pandemic, as discussed above. Any such business disruption could subject us to production downtimes, operational
delays, other detrimental impacts on our operations or ability to provide products and services to our customers, financial losses
from remedial actions, the diversion of management’s attention and resources, or loss of business, any of which could have a
material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition. The impact of any such
business disruption is difficult to predict.
We Depend On Our Intellectual Property, and Have Access to Certain Intellectual Property and Information of Our Customers
and Suppliers; Infringement or Failure to Protect Our Intellectual Property Could Adversely Affect Our Future Growth and
Success.
We rely on a combination of patents, trademarks, copyrights, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements, IT security systems, internal
controls and compliance systems and other measures to protect our intellectual property. We also rely on nondisclosure agreements,
confidentiality obligations in contracts, IT security systems and other measures to protect certain customer and supplier information
and intellectual property that we have in our possession or to which we have access. The U.S. government and foreign governments
have licenses under certain of our intellectual property, including certain patents, which are developed
21
Table of Contents
or used in performance of government contracts. Governments may use or authorize others (including our competitors) to use such
patents and intellectual property for government and other purposes. Governments may challenge the sufficiency of intellectual
property rights we have granted in government contracts and attempt to obtain greater rights, which could reduce our ability to
protect our intellectual property rights and to compete. In some instances, we have augmented our technology base by licensing the
proprietary intellectual property of others. Intellectual property obtained from third parties is also subject to challenge, invalidation,
misappropriation or circumvention by third parties. In addition, we may not be able to obtain necessary licenses on commercially
reasonable terms. In other instances, our ability to procure and perform government contracts requires us to obtain certain rights in
the intellectual property of others through government grants. Governments may deny us the right to obtain such rights in the
intellectual property of others, which may affect our ability to perform government contracts.
Our efforts to protect intellectual property and proprietary rights may not be sufficient. We cannot be sure that our pending patent
applications will result in the issuance of patents to us, that patents issued to or licensed by us in the past or in the future will not be
challenged or circumvented by competitors, or that these patents will be found to be valid or sufficiently broad to preclude our
competitors from introducing technologies similar to those covered by our patents and patent applications. Our ability to protect
and enforce our intellectual property rights may be limited in certain countries outside the U.S. In addition, we may be the target of
competitor or other third-party patent enforcement actions seeking substantial monetary damages or seeking to prevent our sale and
marketing of certain of our products or services. Our competitive position also may be adversely impacted by limitations on our
ability to obtain possession of, and ownership of necessary licenses concerning, data important to the development or provision of
our products or service offerings, or by limitations on our ability to restrict the use by others of data related to our products or
services. We may also be subject to disruptions, losses and liability resulting from various cybersecurity attacks or information
technology failures, as described above. Any of these events or factors could have a material adverse effect on our competitive
position, subject us to judgments, penalties and significant litigation costs, or temporarily or permanently disrupt our sales and
marketing of the affected products or services. Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on our competitive
position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition.
LEGAL, ENVIRONMENTAL AND REGULATORY COMPLIANCE RISKS
As a U.S. Government Contractor, We are Subject to Risks Relating to U.S. Government Audits, Investigations, and Disputes.
We are subject to U.S. government investigations relating to our U.S. government contracts. Such U.S. government investigations
often take years to complete and could result in administrative, civil or criminal liabilities, including repayments, fines, treble and
other damages, forfeitures, restitution or penalties, or could lead to suspension or debarment of U.S. government contracting or of
export privileges. For instance, if we or one of our business units were charged with wrongdoing in connection with a U.S.
government investigation (including fraud, or violation of certain environmental or export laws, as further described below), the
U.S. government could suspend us from bidding on or receiving awards of new U.S. government contracts pending the completion
of legal proceedings. If convicted or found liable, the U.S. government could fine and debar us from new U.S. government
contracting for a period generally not to exceed three years and could void any contracts found to be tainted by fraud. We also
could suffer reputational harm if allegations of impropriety were made against us, even if such allegations are later determined to
be unsubstantiated.
Further, our U.S. government contracts are subject to audit and we have received audit reports recommending the reduction of
certain contract prices because, for example, cost or pricing data disclosures or cost accounting practices used to price and negotiate
those contracts may not have conformed to government regulations. Some of these audit reports recommend that certain payments
be repaid, delayed, or withheld, and may involve substantial amounts, which could, if the audit reports’ theories were to prevail in
litigation, also have future impacts such as increasing the costs absorbed by our commercial businesses. We have made voluntary
refunds in those cases we believe appropriate, have settled some allegations and, in some cases, continue to negotiate and/or
litigate. We may be, and have been, required to make payments into escrow of disputed liabilities while the related litigation is
pending. If the litigation is resolved in our favor, any such payments will be returned to us with interest. The Defense Contract
Audit Agency (DCAA) and the Defense Contract Management Agency (DCMA) also review the adequacy of and our compliance
with our internal control systems and policies, including our accounting, purchasing, government property, estimating, earned value
management and material management accounting systems. Our final allowable incurred costs for each year are subject to audit
and have from time to time resulted in disputes between us and the U.S. government, including DCMA claims to recover payments
for alleged noncompliance with cost accounting standards. In some cases, the Department of Justice (DOJ) has convened grand
juries to investigate possible irregularities in our costs. Any costs found to be improperly allocated to a specific contract will not be
reimbursed or must be refunded if already reimbursed. An adverse outcome of any audit or investigation could result in civil and
criminal penalties and fines, which could negatively impact our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity. In addition,
if allegations of impropriety were made against
22
Table of Contents
us, we could suffer serious reputational harm, which could negatively affect our financial position, results of operations and
liquidity.
We Are Subject to Litigation, Environmental, Product Safety and Reliability, Anti-Corruption and Other Legal and Compliance
Risks.
We are subject to a variety of litigation and legal compliance risks. These risks relate to, among other things, product safety and
reliability, personal injuries, intellectual property rights, contract-related claims, government contracts, taxes, environmental
matters, export control, employment matters, competition laws and laws governing improper business practices. We or one of our
businesses could be charged with wrongdoing as a result of such matters. If convicted or found liable, we could be subject to
significant fines, penalties, repayments, or other damages (in certain cases, treble damages). As discussed above, product recalls
and product liability and warranty claims (including claims related to the safety or reliability of our products) also can result in
significant damages and costs, including fines, as well as negative publicity, a diversion of management attention and damage to
our reputation that could reduce demand for our products and services. As a global business, we are subject to complex laws and
regulations in the U.S. and in other countries in which we operate. Those laws and regulations may be interpreted in different ways.
They may also change from time to time, as may related interpretations and other guidance. Changes in laws or regulations could
result in higher expenses. Uncertainty relating to laws or regulations may also affect how we conduct our operations and structure
our investments and could limit our ability to enforce our rights. Changes in environmental and climate change laws or regulations,
including laws relating to greenhouse gas emissions, could lead to new or additional investment in product designs and could
increase environmental compliance expenditures, including increased energy and raw materials costs. Climate-related events also
could disrupt our businesses and require us to incur additional costs.
We use hazardous substances and generate hazardous wastes in our operations. As a result, we are subject to potentially material
liabilities related to personal injuries or property damage that may be caused by hazardous substance releases and exposures.
Personal injury lawsuits may involve individual and purported class actions alleging that contaminants originating from our current
or former products or operating facilities caused or contributed to medical conditions, including cancers incurred by employees,
former employees, third-parties’ employees or residents in the area, and environmental damage or diminution of real estate values.
For example, we are investigating and remediating contamination related to past practices at a number of properties and, in some
cases, have in the past been named as a defendant in related “toxic tort” claims. We are also subject to laws and regulations that: (1)
impose requirements for the proper management, treatment, storage and disposal of hazardous substances and wastes; (2) restrict
air and water emissions from our operations (including U.S. government-owned facilities we manage); and (3) require maintenance
of a safe workplace. These laws and regulations can lead to substantial fines and criminal sanctions for violations, and may require
the installation of costly equipment or operational changes to limit pollution emissions, decrease the likelihood of accidental
hazardous substance releases, and/or reduce the risks of injury to people. We incur, and expect to continue to incur, capital and
other expenditures to comply with these laws and regulations. A criminal violation of certain U.S. environmental statutes such as
the Clean Air Act and Clean Water Act could result in suspension, debarment or disqualification by the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency (EPA). A facility determined to be in violation of the criminal provisions of these statutes can be prohibited from
performing any U.S. government contract work until the violation has been corrected and the EPA approves the reinstatement of the
facility. Even in litigation where we believe our liability is remote, there is a risk that a negative finding or decision in a matter
involving multiple plaintiffs or a purported class action could have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of
operations, cash flows or financial condition, in particular with respect to environmental claims in regions where we have, or
previously had, significant operations. In addition, new laws, regulations, or governmental policies, sudden changes in the
interpretation and enforcement of existing laws and regulations, the discovery of previously unknown contamination, or the
imposition of new clean-up standards could require us to incur additional costs in the future that would have a negative effect on
our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity.
In addition, the FCPA and other anti-bribery and -corruption laws generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from
making improper payments to U.S. and non-U.S. officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. These laws apply to
companies, individual directors, officers, employees and agents. U.S. companies also may be held liable for actions taken by
strategic or local partners or representatives. The FCPA also imposes accounting standards and requirements on publicly traded
U.S. corporations and their foreign affiliates, which are intended to prevent the diversion of corporate funds to the payment of
bribes and other improper payments. Certain of our customer relationships outside of the U.S. are with governmental entities and
are therefore subject to the FCPA and other anti-bribery and -corruption laws, including the anti-bribery and -corruption laws of
non-U.S. countries. Our policies mandate compliance with these anti-bribery and -corruption laws. Despite meaningful measures
that we undertake to ensure lawful conduct, which include training and internal control policies, these measures may not always
prevent violations of the FCPA or similar laws. We have been subject to regulatory investigations for alleged violations of anti-
bribery and -corruption laws, and could be subject to such investigations in the future, which could result in criminal and civil
penalties, disgorgement, further changes or enhancements to our procedures, policies and controls, personnel changes or other
remedial actions. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could disrupt our operations, cause
23
Table of Contents
reputational harm, involve significant management attention and result in a material adverse effect on our competitive position,
results of operations, cash flows or financial condition.
Cybersecurity and data privacy and protection laws and regulations are evolving and present increasing compliance challenges,
which may increase our costs, affect our competitiveness, cause reputational harm, and expose us to substantial fines or other
penalties.
ACCOUNTING, TAX AND INSURANCE RELATED RISKS
We Use Estimates in Accounting For Many of Our Programs, and Changes in our Estimates Could Adversely Affect Our Future
Financial Results.
Accounting for long-term contracts and related assets requires estimates and judgments related to our progress toward completion
and the long-term performance on the contract. Significant judgments include potential risks associated with the ability and cost to
achieve program schedule, including customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, and technical and other
specific contract requirements including customer activity levels and variable consideration based upon that activity. Due to the size
and long-term nature of many of our contracts, the estimation of total revenues and cost at completion is complicated and subject to
many variables. Management must make assumptions and estimates regarding contract revenue and cost (such as estimates of
variable consideration, including award fees and penalties), including with respect to: (1) labor productivity and availability; (2) the
complexity and scope of the work to be performed; (3) the availability and cost of materials; (4) the length of time to complete the
performance obligation; (5) execution by our subcontractors; (6) the availability and timing of funding from our customer; (7)
overhead cost rates; and (8) current and past service cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and
estimated useful lives of components, among other variables. Because of the significance of management’s judgments and
estimation processes described above, it is likely that materially different amounts could be recorded if we used different
assumptions or if the underlying circumstances were to change. Changes in underlying assumptions, circumstances or estimates
may adversely affect our future results of operations and financial condition.
Significant Changes in Key Estimates and Assumptions, Such as Discount Rates and Assumed Long-term Return on Plan
Assets (ROA), as well as Our Actual Investment Returns on Our Pension Plan Assets and Other Actuarial Factors, Could Affect
Our Earnings, Equity and Pension Contributions in Future Periods.
We must determine our pension and other postretirement benefit (PRB) plans’ expense or income, which involves significant
judgment particularly with respect to our discount rate, long-term ROA and other actuarial assumptions. The discount rate
assumption is set annually and we determine on an annual basis whether it is appropriate to change our long-term ROA assumption.
These assumptions and other actuarial assumptions may change significantly due to changes in economic, legislative, and/or
demographic experience or circumstances. Changes in our assumptions could result in negative changes to our pension and PRB
plans’ expense and funded status, and our cash contributions to such plans, which would negatively impact our results of
operations. In addition, differences between our actual investment returns and our long-term ROA assumption would result in a
change to our pension and PRB plans’ expense and funded status and our required contributions to the plans. Our plan assets are
invested in accordance with our investment management objectives and are subject to market volatility and other conditions. The
differences may also be impacted by changes in regulatory, accounting and other requirements applicable to pensions.
Additional Tax Expense or Additional Tax Exposures Could Affect Our Future Profitability.
We are subject to income taxes in the United States and international jurisdictions. Significant judgment is required in determining
our worldwide provision for income taxes. In the ordinary course of our business, there are transactions and calculations where the
ultimate tax determination is uncertain. Changes in tax laws and regulations, as well as changes and conflicts in related
interpretations and other tax guidance, and fluctuations in taxable income could materially impact our tax receivables and liabilities
and our deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities. Additionally, in the ordinary course of business we are subject to
examinations by various tax authorities. In addition to ongoing examinations, there could be additional examinations launched in
the future by governmental authorities in various jurisdictions, and existing examinations could be expanded. The final
determination of tax audits and any related litigation could be materially different from our historical income tax provisions and
accruals. Additionally, changes in the geographic mix of our sales could impact our tax liabilities and affect our income tax expense
and profitability. The global and diverse nature of our operations means that these risks will continue to exist and additional
examinations, proceedings and contingencies will arise from time to time. Our competitive position, cash flows, results of operation
or financial condition may be affected by the outcome of examinations, proceedings and other contingencies that cannot be
predicted with certainty.
24
Table of Contents
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets Represent a Significant Portion of Our Assets, and Any Impairment of These Assets
Could Negatively Impact Our Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
A significant portion of our assets consists of goodwill and other intangible assets, including amounts added related to the Raytheon
Merger. Our goodwill and indefinite-lived assets are subject to an impairment test annually and are also tested whenever events and
circumstances indicate that goodwill may be impaired. In the event of an impairment any excess of the carrying value of these
assets over the fair value must be written off in the period of determination. Finite-lived intangible assets are generally amortized
over the useful life of such assets. In addition, from time to time, we may acquire or make an investment in a business which will
require us to record goodwill and intangible assets based on the purchase price and the value of the acquired assets. We may
subsequently experience unforeseen events that could adversely affect the value of our goodwill or intangible assets and trigger an
impairment evaluation. Future determinations of significant impairments of goodwill or intangible assets as a result of an
impairment test or any accelerated amortization of other intangible assets could have a negative impact on our results of operations
and financial condition.
We Face Certain Significant Risk Exposures and Potential Liabilities That May Not Be Adequately Covered By Indemnity or
Insurance.
A significant portion of our business relates to designing, developing and manufacturing advanced aerospace, defense and
technology systems and products. New technologies may be untested or unproven. In addition, we may incur significant liabilities
that are unique to our products and services. In some, but not all, circumstances, we may be entitled to indemnification from our
customers through contractual provisions, and we may obtain limitations of liability and additional defenses for various reasons
including the qualification of our products and services by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) under the SAFETY Act
provisions of the Homeland Security Act of 2002. The insurance coverage we maintain or indemnification to which we may be
contractually or otherwise entitled may not be adequate to cover all claims or liabilities. Accordingly, we may be forced to bear
substantial costs resulting from risks and uncertainties of our business, which would negatively impact our results of operations,
financial condition and liquidity. Any accident, failure of, or defect in our products and services, even if fully indemnified or
insured, could negatively affect our reputation among our customers and the public, and make it more difficult for us to compete
effectively. It could also affect the cost and availability of insurance in the future.
STRATEGIC TRANSACTIONS RISKS
We May Be Unable to Realize Expected Benefits From Our Cost Reduction and Restructuring Efforts and Our Profitability
May Be Hurt or Our Business Otherwise Might Be Adversely Affected.
In order to operate more efficiently and control costs, we announce from time to time restructuring plans, which include workforce
reductions, global facility consolidations and other cost reduction initiatives. These plans are intended to generate operating
expense savings through reductions in direct and indirect expenses as well as improved efficiencies. We may undertake further
workforce reductions or restructuring actions in the future. These types of cost reduction and restructuring activities are complex. If
we do not successfully manage our current restructuring activities, or any future restructuring activities, expected efficiencies and
benefits might be delayed or not realized, and our operations and business could be disrupted. Risks associated with these actions
and other workforce management issues include unfavorable political responses to such actions, unforeseen delays in the
implementation of anticipated workforce reductions, additional unexpected costs, adverse effects on employee morale and the
failure to meet operational targets due to the loss of employees or work stoppages, any of which may impair our ability to achieve
anticipated cost reductions, or otherwise harm our business, or have a material adverse effect on our competitive position, results of
operations, cash flows or financial condition.
We May Be Unable to Successfully Integrate the Legacy Businesses of United Technologies Corporation (UTC) and Raytheon
and Realize the Anticipated Benefits of the Raytheon Merger.
The success of the Raytheon Merger will depend, in part, on our ability to successfully combine and integrate UTC and Raytheon
Company’s legacy businesses, and realize the anticipated benefits, including synergies, cost savings, innovation and technological
opportunities (including technology-driven revenue synergies) and operational efficiencies from the Raytheon Merger in a manner
that does not materially disrupt existing customer, supplier and employee relations and does not result in decreased revenues due to
losses of, or decreases in orders by, customers.
The integration of the two companies may result in material challenges, including, without limitation:
•managing a larger, more complex combined aerospace and defense business;
•maintaining employee morale, retaining key management and other employees, and managing corporate culture;
•retaining existing business and operational relationships, including customers, suppliers and employees and other
counterparties, as may be impacted by contracts containing consent and/or other provisions that may be triggered by the
Raytheon Merger, and attracting new business and operational relationships;
25
Table of Contents
•the diversion of management’s attention as a result of devoting attention to matters relating to the Raytheon Merger and/or
the Separation and the Distributions following their consummation;
•consolidating corporate and administrative infrastructures and eliminating duplicative operations, including unanticipated
issues in integrating information technology, communications and other systems; and
•coordinating geographically separate organizations
The impact and extent of these challenges is uncertain and many of them have been exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic. Any
one of them could result in delays, increased costs, decreases in the amount of expected revenues, reduced expected cash
generation, and diversion of management’s time and energy, which could materially affect our financial condition, results of
operations and cash flows.
In addition, as a result of the Separation Transactions and Distributions, we are required to provide transition services to each of
Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis). These services may require significant amounts of
personnel and management time, attention and resources, which could adversely affect our business, financial results and results of
operations during this critical period of our integration.
In addition, we must continue to manage the integration of other companies, assets and businesses, including the integration of
Rockwell Collins, which UTC acquired on November 26, 2018. These ongoing (and future) integrations by each of UTC and
Raytheon may increase the complexity of, and challenges associated with, the integration of UTC and Raytheon Company’s legacy
businesses, which may make it more difficult for us to achieve the anticipated benefits of the Raytheon Merger fully, or within the
anticipated time frame.
The actual integration may result in additional and unforeseen expenses, and the anticipated benefits of the integration plan may not
be realized on a timely basis. While we have assumed that a certain level of expenses would be incurred, many of the expenses that
may be incurred are, by their nature, difficult to estimate accurately, and changes to the estimates could affect the total amount or
timing of integration expenses. These expenses could exceed benefits expected to be realized in connection with the Raytheon
Merger.
We May Not Be Able to Engage in Desirable Capital-Raising or Strategic Transactions.
Under current U.S. federal income tax law, a spin-off that otherwise qualifies for tax-free treatment can be rendered taxable to the
parent corporation and its stockholders as a result of certain post-spin-off transactions, including certain acquisitions of shares or
assets of the parent corporation. To preserve the tax-free treatment of the Distributions, we may be limited in our ability to pursue
certain equity issuances, strategic transactions, repurchases, or other transactions (including the certain dispositions of assets) that
we may otherwise believe to be in the best interests of our stockholders or that might increase the value of our business.
If Either Distribution, Together with Certain Related Transactions, Were to Fail to Qualify as a Transaction that is Generally
Tax-Free, Including as a Result of Subsequent Acquisitions of Our Stock (Including Pursuant to the Raytheon Merger) or the
Stock of Carrier or Otis, We Could Be Subject to Significant Tax Liabilities.
We received (1) a private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) regarding certain U.S. federal income tax matters
relating to the Separation Transactions and Distributions and (2) an opinion of outside counsel regarding the qualification of certain
elements of the Distributions under Section 355 of the Code. Although we intend for the Distributions generally to be tax-free for
U.S. federal income tax purposes, there can be no assurance that they will so qualify. Even if the Distributions were to otherwise
qualify as tax-free transactions under Sections 355 and 368(a)(1)(D) of the Code, either Distribution or both Distributions may
result in taxable gain to us (but not our stockholders) under Section 355(e) of the Code if such Distribution(s) were deemed to be
part of a plan (or series of related transactions) pursuant to which one or more persons acquire, directly or indirectly, shares
representing a 50% or greater interest (by vote or value) in shares of Carrier, Otis, or us, as applicable. If the IRS were to determine
that any post-Distribution acquisitions of Carrier stock, Otis stock, or our stock, as applicable, pursuant to such a plan (when
aggregated with any pre-Distribution acquisitions of Carrier stock, Otis stock, or our stock, as applicable, pursuant to such a plan)
would represent a 50% or greater interest in shares of Carrier, Otis, or us, as applicable, such determination could result in
significant tax liabilities to us. For purposes of this test, even if the Raytheon Merger were treated as part of such plan, it did not
result in an acquisition of a 50% or greater interest in our shares pursuant to a plan. Any such tax liabilities imposed on us may
adversely affect an investment in us.
In addition, with respect to certain Separation Transactions, we obtained tax rulings in certain non-U.S. jurisdictions and/or
opinions of external tax advisors, in each case, regarding the tax treatment of such Separation Transactions. Notwithstanding the
receipt of such tax rulings and opinions, there can be no assurance that the relevant taxing authorities will not assert that the tax
treatment of the relevant Separation Transactions differs from the conclusions reached therein. In the event the relevant taxing
authorities prevail with any challenge in respect of any relevant Separation Transaction, we would be subject to significant tax
liabilities, which may adversely affect an investment in us.
26
Table of Contents
Under a tax matters agreement that we entered into with Carrier and Otis in connection with the Separation Transactions and
Distributions, each of Carrier and Otis generally is required to indemnify us for any taxes we incur resulting from the Separation
Transactions and/or the Distributions to the extent such amounts result from certain disqualifying actions by, or acquisition of
equity securities of, Carrier or Otis, as applicable. Further, under the tax matters agreement, each of Carrier and Otis is generally
required to indemnify us for a specified portion of any taxes we incur (a) arising as a result of the failure of either of the
Distributions and certain related transactions to qualify as a transaction that is generally tax-free or a failure of any Separation
Transaction that is intended to qualify as a transaction that is generally tax-free to so qualify, in each case, to the extent such
amounts did not result from a disqualifying action by, or acquisition of equity securities of, Carrier, Otis, or us or (b) arising from
certain audit or other adjustments to tax liabilities incurred with respect to Separation Transactions that were not intended to qualify
as tax-free. In addition, under the tax matters agreement, each of Carrier and Otis is responsible for (i) a specified portion of any
installment payment we are required to make pursuant to Section 965(h)(2) of the Code and (ii) specified taxes that exclusively
relate to the Carrier business or the Otis business, as applicable. The amount of any such taxes for which we would be responsible
may be significant, and if we were unable to obtain indemnification payments from Carrier or Otis to which we are entitled under
the tax matters agreement and/or other agreements entered into in connection with the Separation Transactions and the
Distributions, we would incur significant losses.
If We Fail to Manage Potential Future Acquisitions, Investments, Divestitures, Joint Ventures and Other Transactions
Successfully, These Activities Could Adversely Affect Our Future Financial Results.
In pursuing our business strategies, we continually review, evaluate and consider potential investments, acquisitions, divestitures,
joint ventures and other teaming and collaborative arrangements. We undertake to identify opportunities that will complement our
existing products and services or customer base, as well as expand our offerings and business opportunities into new areas that
naturally extend from our core capabilities. In evaluating such transactions, we are required to make difficult judgments regarding
the value of business opportunities, technologies and other assets, and the risks and cost of potential liabilities.
Further, these transactions involve certain other risks and uncertainties including: (1) the risks involved with entering new markets;
(2) the difficulty in integrating newly-acquired businesses and managing or monitoring other collaborative business arrangements;
(3) challenges and failures in achieving strategic objectives and other expected benefits, which may result in certain liabilities to us
for guarantees and other commitments; (4) unidentified issues not discovered in the Company’s due diligence; (5) the diversion of
our attention and resources from our operations and other initiatives; (6) the potential impairment of acquired assets; (7) the
performance of underlying products, capabilities or technologies; and (8) the potential loss of key employees and customers of
acquired businesses. In addition, future transactions may impact our deployment of capital, including dividends, stock repurchases,
pension contributions, and investments.
GENERAL RISK
Quarterly Cash Dividends and Share Repurchases Are Subject to a Number of Uncertainties, and May Affect the Price of Our
Common Stock.
Quarterly cash dividends and share repurchases under our share repurchase program generally constitute components of our capital
allocation strategy, which we fund through a combination of operating free cash flow, borrowings and proceeds from divestitures.
However, we are not required to declare dividends or make any share repurchases under our share repurchase program. Dividends
and share repurchases may be discontinued, accelerated, suspended or delayed at any time without prior notice. Even if not
discontinued, the amount of such dividends and repurchases may be changed, and the amount, timing and frequency of such
dividends and repurchases may vary from historical practice or from the company’s stated expectations. Decisions with respect to
dividends and share repurchases are subject to the discretion of our Board of Directors and will be based on a variety of factors.
Important factors that could cause us to discontinue, limit, suspend, increase or delay our quarterly cash dividends or share
repurchases include market conditions, the price of our common stock, the nature and timing of other investment opportunities,
changes in our business strategy, the terms of our financing arrangements, our outlook as to the ability to obtain financing at
attractive rates, the impact on our credit ratings and the availability of domestic cash. The reduction or elimination of our cash
dividend, or longer suspension or elimination of our share repurchase program could adversely affect the market price of our
common stock. Additionally, there can be no assurance that any share repurchases will enhance shareowner value because the
market price of our common stock may decline below the levels at which we repurchased shares of common stock, and short-term
stock price fluctuations could reduce the program’s effectiveness.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
27
Table of Contents
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
We have properties in approximately 30 countries, with approximately 550 significant properties comprising approximately 80
million square feet of productive space. Approximately 55% of our significant properties are leased, and 45% are owned.
Approximately 70% of our significant properties are located in the United States.
Our fixed assets as of December 31, 2020 include manufacturing facilities and non-manufacturing facilities such as warehouses,
laboratories, office space, and a substantial quantity of machinery and equipment, including general purpose machinery and
equipment using special jigs, tools and fixtures and in many instances having automatic control features and special adaptations.
The facilities, warehouses, machinery and equipment in use as of December 31, 2020 are in good operating condition, are well-
maintained and substantially all are generally in regular use.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries and our properties are subject to regulatory and governmental
examinations, information gathering requests, inquiries, investigations and threatened legal actions and proceedings. For example,
we are now, and believe that, in light of the current U.S. government contracting environment, we will continue to be the subject of
one or more U.S. government investigations. Our contracts with the U.S. government are also subject to audits. Agencies that
oversee contract performance include: the Defense Contract Audit Agency (DCAA), the Defense Contract Management Agency
(DCMA), the Inspectors General of the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and other departments and agencies, the Government
Accountability Office (GAO), the Department of Justice (DOJ), and Congressional Committees. Other areas of our business
operations may also be subject to audit and investigation by these and other agencies. From time to time, agencies investigate or
conduct audits to determine whether our operations are being conducted in accordance with applicable requirements. Such
investigations and audits may be initiated due to a number of reasons, including as a result of a whistleblower complaint. Such
investigations and audits could result in administrative, civil or criminal liabilities, including repayments, fines, treble or other
damages, forfeitures, restitution, or penalties being imposed upon us, the suspension of government export licenses or the
suspension or debarment from future U.S. government contracting. U.S. government investigations often take years to complete.
The U.S. government also reserves the right to debar a contractor from receiving new government contracts for fraudulent, criminal
or other seriously improper conduct. The U.S. government could void any contracts found to be tainted by fraud. Like many
defense contractors, we have received audit reports recommending the reduction of certain contract prices because, for example,
cost or pricing data or cost accounting practices used to price and negotiate those contracts may not have conformed to government
regulations. Some of these audit reports recommend that certain payments be repaid, delayed, or withheld, and may involve
substantial amounts. We have made voluntary refunds in those cases we believe appropriate, have settled some allegations and, in
some cases, continue to negotiate and/or litigate. The Company may be, and has been, required to make payments into escrow of
disputed liabilities while the related litigation is pending. If the litigation is resolved in the Company’s favor, any such payments
will be returned to the Company with interest. Our final allowable incurred costs for each year are also subject to audit and have,
from time to time, resulted in disputes between us and the U.S. government, with litigation resulting at the Court of Federal Claims
(COFC) or the Armed Services Board of Contract Appeals (ASBCA) or their related courts of appeals. In addition, the DOJ has,
from time to time, convened grand juries to investigate possible irregularities by us. We also provide products and services to
customers outside of the U.S., and those sales are subject to local government laws, regulations and procurement policies and
practices. Our compliance with such local government regulations or any applicable U.S. government regulations (e.g., the Foreign
Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR)) may also be investigated or audited. Other
than as specifically disclosed in this Form 10-K, we do not expect these audits, investigations or disputes to have a material effect
on our financial position, results of operations or liquidity, either individually or in the aggregate.
737 MAX Aircraft Litigation
Multiple lawsuits have been filed in U.S. courts relating to the October 29, 2018 Lion Air Flight 610 and the March 10, 2019
Ethiopian Airlines Flight 302 accidents. Collins Aerospace sold certain aircraft parts and systems to The Boeing Company for the
737 MAX aircraft involved in these accidents. Certain of our Collins Aerospace businesses have been named, along with other third
parties, as parties in many of these lawsuits. We are also fully supporting all ongoing governmental investigations and inquiries
relating to the accidents. We do not expect that the lawsuits or governmental investigations or inquiries will have a material adverse
effect on our financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In addition, we are subject to a number of other lawsuits, investigations and claims (some of which involve substantial amounts).
For a discussion of contingencies related to certain other legal proceedings, see “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within
Item 8 of this Form 10-K. We do not believe that these matters will have a material adverse effect upon our competitive position,
results of operations, cash flows or financial condition.
28
Table of Contents
A further discussion of government contracts and related investigations, as well as a discussion of our environmental liabilities, can
be found under the heading “Other Matters Relating to Our Business as a Whole – Compliance with Environmental and Other
Government Regulations” within Item 1. Business of this Form 10-K and in Item 1A. Risk Factors of this Form 10-K.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
29
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
On April 3, 2020, United Technologies Corporation (UTC) completed the previously announced separation of its business into three
independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (such
separations, the “Separation Transactions”). UTC distributed all of the outstanding shares of Carrier common stock and all of the
outstanding shares of Otis common stock to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business
on March 19, 2020, the record date for the distributions (the Distributions) effective at 12:01 a.m., Eastern Time, on April 3, 2020.
On April 3, 2020, following the completion of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, UTC and Raytheon Company
completed their previously announced all-stock merger of equals transaction (the “Raytheon Merger”). Upon closing of the
Raytheon Merger, UTC changed its name to “Raytheon Technologies Corporation.”
Raytheon Technologies’ common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol “RTX.” There were
approximately 45,151 registered shareowners at January 29, 2021. The information required by Item 5 with respect to securities
authorized for issuance under equity compensation plans is incorporated herein by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement
for the 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled “Approve Amendment to the Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan.”
Stock Performance Graph
The following graph presents the cumulative total shareowner return for the five years ending December 31, 2020 for our common
stock as compared to the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index, the Dow Jones 30 Industrial Average and the S&P Aerospace &
Defense (A&D) Index. These figures assume that all dividends paid over the five-year period were reinvested, and that the starting
value of each index and the investment in common stock was $100.00 on December 31, 2015.
Comparison of Cumulative Five Year Total Return
Annual Return Percentage
Years Ending
Company/Index 12/31/2016 12/31/2017 12/31/2018 12/31/2019 12/31/2020
Raytheon Technologies Common Stock 17.14 19.13 -14.66 43.82 -16.73
S&P 500 Index 11.96 21.83 -4.38 31.49 18.40
Dow Jones 30 Industrial Average 16.50 28.11 -3.48 25.34 9.72
S&P Aerospace & Defense Index 18.90 41.38 -8.07 30.33 -16.06
(1)    Historical stock prices presented in the chart have been adjusted to reflect the impact of the Distributions on April 3, 2020.
(2)    Prior to the Separations Transactions, Distributions and Raytheon Merger, UTC chose the Dow Jones 30 Industrial Average as its comparable index. After the
Separations Transactions, Distributions and Raytheon Merger, the Company chose the S&P A&D Index as a more informative comparable index. Both indices
are presented, in accordance with Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) rules, which require that if a company selects a different index from that used in
the immediately preceding fiscal year, the company’s stock performance must be compared against both the newly selected index and previous index in the
year of change.
Indexed Returns
Years Ending
Company/IndexBase Period
12/31/2015 12/31/2016 12/31/2017 12/31/2018 12/31/2019 12/31/2020
Raytheon Technologies Common Stock$ 100.00 117.14$ 139.55 $ 119.10 $ 171.29 $ 142.64 
S&P 500 Index 100.00 111.96 136.40 130.42 171.49 203.04 
Dow Jones 30 Industrial Average 100.00 116.50 149.24 144.05 180.56 198.11 
S&P Aerospace & Defense Index 100.00 118.90 168.11 154.54 201.41 169.05 (1)
(2)
(2)
30
Table of Contents
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table provides information about our purchases during the quarter ended December 31, 2020 of equity securities that
are registered by us pursuant to Section 12 of the Exchange Act.
2020Total Number of
Shares Purchased
(000’s)Average Price Paid per
ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of a
Publicly Announced
Program
(000’s)Approximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be Purchased
Under the Program
(dollars in millions)
October 1 - October 31 — $ — — $ 1,767 
November 1 - November 30 — — — 1,767 
December 1 - December 31 — — — 5,000 
Total — $ — — 
(1)    The remaining authority to repurchase approximately $1.8 billion of our common stock under the previously approved October 14, 2015 share repurchase
program was revoked and replaced as of December 7, 2020 with a $5.0 billion share repurchase program authorized on December 7, 2020, as discussed below.
On December 7, 2020, our Board of Directors authorized a share repurchase program for up to $5 billion of our common stock,
replacing the previous program announced on October 14, 2015. At December 31, 2020, the maximum dollar value of shares that
may yet be purchased under this current program was $5.0 billion. We did not make any share repurchases during the quarter ended
December 31, 2020. No shares were reacquired in transactions outside the program during the quarter ended December 31, 2020.(1)
31
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The following selected consolidated financial data should be read in conjunction with the information contained in Item 7 of this
Form 10-K and the Consolidated Financial Statements and notes thereto included in Item 8 of this Form 10-K, which are
incorporated herein by reference, in order to understand the factors that may affect the comparability of the financial data presented
below.
Five-Year Summary
(in millions, except per share amounts and number of
employees) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
For The Year
Net sales $56,587 $45,349 $34,701 $29,713 $28,528 
Research and development 2,582 2,452 1,878 1,876 1,857 
Operating profit (loss) (1,889) 4,914 2,877 2,989 3,252 
Restructuring costs 777 245 158 92 166 
Net income (loss) from continuing operations (2,928) 3,731 1,406 1,468 2,133 
Net income (loss) from continuing operations
attributable to common shareowners (3,109) 3,510 1,216 1,313 2,009 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations
attributable to common shareowners (410) 2,027 4,053 3,239 3,046 
Diluted earnings (loss) per share—Net income (loss)
from continuing operations attributable to common
shareowners (2.29) 4.06 1.50 1.64 2.43 
Cash dividends per common share 2.16 2.94 2.84 2.72 2.62 
Average diluted shares of Common Stock
outstanding 1,358 864 810 799 826 
Cash flows provided by operating activities of
continuing operations 4,334 5,821 2,670 2,282 3,003 
Capital expenditures 1,795 1,868 1,467 1,556 1,265 
Acquisitions, including net cash payments, debt
assumed & equity issued 35,077 9 30,783 25 24 
Repurchases of Common Stock 47 151 325 1,453 2,254 
Dividends paid on Common Stock (excluding
ESOP) 2,732 2,442 2,170 2,074 2,069 
At Year End
Working capital $ 7,580 $(2,397) $(2,284) $ 2,975 $ 1,370 
Total assets 162,089 107,792 103,471 65,994 60,252 
Long-term debt, including current portion 31,576 40,959 43,763 26,917 23,131 
Total debt 31,823 43,252 45,191 27,279 23,696 
Total debt to total capitalization 30 % 49 % 53 % 46 % 45 %
Total equity $73,852 $44,231 $40,610 $31,421 $29,169 
Total backlog 150,119 111,665 93,844 75,636 72,328 
Number of employees 181,000 121,600 117,300 81,600 77,700 
(1)    Amounts prior to 2018 do not reflect the adoption of Accounting Standards Update (ASU) 2014-09, Revenue Recognition from Contracts with Customers
(Topic 606), in the first quarter of 2018 using the modified retrospective approach.
(2)    Amounts prior to 2019 do not reflect the adoption of ASU 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842), in the first quarter of 2019 using the modified retrospective approach.
(3)    Amounts prior to 2020 do not reflect the impact of the Raytheon Merger. See “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets”
within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
(4)    Amounts prior to 2018 do not reflect the acquisition of Rockwell Collins, Inc. (Rockwell Acquisition). See “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions,
Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
(5)    Excludes assets and liabilities related to discontinued operations, for all periods presented.(1), (3), (4)
(3), (4)
(1), (3), (4)
(3), (4)
(1), (3),
(4)
(1), (3), (4)
(1), (3), (4)
(3), (4)
(3), (4)
(3), (4), (5)
(1), (2), (5)
(3), (4), (5)
(3), (4), (5)
(1), (3), (4)
(3), (4)
32
Table of Contents
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
BUSINESS OVERVIEW
We are a global premier systems provider of high technology products and services to the aerospace and defense industries. On
April 3, 2020, United Technologies Corporation (UTC) completed the Separation Transactions as defined below, and on April 3,
2020, completed the Raytheon Merger as defined below, to form the new company, Raytheon Technologies Corporation. As a result
of these transactions, we now operate in four principal business segments: Collins Aerospace Systems (Collins Aerospace), Pratt &
Whitney, Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS) and Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD).
Separation Transactions and Distributions. On April 3, 2020, UTC (since renamed Raytheon Technologies Corporation) completed
the separation of its business into three independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and
Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (such separations, the “Separation Transactions”). UTC distributed all of the outstanding shares
of Carrier common stock and all of the outstanding shares of Otis common stock to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC
common stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020, the record date for the distributions (the Distributions). UTC
distributed 866,158,910 and 433,079,455 shares of common stock of Carrier and Otis, respectively in the Distributions, each of
which was effective at 12:01 a.m., Eastern Time, on April 3, 2020. The historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as
discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and segment results for all periods
presented. Throughout this Annual Report on Form 10-K, unless otherwise indicated, amounts and activity are presented on a
continuing operations basis.
Raytheon Merger. On April 3, 2020, following the completion of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, pursuant to an
Agreement and Plan of Merger dated June 9, 2019, as amended, UTC and Raytheon Company (Raytheon) completed their all-stock
merger of equals transaction (the Raytheon Merger). Upon closing of the Raytheon Merger, Raytheon Company became a wholly
owned subsidiary of UTC, which changed its name to “Raytheon Technologies Corporation.”
On November 26, 2018, we completed the acquisition of Rockwell Collins (the Rockwell Acquisition), a leader in aviation and
high-integrity solutions for commercial and military customers as well as leading-edge avionics, flight controls, aircraft interior and
data connectivity solutions. Refer to “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8
of this Form 10-K for additional discussion on the Rockwell Acquisition.
Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “the Company,” “Raytheon Technologies,” and “RTC” mean
United Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries when referring to periods prior to the Raytheon Merger and to the combined
company, Raytheon Technologies Corporation, when referring to periods after the Raytheon Merger. Unless the context otherwise
requires, the terms “Raytheon Company,” or “Raytheon” mean Raytheon Company and its subsidiaries prior to the Raytheon
Merger.
UTC was determined to be the accounting acquirer in the merger, and as a result the financial statements of Raytheon Technologies
for year ended December 31, 2020 include Raytheon Company’s financial position and results of operations for the period
subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. The historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as
discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and segment results for all periods
presented. See “Note 3: Discontinued Operations” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
Industry Considerations
Our worldwide operations can be affected by industrial, economic and political factors on both a regional and global level. Our
operations include original equipment manufacturer (OEM) and extensive related aftermarket parts and services related to our
aerospace operations. Our defense business serves both domestic and international customers primarily as a prime contractor or
subcontractor on a broad portfolio of defense and related programs for government customers. Our business mix also reflects the
combination of shorter cycles in our commercial aerospace spares contracts and certain service contracts in our defense business
primarily at RIS, and longer cycles in our aerospace OEM and aftermarket maintenance contracts and on our defense contracts to
design, develop, manufacture or modify complex equipment. Our customers are in the public and private sectors, and our
businesses reflect an extensive geographic diversification that has evolved with continued globalization.
Government legislation, policies and regulations, including regulations related to global warming, carbon footprint and fuel
efficiency, can have a negative impact on our worldwide operations. Government and industry-driven safety and performance
regulations, restrictions on aircraft engine noise and emissions, government imposed travel restrictions, and government
procurement practices can impact our businesses.
Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney serve both commercial and government aerospace customers. Revenue passenger miles
(RPMs), available seat miles and the general economic health of airline carriers are key barometers for our commercial aerospace
operations. Performance in the general aviation sector is closely tied to the overall health of the economy and is
33
Table of Contents
positively correlated to corporate profits. Our commercial aftermarket operations continue to evolve as a significant portion of our
aerospace operations’ customers are covered under long-term aftermarket service agreements at both Collins Aerospace and Pratt &
Whitney. These agreements are comprehensive long-term spare part and service agreements with our customers.
RIS, RMD, and the defense operations of Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney are affected by U.S. Department of Defense
(DoD) budget and spending levels, changes in demand, changes in policy positions or priorities from a new U.S. Administration
and the global political environment. Total sales to the U.S. government, excluding foreign military sales (FMS), were
$26.0 billion, $9.1 billion and $6.6 billion in 2020, 2019 and 2018 or 45.9%, 20.1% and 18.9% of total net sales for those years,
respectively.
Impact of the COVID-19 Pandemic
In March 2020, the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) was declared a pandemic by the World Health Organization and a
national emergency by the U.S. government. The pandemic has negatively affected the U.S. and global economy, disrupted global
supply chains and financial markets, and resulted in significant travel restrictions, mandated facility closures and shelter-in-place
and social distancing orders in numerous jurisdictions around the world. Raytheon Technologies is taking all prudent measures to
protect the health and safety of our employees, such as practicing social distancing, performing deep cleaning in all of our facilities,
temperature screening, health questionnaires and enabling our employees to work from home where possible. We have also taken
appropriate actions to help support our communities in addressing the challenges posed by the pandemic, including the production
and donation of personal protective equipment.
Our business and operations and the industries in which we operate have been significantly impacted by public and private sector
policies and initiatives in the U.S. and worldwide to address the transmission of COVID-19, such as the imposition of travel
restrictions and the adoption of remote working. Additionally, public sentiments regarding air travel have also had a significant
impact. We began to experience issues related to COVID-19 in the first quarter of 2020, primarily related to a limited number of
facility closures, less than full staffing, and disruptions in supplier deliveries, most significantly in our Collins Aerospace and Pratt
& Whitney businesses.
The continued disruption to air travel and commercial activities and the significant restrictions and limitations on businesses,
particularly within the aerospace and commercial airline industries, have negatively impacted global supply, demand and
distribution capabilities. These conditions, which began in the second quarter of 2020, continued through the remainder of 2020. In
particular, the unprecedented decrease in air travel resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic is adversely affecting our airline and
airframer customers, and their demand for the products and services of our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses.
Based on recent public data, revenue passenger miles (RPMs) declined by approximately 65% in the first eleven months of 2020,
compared to the prior year, due to the pandemic. As a result, our airline customers have reported significant reductions in fleet
utilization, aircraft grounding and unplanned retirements, and have deferred and, in some cases, cancelled new aircraft deliveries.
Airlines have shifted to cash conservation behaviors such as deferring engine maintenance due to lower flight hours and aircraft
utilization, requesting extended payment terms, deferring delivery of new aircraft and spare engines and requesting discounts on
engine maintenance. Some airline customers have filed for bankruptcy due to their inability to meet their financial obligations.
Additionally, we are seeing purchase order declines in line with publicly communicated aircraft production volumes as original
equipment manufacturer (OEM) customers delay and cancel orders. We continue to monitor these trends and are working closely
with our customers. We have been and continue to actively mitigate costs and adjust production schedules to accommodate these
declines in demand. We have also been taking actions to preserve capital and protect the long-term needs of our businesses,
including cutting discretionary spending, significantly reducing capital expenditures and research and development spend,
suspending our share buybacks in 2020, deferring merit increases and implementing temporary pay reductions, freezing non-
essential hiring, repositioning employees to defense work, furloughing employees when needed, and personnel reductions. In 2020,
we recorded total restructuring charges of $777 million primarily related to personnel reductions at our Collins Aerospace and Pratt
& Whitney businesses to preserve capital and at our corporate headquarters due to consolidation from the Raytheon Merger. The
former Raytheon Company businesses, although experiencing minor impacts, have not experienced significant facility closures or
other significant business disruptions as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Given the impacts described above that have resulted from the COVID-19 pandemic, we expect our future operating results,
particularly those of our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses to continue to be significantly negatively impacted. Our
expectations regarding the COVID-19 pandemic and its potential financial impact are based on available information and
assumptions that we believe are reasonable at this time; however, the actual financial impact is highly uncertain and subject to a
wide range of factors and future developments. While we believe that the long-term outlook for the aerospace industry remains
positive due to the fundamental drivers of air travel demand, there is significant uncertainty with respect to when commercial air
traffic levels will begin to recover, and whether and at what point capacity will return to and/or exceed pre-COVID-19 levels. Our
latest estimates are that this recovery may occur in 2023 or 2024. New information may emerge concerning the
34
Table of Contents
scope, severity and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as any worsening of the pandemic, the effect of mutating strains
and whether additional outbreaks of the pandemic will continue to occur, actions to contain the pandemic’s spread or treat its
impact, timing of the availability of vaccines, and their distribution, acceptance and efficacy, and governmental, business and
individual personal actions taken in response to the pandemic (including restrictions and limitations on travel and transportation,
and changes in leisure and business travel patterns and work environments) among others. Some of these actions and related
impacts may be trends that continue in the future even after the pandemic no longer poses a significant public health risk.
We considered the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic to be a
triggering event in the first and second quarters of 2020, requiring an impairment evaluation of goodwill, intangible assets and
other assets in our commercial aerospace businesses, Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney. Beginning in the second quarter of
2020, we observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by airlines, fleet retirements
and repositioning of OEM production schedules and we experienced a significant decline in revenues at our Collins Aerospace and
Pratt & Whitney businesses due to a decline in flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization, shop visits and commercial OEM deliveries.
These factors contributed to a deterioration of our expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight
activity, which further reduced our future sales and cash flows expectations. Based on our updated forecast assumptions in the
second quarter of 2020, we concluded that the carrying values of two of our Collins Aerospace reporting units were greater than
their respective fair values, and accordingly, recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $3.2 billion. We did not identify any further
deterioration to our expectations in the third quarter of 2020 and, therefore, did not have a triggering event.
We completed our annual goodwill impairment testing as of October 1, 2020 and determined that no additional adjustments to the
carrying value of our goodwill were necessary. Refer to “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets”
within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
As described further in “Note 8: Commercial Aerospace Industry Assets and Commitments” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, we
have significant exposure related to our airline and airframer customers, including significant accounts receivable and contract
assets balances. Given the uncertainty related to the severity and length of the pandemic, as well as any worsening of the pandemic,
mutations to the strains of the virus and the timing and impact of vaccines and whether there will be additional outbreaks of the
pandemic and its impact across the aerospace industry, we may be required to record additional charges or impairments in future
periods. For a discussion on the 2020 impacts see “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within
Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Although the impact of COVID-19 on our commercial business is significant, we currently believe we have sufficient liquidity to
withstand the current estimated impacts.
Other Matters
Global economic and political conditions, changes in raw material and commodity prices, interest rates, foreign currency exchange
rates, energy costs, levels of air travel, the financial condition of commercial airlines, and the impact from natural disasters and
weather conditions create uncertainties that could impact our businesses in 2021. With regard to political conditions, in July 2019,
the U.S. government suspended Turkey’s participation in the F-35 Joint Strike Fighter program because Turkey accepted delivery
of the Russian-built S-400 air and missile defense system. The U.S. has imposed, and may impose additional, sanctions on Turkey
as a result of this or other political disputes. Turkish companies supply us with components, some of which are sole-sourced,
primarily in our aerospace operations for commercial and military engines and aerospace products. Depending upon the scope and
timing of U.S. sanctions on Turkey and potential reciprocal actions, if any, such sanctions or actions could impact our sources of
supply and could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, cash flows or financial condition. In addition, in
October 2020, the People’s Republic of China (China) announced that it may sanction RTC in connection with a possible Foreign
Military Sale to Taiwan of six MS-110 Reconnaissance Pods and related equipment manufactured by Collins Aerospace. Foreign
Military Sales are government-to-government transactions that are initiated by, and carried out at the direction of, the U.S.
government. To date, the Chinese government has not imposed sanctions on RTC or indicated the nature or timing of any future
potential sanctions or other actions. If China were to impose sanctions or take other regulatory action against RTC, our suppliers,
teammates or partners, it could potentially disrupt our business operations. The impact of potential sanctions or other actions by
China cannot be determined at this time.
The recent U.S. presidential and congressional election could result in changes to the U.S. government’s foreign policies that may
impact regulatory approval for direct commercial sales contracts for certain of our products and services to certain foreign
customers. Likewise, it is uncertain whether approvals previously granted for prior sales could also be paused or revoked if the
products and services have not yet been delivered to the customer. If we ultimately do not receive all of the regulatory approvals, or
those approvals are revoked, it could have a material effect on our financial results.
35
Table of Contents
In particular, we have direct commercial sales contracts for precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, for
which we have not yet obtained regulatory approval. Due to the result of the U.S. presidential and congressional election, and the
resulting uncertainty surrounding U.S. foreign policy on direct commercial sales for precision guided munitions with this customer,
we determined that it is no longer probable that we will be able to obtain required regulatory approvals for these contracts;
however, this determination could change as the U.S. government’s foreign policy views are clarified. Therefore, in the fourth
quarter of 2020, we reversed $119 million of sales for work performed on these specific contracts subsequent to the date of the
Raytheon Merger and through the end of the third quarter of 2020, and the related operating profit. In addition, we recognized an
unfavorable profit impact of $516 million, primarily related to inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and recognition of
supplier related obligations related to termination liability, which we now do not expect to be utilized or otherwise directed to other
customers. In addition, we reversed $755 million of backlog on these contracts. Our contract liabilities include $405 million of
advance payments received from the customer on these contracts, which may become refundable to the customer if the contracts
are ultimately terminated.
See Item 1A. Risk Factors within Part I of this Form 10-K for further discussion of these items.
FINANCIAL SUMMARY
We use the following key financial performance measures to manage our business on a consolidated basis and by business segment,
and to monitor and assess our results of operations:
– Net Sales—a growth metric that measures our revenue for the current year;
– Operating Profit—a measure of our profit from continuing operations for the year, before non-operating expenses, net and
income taxes; and
– Operating Margin—a measure of our operating profit as a percentage of total net sales.
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total net sales $ 56,587 $ 45,349 $ 34,701 
Operating profit (loss) (1,889) 4,914 2,877 
Operating margin (3.3)% 10.8 % 8.3 %
Operating cash flow from continuing operations $ 4,334 $ 5,821 $ 2,670 
Total backlog 150,119 111,665 93,844 
Backlog, which is equivalent to our remaining performance obligations for our contracts, represents the dollar value of firm orders
for which work has not been performed and excludes unexercised contract options and potential orders under ordering-type
contracts (e.g., indefinite-delivery, indefinite-quantity (IDIQ) type contracts). Backlog generally increases with bookings and/or
orders and generally converts into sales as we incur costs under the related contractual commitments for our contracts recognized
over time or as products are transferred to our customers for point in time contracts. Backlog is affected by changes in foreign
exchange rates.
In addition, we maintain a strong focus on program execution and the prudent management of capital and investments in order to
maximize operating income and cash. We focus on adjusted earnings per share (EPS) and measures to assess our cash generation
and the efficiency and effectiveness of our use of capital, such as free cash flow (FCF) and return on invested capital (ROIC), all of
which are not defined measurements under U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP) and may be calculated
differently by other companies.
Considered together, we believe these metrics are strong indicators of our overall performance and our ability to create shareowner
value. We feel these measures are balanced among long-term and short-term performance, efficiency and growth. We also use these
and other performance metrics for executive compensation purposes.
A discussion of our results of operations and financial condition follows below in Results of Operations, Segment Review, and
Liquidity and Financial Condition.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
As described in our “Cautionary Note Concerning Factors That May Affect Future Results” in this Form 10-K, our period-to-period
comparisons of our results, particularly at a segment level, may not be indicative of our future operating results. The following
discussions of comparative results among periods, including the discussion of segment results, should be viewed in this context. As
discussed further above in “Business Overview,” the results of RIS and RMD reflect the period subsequent to the completion of the
Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. In addition, as a result of the Separations Transactions and the
36
Table of Contents
Distributions, the historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded
from both continuing operations and segment results for all periods presented.
Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net sales $ 56,587 $ 45,349 $ 34,701 
The factors contributing to the total change year-over-year in total net sales are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Organic $ (10,438)$ 2,351 
Foreign currency translation 14 (73)
Acquisitions and divestitures, net 21,662 8,370 
Other — — 
Total Change $ 11,238 $ 10,648 
(1)    We provide the organic change in net sales for our consolidated results of operations. We believe that this measure is useful to investors because it provides
transparency to the underlying performance of our business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. The organic change excludes the effect of
foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations; acquisitions and divestitures, net; and other significant non-recurring and non-operational items. A reconciliation
of this measure to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
Net sales decreased $10,438 million organically in 2020 compared to 2019. This decrease reflects lower organic sales of $6.6
billion at Collins Aerospace, primarily driven by lower commercial aerospace OEM sales and lower commercial aerospace
aftermarket sales, partially offset by higher military sales. The declines in commercial aerospace OEM sales and commercial
aerospace aftermarket sales were primarily due to the current economic environment principally driven by the COVID-19
pandemic, which has resulted in lower flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization and commercial OEM deliveries. The decrease in net
sales also reflects lower organic sales of $4.1 billion at Pratt & Whitney primarily due to lower commercial aftermarket sales due to
a significant reduction in shop visits and related spare part sales, and lower commercial OEM sales, primarily due to a significant
reduction in commercial engine deliveries, all principally driven by the current economic and operating environment primarily due
to the COVID-19 pandemic. The decrease at Pratt & Whitney was partially offset by higher military sales primarily driven by an
increase in F135 engine sales and aftermarket growth on multiple platforms. The $21,662 million sales increase in Acquisitions and
divestitures, net in 2020 compared to 2019, is primarily driven by the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. Included in the change in
Acquisitions and divestitures, net was the sale of the Collins Aerospace military Global Positioning System (GPS) and space-based
precision optics businesses sold in the third quarter of 2020, as further discussed in “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill
and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Net sales increased $2,351 million organically in 2019 compared to 2018. This increase reflects higher organic sales of $1.6 billion
at Pratt & Whitney, primarily driven by higher military, commercial OEM, and commercial aftermarket sales. The increase in net
sales also reflects higher organic sales of $1.1 billion at Collins Aerospace primarily driven by higher commercial aftermarket and
military sales, partially offset by lower commercial aerospace OEM sales. The $8,370 million sales increase in Acquisitions and
divestitures, net in 2019 compared to 2018, is primarily driven by the Rockwell Acquisition.
The composition of external net sales by products and services sales for 2020 was approximately the following:
Collins Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon Intelligence
& SpaceRaytheon Missiles &
Defense
Products 80 % 60 % 75 % 90 %
Services 20 % 40 % 25 % 10 %
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Net Sales
Products $ 43,319 $ 32,998 $ 24,141 77 % 73 % 70 %
Services 13,268 12,351 10,560 23 % 27 % 30 %
Total net sales $ 56,587 $ 45,349 $ 34,701 100 % 100 % 100 %
Net products sales grew $10,321 million in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to an increase in external product sales of
$18.4 billion due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by decreases in external product sales of $5.3 billion(1)
37
Table of Contents
at Collins Aerospace and $2.8 billion at Pratt & Whitney. Net services sales grew $917 million in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily
due to an increase in external services sales of $3.4 billion due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by
decreases in external services sales of $1.3 billion at Pratt & Whitney and $1.2 billion at Collins Aerospace.
Net products sales grew $8,857 million in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to an increase in external product sales of
$7.3 billion at Collins Aerospace principally driven by the Rockwell Acquisition and an increase in external product sales of
$1.6 billion at Pratt & Whitney. Net services sales grew $1,791 million in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to an increase in
external services sales of $1.9 billion at Collins Aerospace primarily due to the Rockwell Acquisition.
Our sales to major customers were as follows:
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Sales to the U.S. government $ 25,962  $ 9,094 $ 6,560 46 % 20 % 19 %
Foreign military sales through the U.S. government 4,585  1,571 902 8 % 3 % 3 %
Foreign government direct commercial sales 3,974  1,498 1,275 7 % 3 % 4 %
Commercial aerospace and other commercial sales 22,066  33,186 25,964 39 % 73 % 75 %
Total net sales $ 56,587  $ 45,349 $ 34,701 100 % 100 % 100 %
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
Cost of Products and Services Sold 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total cost of products and services sold $ 48,056 $ 34,598 $ 27,465 
Percentage of net sales 85 % 76 % 79 %
The factors contributing to the change year-over-year in total cost of products and services sold are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Organic $ (4,432)$ 1,781 
Foreign currency translation 8 (125)
Acquisitions and divestitures, net 17,696 5,241 
Restructuring 220 89 
FAS/CAS operating adjustment (965) — 
Acquisition accounting adjustments 939 424 
Other (8) (277)
Total Change $ 13,458 $ 7,133 
(1)    We provide the organic change in cost of sales for our consolidated results of operations. We believe that this measure is useful to investors because it provides
transparency to the underlying performance of our business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. The organic change excludes the effect of
foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations; acquisitions and divestitures, net; restructuring costs; costs related to certain acquisition accounting adjustments
and other significant non-recurring and non-operational items. A reconciliation of this measure to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
The organic decrease in total cost of products and services sold in 2020 compared to 2019 of $4,432 million was primarily driven
by the organic sales decreases noted above. The increase in Acquisitions and divestitures, net of $17,696 million in 2020 compared
to 2019 is primarily driven by the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. Included in the change in Acquisitions and divestitures, net is
the sale of the Collins Aerospace military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses sold in the third quarter of 2020, as
further discussed in “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K and an
unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and recognition of supplier
related obligations for certain international contracts at RMD as further described in “Segment Review” below. Included in the
decrease in Other of $8 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was prior year amortization of inventory fair value step-up associated
with the Rockwell Collins acquisition of $181 million at Collins Aerospace, partially offset by an $89 million impairment of
commercial aircraft program assets at Pratt & Whitney in the current year.
The organic increase in total cost of products and services sold in 2019 compared to 2018, of $1,781 million was primarily driven
by the organic sales increases noted above. The increase in Acquisitions and divestitures, net of $5,241 million for 2019 compared
to 2018 was primarily driven by the Rockwell Acquisition. The decrease in Other of $277 million primarily reflects the absence of
a 2018 customer contract settlement at Pratt & Whitney.(1)
(1)
38
Table of Contents
For further discussion on Restructuring costs see “Restructuring Costs” section below. For further discussion on FAS/CAS
operating adjustment see “FAS/CAS operating adjustment” section below. For further discussion on Acquisition accounting
adjustments, see “Acquisition accounting adjustments” subsection under the “Segment Review” section below.
% of Total Net Sales
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Cost of sales
Products $38,137 $26,910 $21,083 67 % 59 % 61 %
Services 9,919 7,688 6,382 18 % 17 % 18 %
Total cost of sales $48,056 $34,598 $27,465 85 % 76 % 79 %
Net products cost of sales grew $11,227 million in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to an increase in external product cost of
sales due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by decreases in external product cost of sales at Collins
Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney. Net services cost of sales grew $2,231 million in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to an
increase in external services cost of sales due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by a decrease in external
services cost of sales at Collins Aerospace.
Net products cost of sales grew $5,827 million in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to an increase in external product cost of
sales at Collins Aerospace, primarily due to the Rockwell Acquisition, and at Pratt & Whitney. Net services cost of sales grew
$1,306 million in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily due to an increase in external services cost of sales at Collins Aerospace
primarily due to the Rockwell Acquisition.
Research and Development
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Company-funded $ 2,582 $ 2,452 $ 1,878 
Percentage of net sales 4.6 % 5.4 % 5.4 %
Customer-funded $ 4,111 $ 2,283 $ 1,517 
Percentage of net sales 7.3 % 5.0 % 4.4 %
(1)    Customer-funded research and development costs are included in cost of sales in our Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Research and development spending is subject to the variable nature of program development schedules and, therefore, year-over-
year fluctuations in spending levels are expected. The increase in company-funded research and development of $130 million in
2020 compared to 2019, was primarily driven by $0.6 billion related to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, partially offset by
lower expenses of $0.3 billion across various commercial programs at Pratt & Whitney and $0.2 billion across various commercial
programs at Collins Aerospace, both principally driven by cost reduction measures in response to the current economic
environment primarily due to COVID-19. The increase in company-funded research and development of $574 million in 2019
compared to 2018, was primarily driven by $0.5 billion related to the Rockwell Acquisition. Excluding this impact, Collins
Aerospace company-funded research and development increased $0.1 billion driven by higher expenses across various commercial
programs.
The increase in customer-funded research and development of $1,828 million in 2020 compared to 2019, was primarily driven by
$1.7 billion related to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. The increase in customer-funded research and development of $766
million in 2019 compared to 2018, was primarily driven by $0.8 billion related to the Rockwell Acquisition.
Selling, General and Administrative
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Selling, general and administrative $ 5,540 $ 3,711 $ 2,864 
Percentage of net sales 9.8 % 8.2 % 8.3 %
Selling, general and administrative expenses increased $1,829 million in 2020 compared to 2019, primarily driven by $1.6 billion
related to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020, excluding the impact of merger-related restructuring costs. The increase in
Selling, general and administrative expenses also includes higher expenses of $0.4 billion related to increased estimates of expected
credit losses primarily due to customer bankruptcies and additional allowances for credit losses at Pratt & Whitney and Collins
Aerospace, higher general and administrative restructuring costs of $0.3 billion, and lower expenses due to cost reduction
initiatives.
Selling, general and administrative expenses increased $847 million in 2019 compared to 2018, primarily driven by $0.6 billion of
incremental selling, general and administrative expenses resulting from the Rockwell Acquisition and $0.1 billion of costs (1)
39
Table of Contents
associated with the Raytheon Merger. The increase in Selling, general and administrative expenses also includes higher expenses of
$0.2 billion at Collins Aerospace, primarily driven by increased headcount and employee compensation related expenses partially
offset by synergy capture related to the Rockwell Acquisition.
We are continuously evaluating our cost structure and have implemented restructuring actions in an effort to keep our cost structure
competitive. As appropriate, the amounts reflected above include the beneficial impact of previous restructuring actions on Selling,
general and administrative expenses. See “Note 14: Restructuring Costs” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K and Restructuring Costs,
below, for further discussion.
Other Income, Net
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Other income, net $ 885 $ 326 $ 383 
Other income, net includes equity earnings in unconsolidated entities, royalty income, foreign exchange gains and losses, as well as
other ongoing and nonrecurring items. The increase in Other income, net of $559 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily
due to $595 million of gains on the sales of the Collins Aerospace businesses, as further discussed in “Note 2: Acquisitions,
Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, and $225 million related to foreign government
wage subsidies due to COVID-19 at Pratt & Whitney and Collins Aerospace, partially offset by a net unfavorable year-over-year
impact of foreign exchange gains and losses of $138 million.
The decrease in Other income, net of $57 million in 2019 compared to 2018, was primarily due to a net unfavorable impact of
foreign exchange gains and losses.
Operating Profit (Loss)
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating profit (loss) $ (1,889)$ 4,914$ 2,877
Operating profit (loss) margin (3.3)% 10.8 % 8.3 %
The change in Operating profit (loss) of $6,803 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily driven by the operating
performance at our segments as described below in “Segment Review” and the $3,183 million goodwill impairment in the second
quarter of 2020 related to two Collins Aerospace reporting units. Included in the change in Operating profit (loss) was an increase
in acquisition accounting adjustments of $1,057 million related to the Raytheon Merger, an increase in restructuring costs of $527
million primarily related to restructuring actions taken at our Collins Aerospace segment and restructuring actions in connection
with the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020 and an unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to inventory reserves, contract
asset impairments and recognition of supplier related obligations for certain international contracts at RMD as further described in
“Segment Review” below.
The increase in Operating profit (loss) of $2,037 million in 2019 compared to 2018 was primarily driven by operating performance
at our segments as described below in “Segment Review.” Included in the increase in Operating profit (loss) was an increase in
acquisition accounting adjustments of $375 million primarily related to the Rockwell acquisition and increase in restructuring costs
of $93 million primarily related to actions taken at our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney segments.
Non-service Pension (Income) Expense
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Non-service pension (income) expense $ (902)$ (829)$ (659)
The change in Non-service pension (income) expense of $73 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily driven by the
inclusion of Raytheon Company plans in 2020 as a result of the Raytheon Merger and a decrease in the interest rates at December
31, 2019 and during 2020 compared to December 31, 2018, partially offset by a decrease in the expected return on plan assets
(EROA) assumption for the UTC plans in 2020 and a one-time curtailment gain of $98 million in 2019. The one-time curtailment
gain was due to the recognition of previously unrecognized prior service credits as a result of an amendment to the UTC domestic
defined benefit plans to cease accrual of additional benefits for future service and compensation for non-union participants effective
December 31, 2019.
The change in Non-service pension (income) expense of $170 million in 2019 compared to 2018 was primarily driven the inclusion
of Rockwell Collins plans in 2019 as a result of the Rockwell Collins acquisition and a one-time curtailment gain of $98 million in
2019.
40
Table of Contents
Interest Expense, Net
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Interest expense $ 1,408 $ 1,711 $ 1,182 
Interest income (42) (120) (150)
Interest expense, net $ 1,366 $ 1,591 $ 1,032 
Average interest expense rate - average outstanding borrowings during the year:
Short-term borrowings 2.0 % 1.7 % 1.3 %
Total debt 4.0 % 3.6 % 3.5 %
Average interest expense rate - outstanding borrowings as of December 31:
Short-term borrowings 0.6 % 2.3 % 1.9 %
Total debt 4.2 % 3.6 % 3.5 %
Interest expense, net decreased $225 million in 2020 as compared with 2019, primarily due to a decrease in interest expense
principally driven by the repayment of long-term debt, partially offset by a decrease in interest income principally driven by interest
income of $63 million related to tax settlements in the prior year. The average maturity of our long-term debt at December 31, 2020
was approximately 14 years.
Interest expense, net increased $559 million in 2019 as compared with 2018, primarily due to an increase in interest expense driven
by debt acquired from the Rockwell Acquisition and the impact of the August 16, 2018 issuance of notes representing $11 billion in
aggregate principal amount. The average maturity of our long-term debt at December 31, 2019 was approximately 10 years.
Income Taxes
2020 2019 2018
Effective income tax rate (24.4)% 10.1 % 43.8 %
The 2020 negative effective tax rate is a result of having tax expense of $575 million on a loss from continuing operations before
income taxes of $2,353 million. The loss from continuing operations before income taxes includes the $3,183 million goodwill
impairment as described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets,” within Item 8 of this
Form 10-K, most of which is non-deductible for tax purposes. Tax expense includes net deferred tax charges of $367 million
resulting from the Separation Transactions and the Raytheon Merger primarily related to the impairment of deferred tax assets, and
incremental tax expense of $177 million related to the disposal of businesses, including the sales of the Collins Aerospace and RIS
businesses and the entry into a definitive agreement to sell Forcepoint, as described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions,
Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K. As a result of the Separation Transactions and the
restructuring charges recognized in 2020, tax expense also includes $49 million related to revaluation of the tax benefit for certain
international tax incentives, as the Company no longer expects to meet the incentive requirements. Also included in the 2020
effective tax rate are tax benefits of $142 million associated with U.S. research and development credits and $83 million associated
with Foreign Derived Intangible Income (FDII).
The 2019 effective tax rate includes tax benefits of $290 million primarily associated with the conclusion of the audit by the
Examination Division of the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for the Company’s 2014, 2015 and 2016 tax years and the filing by a
subsidiary of the Company to participate in an amnesty program offered by the Italian Tax Authority. The 2019 effective tax rate
also includes tax benefits of $138 million associated with FDII and $101 million related to U.S. research and development credits.
On December 22, 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (TCJA) was enacted. The 2018 effective tax rate reflects a net charge of
$744 million for TCJA related adjustments. The amount primarily relates to non-U.S. taxes that will become due when previously
reinvested earnings of certain international subsidiaries are remitted. The 2018 effective tax rate also includes tax benefits of
$102 million associated with FDII and $73 million related to U.S. research & development credits.
For additional discussion of income taxes and the effective income tax rate, see “Income Taxes” within Critical Accounting
Estimates, below, and “Note 13: Income Taxes” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
41
Table of Contents
Net Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners 
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ (3,109)$ 3,510 $ 1,216 
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations $ (2.29)$ 4.06 $ 1.50 
Net loss from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2020 includes the following:
•acquisition accounting adjustments primarily related to the Raytheon Merger of $1,435 million, net of tax, which had
an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $1.06;
•restructuring charges of $598 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.44;
•$3,240 million of primarily non-deductible goodwill and intangibles impairment charges related to our Collins
Aerospace segment, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $2.37;
•significant unfavorable contract adjustments at Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney of $667 million, net of tax,
which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.49;
•$415 million of tax charges in connection with the Separation Transactions, including the impairment of deferred tax
assets not expected to be utilized, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of
$0.31;
•unfavorable profit impact at RMD of $412 million, net of tax, related to certain direct commercial sales contracts for
precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS
from continuing operations of $0.30;
•increased estimates of expected credit losses driven by customer bankruptcies and additional allowances for credit
losses of $300 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of
$0.22; and
•gains on the sales of the Collins Aerospace businesses of $240 million, net of tax, which had a favorable impact on
diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.18.
Net income from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2019 includes the following:
•acquisition accounting adjustments of $704 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from
continuing operations of $0.81;
•restructuring charges of $186 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.21;
•tax settlements and related interest income on tax settlements of $341 million, which had a favorable impact on
diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.39; and
•amortization on the inventory fair value step-up associated with the Rockwell Acquisition of $140 million, net of tax,
which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.16.
Net income from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners for 2018 includes the following:
•acquisition accounting adjustments of $432 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from
continuing operations of $0.53;
•restructuring charges of $114 million, net of tax, which had an unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing
operations of $0.14;
•an income tax charge related to the estimated impact of the TCJA of $744 million, which had an unfavorable impact
on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.92; and
•the unfavorable impact of customer contract matters at Pratt & Whitney of $220 million, net of tax, which had an
unfavorable impact on diluted EPS from continuing operations of $0.27.
Net Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners $ (410)$ 2,027 $ 4,053 
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from discontinued operations $ (0.30)$ 2.35 $ 5.00 
On April 3, 2020, we completed the separation of our commercial businesses, Carrier and Otis. Effective as of such date, the
historical results of the Carrier and Otis segments have been reclassified to discontinued operations for all periods presented. See
“Note 3: Discontinued Operations” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
The change in net income (loss) from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners of $2,437 million and the
related change in diluted earnings (loss) per share from discontinued operations of $2.65 in 2020 compared to 2019 was
42
Table of Contents
primarily due to prior year Carrier and Otis operating activity, as the Separation Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020, partially
offset by higher prior year costs associated with the separation of our commercial businesses as discussed below.
Net income (loss) from discontinued operations for 2020 and 2019 includes $888 million, net of tax, and $1,284 million, net of tax,
respectively, of costs associated with the Company’s separation of its commercial businesses. Separation costs in 2020 primarily
related to debt extinguishment costs of $611 million in connection with the early repayment of outstanding principal.
The change in net income (loss) from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners of $2,026 million and the
related change in diluted earnings (loss) per share from discontinued operations of $2.65 in 2019 compared to 2018 was primarily
due to the increased costs associated with the separation of our commercial businesses in 2019 and the absence of a gain on
Carrier’s sale of Taylor Company of $591 million, net of tax in 2018.
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Shareowners 
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (3,519)$ 5,537 $ 5,269 
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from operations $ (2.59)$ 6.41 $ 6.50 
The change in net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners and diluted EPS from operations for 2020 compared to 2019
was driven by the decrease in continuing operations, as discussed above in Net Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations
Attributable to Common Shareowners and the decrease from discontinued operations, as discussed above in Net Income (Loss)
from Discontinued Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners.
The change in net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners and diluted EPS from operations for 2019 compared to 2018
was driven by the increase in continuing operations, as discussed above in Net Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations
Attributable to Common Shareowners, partially offset by the decrease from discontinued operations, as discussed above in Net
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations Attributable to Common Shareowners.
RESTRUCTURING COSTS
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Restructuring costs $ 777 $ 245 $ 158 
Restructuring actions are an essential component of our operating margin improvement efforts and relate to existing and recently
acquired operations. Charges generally arise from severance related to workforce reductions and facility exit costs associated with
the consolidation of field and manufacturing operations and costs to exit legacy programs. We continue to closely monitor the
economic environment and may undertake further restructuring actions to keep our cost structure aligned with the demands of the
prevailing market conditions.
2020 Actions. During 2020, we recorded net pre-tax restructuring charges of $770 million for restructuring efforts initiated in 2020,
primarily related to severance and restructuring actions at Pratt & Whitney and Collins Aerospace in response to the impact on our
operating results related to the current economic environment primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the Raytheon Merger,
and the ongoing cost reduction efforts. We expect to incur additional restructuring and other charges of $40 million to complete
these actions. We are targeting to complete in 2021 the majority of actions initiated in 2020. We expect recurring pre-tax savings in
continuing operations related to these actions to reach approximately $1.1 billion annually within one to two years. Approximately
80% of the total pre-tax charge will require cash payments, which we have funded and expect to continue to fund with cash
generated from operations. During 2020, we had cash outflows of approximately $400 million related to the 2020 actions.
2019 Actions. During 2020 and 2019, we recorded net pre-tax restructuring charges of $10 million and $162 million, respectively,
for actions initiated in 2019. We expect to incur additional restructuring charges of $58 million to complete these actions. We are
targeting to complete in 2021 the majority of the remaining workforce and all facility related cost reduction actions initiated in
2019. We expect annual recurring pre-tax savings in continuing operations related to these actions to reach approximately $200
million annually within two years of initiating these actions. Approximately 90% of the total pre-tax charge will require cash
payments, which we have funded and expect to continue to fund with cash generated from operations. During 2020, we had cash
outflows of approximately $40 million related to the 2019 actions.
In addition, during 2020, we reversed $3 million of net pre-tax restructuring costs for restructuring actions initiated in 2018 and
prior. In 2019 and 2018, we recorded $83 million and $158 million, respectively, of net pre-tax restructuring costs for restructuring
actions initiated in 2018 and prior. For additional discussion of restructuring, see “Note 14: Restructuring Costs” within Item 8 of
this Form 10-K.
43
Table of Contents
SEGMENT REVIEW
As discussed further above in Business Overview, on April 3, 2020, United Technologies Corporation (UTC) completed the
Separation Transactions, and on April 3, 2020, completed the Raytheon Merger with United Technologies Corporation being
renamed Raytheon Technologies Corporation. As a result of these transactions, we now operate in four principal business segments:
Collins Aerospace Systems (Collins Aerospace), Pratt & Whitney, Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS) and Raytheon Missiles &
Defense (RMD). The results of RIS and RMD reflect the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3,
2020. The historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both
continuing operations and segment results for all periods presented.
For a detailed description of our businesses, see “Business” within Item 1 of this Form 10-K.
In conjunction with the Raytheon Merger, we revised our measurement of segment performance to reflect how management now
reviews and evaluates operating performance. Under the new segment performance measurement, certain acquisition accounting
adjustments are now excluded from segments’ results in order to better represent the ongoing operational performance of those
segments. In addition, the majority of Corporate expenses are now allocated to the segments, excluding certain items that remain at
Corporate because they are not included in management’s review of the segments’ results. Historical results, discussion and
presentation of our business segments reflect the impact of these adjustments for all periods presented.
Also as a result of the Raytheon Merger, we now present a FAS/CAS operating adjustment outside of segment results, which
represents the difference between the service cost component of our pension and postretirement benefit (PRB) expense under the
Financial Accounting Standards (FAS) requirements of U.S. GAAP and our pension and PRB expense under U.S. government Cost
Accounting Standards (CAS) primarily related to our RIS and RMD segments. While the ultimate liability for pension and PRB
costs under FAS and CAS is similar, the pattern of cost recognition is different. Over time we generally expect to recover the
related RIS and RMD pension and PRB liabilities through the pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government. Because
the Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney segments generally record pension and PRB expense on a FAS basis, historical results
were not impacted by this change in segment reporting.
Segments are generally based on the management structure of the businesses and the grouping of similar operations, based on
capabilities and technologies, where each management organization has general operating autonomy over diversified products and
services. Segment total net sales and operating profit include intercompany sales and profit, which are ultimately eliminated within
Eliminations and other, which also includes certain smaller non-reportable segments. For our defense contracts, where the primary
customer is the U.S. government subject to Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) part 12, our intercompany sales and profit is
generally recorded at cost-plus a specified fee, which may differ from what the selling entity would be able to obtain on sales to
external customers. Segment results exclude certain acquisition accounting adjustments, the FAS/CAS operating adjustment and
certain corporate expenses, as further discussed below.
We attempt to quantify material factors within our discussion of the results of each segment whenever those factors are
determinable. However, in some instances, the factors we cite within our segment discussion are based upon input measures or
qualitative information that does not lend itself to quantification when discussed in the context of the financial results measured on
an output basis and are not, therefore, quantified in the below discussions.
Given the nature of our business, we believe that total net sales and operating profit (and the related operating profit margin
percentage), which we disclose and discuss at the segment level, are most relevant to an understanding of management’s view of
our segment performance, as described below.
Total Net Sales. Total net sales by segment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Collins Aerospace Systems $ 19,288 $ 26,028 $ 16,634 
Pratt & Whitney 16,799 20,902 19,402 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 10,841 — — 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 11,660 — — 
Total segment 58,588 46,930 36,036 
Eliminations and other (2,001) (1,581) (1,335)
Consolidated $ 56,587 $ 45,349 $ 34,701 
44
Table of Contents
Operating Profit (Loss). Operating profit (loss) by segment was as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Collins Aerospace Systems $ 1,466 $ 4,508 $ 2,397 
Pratt & Whitney (564) 1,801 1,402 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 1,014 — — 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 890 — — 
Total segment 2,806 6,309 3,799 
Eliminations and other (111) (140) (69)
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items (590) (367) (340)
FAS/CAS operating adjustment 1,106 — — 
Acquisition accounting adjustments (5,100) (888) (513)
Consolidated $ (1,889)$ 4,914 $ 2,877 
(1)    Acquisition accounting adjustments in 2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment loss in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins Aerospace
reporting units. Refer to “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” in Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information.
Included in segment operating profit are Estimate at Completion (EAC) adjustments, which relate to changes in operating profit
and margin due to revisions to total estimated revenues and costs at completion. These changes reflect improved or deteriorated
operating performance or award fee rates. For a full description of our EAC process, refer to “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and
Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K. Given that we have thousands of individual contracts and
given the types and complexity of the assumptions and estimates we must make on an on-going basis, we have both favorable and
unfavorable EAC adjustments. We had the following aggregate EAC adjustments for the periods presented:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Gross favorable $ 994 $ 419 $ 579 
Gross unfavorable (1,637) (488) (629)
Total net EAC adjustments $ (643)$ (69)$ (50)
As a result of the Raytheon Merger, RIS’s and RMD’s long-term contracts that are accounted for on a percentage of completion
basis, were reset to zero percent complete as of the merger date since only the unperformed portion of the contract at the merger
date represents an obligation of the Company. This has had the impact of reducing gross favorable and unfavorable EAC
adjustments for these segments in the short-term, with the exception of EAC adjustments related to loss reserves. The change in net
EAC adjustments of $574 million in 2020 compared 2019 was primarily due to an increase in net unfavorable EAC adjustments of
$544 million at Pratt & Whitney, principally due to the current economic and operating environment primarily driven by the
COVID-19 pandemic. Net EAC adjustments in 2019 were relatively consistent with 2018. Significant EAC adjustments in the
years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are discussed in each business segment’s discussion below. Refer to the individual
segment results for further information.
Defense Backlog and Defense Bookings. We believe defense backlog and defense bookings are relevant to an understanding of
management’s view of our defense operations’ performance. Our defense operations consist primarily of our RIS and RMD
businesses and operations in the defense businesses within our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney segments. Defense backlog
was approximately $67.3 billion and $22.3 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, out of total backlog, including
commercial, of $150.1 billion and $111.7 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Defense bookings were
approximately $31.2 billion, $16.9 billion and $14.1 billion for 2020, 2019 and 2018 respectively.
Defense backlog, which is equivalent to our remaining performance obligations for our defense contracts, represents the dollar
value of firm orders for which work has not been performed and excludes unexercised contract options and potential orders under
ordering-type contracts (e.g., IDIQ type contracts). Defense backlog is affected by changes in foreign exchange rates.
Defense bookings generally represent the dollar value of new external defense contracts awarded to us during the reporting period
and include firm orders for which funding has not been appropriated. We believe defense bookings are an important measure of
future performance for our defense operations and are an indicator of potential future changes in these operations’ total net sales,
because we cannot record revenues under a new contract without first having a booking in the current or a preceding period.
Defense bookings exclude unexercised contract options and potential orders under ordering-type contracts (e.g., IDIQ type
contracts), and are reduced for contract cancellations and terminations of bookings recognized in the current period. We reflect
contract cancellations and terminations from prior year bookings, as well as the impact of changes in foreign exchange rates,(1)
45
Table of Contents
directly as an adjustment to backlog in the period in which the cancellation or termination occurs and the impact is determinable.
Contract cancellations and terminations also include contract underruns on cost-type programs.
Defense bookings are impacted by the timing and amounts of awards in a given period, which are subject to numerous factors,
including: (1) the desired capability by the customer and urgency of customer needs, (2) customer budgets and other fiscal
constraints, (3) political and economic and other environmental factors, (4) the timing of customer negotiations, (5) the timing of
governmental approvals and notifications, and (6) the timing of option exercises or increases in scope. In addition, due to these
factors, quarterly bookings tend to fluctuate from period to period, particularly on a segment basis. As a result, we believe
comparing bookings on a quarterly basis or for periods less than one year is less meaningful than for longer periods and that shorter
term changes in bookings may not necessarily indicate a material trend.
Collins Aerospace Systems
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 20182020 compared
with 20192019 compared
with 2018
Net Sales $ 19,288 $ 26,028 $ 16,634 (26)% 56 %
Operating Profit 1,466 4,508 2,397 (67)% 88 %
Operating Profit Margins 7.6 % 17.3 % 14.4 %
2020 Compared with 2019
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicFX
TranslationAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net Sales $ (6,554)$ 15 $ (201)$ — $ — $ (6,740)
Operating Profit (3,598) (1)$ (12) (258) 827 (3,042)
2019 Compared with 2018
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicFX
TranslationAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net Sales $ 1,068 $ (72)$ 8,398 $ — $ — $ 9,394 
Operating Profit 47 32 2,005 58 (31) 2,111 
(1)    We provide the organic change in net sales and operating profit for our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney segments. We believe that these measures are
useful to investors because they provide transparency to the underlying performance of our business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. The
organic change excludes the effect of foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations; acquisitions and divestitures, net; restructuring costs and other significant
non-recurring and non-operational items. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
2020 Compared with 2019
The organic sales decrease of $6.6 billion in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily relates to lower commercial aerospace OEM sales of
$3.7 billion and lower commercial aerospace aftermarket sales of $3.4 billion, including declines across all aftermarket sales
channels. These reductions were primarily due to the current economic environment principally driven by the COVID-19
pandemic, which has resulted in lower flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization and commercial OEM deliveries. This decrease was
partially offset by higher military sales of $0.6 billion. Included in the organic sales decrease were lower commercial aerospace
OEM and aftermarket sales of approximately $1.0 billion related to the Boeing 737 Max program and fewer upgrades due to certain
regulatory mandates that were primarily completed in early 2020.
The organic profit decrease of $3.6 billion in 2020 compared to 2019 is primarily due to lower commercial aerospace operating
profit of $4.0 billion principally driven by the lower commercial aerospace OEM and aftermarket sales volume discussed above.
Included in the lower commercial OEM operating profit were $157 million of significant unfavorable adjustments principally
driven by the expected acceleration of fleet retirements of a certain aircraft. The decrease was partially offset by lower Research
and development expenses of $0.2 billion, which includes the impact of cost reduction initiatives. Included in the operating profit
decrease was $125 million of increased estimates of expected credit losses due to customer bankruptcies and additional allowances
for credit losses.
Included in organic profit in 2020 was other income of $72 million related to foreign government wage subsidies due to COVID-19
and $12 million related to the favorable impact of a contract related matter in the first quarter of 2020.(1)
(1)
46
Table of Contents
The decrease in net sales and operating profit due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily relates to the sale of our Collins
Aerospace military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses in the third quarter of 2020 as further discussed in “Note 2:
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
The increase in Other operating profit of $0.8 billion in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily relates to gains of $595 million on the
sales of the Collins Aerospace businesses discussed above, the absence of prior year amortization of inventory fair value step-up
associated with the Rockwell Acquisition of $181 million and the absence of a prior year loss on the sale of a business of
$25 million.
2019 Compared with 2018
The organic sales increase of $1.1 billion in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily reflects higher commercial aerospace aftermarket
sales of $0.8 billion and higher military sales of $0.4 billion, partially offset by lower commercial aerospace OEM sales of
$0.1 billion.
Organic profit in 2019 was relatively consistent compared to 2018. Included in the change in organic profit was higher commercial
aerospace margin contribution of $0.2 billion driven by the commercial aftermarket sales growth noted above partially offset by
lower commercial aerospace OEM margin contribution, and higher military margin contribution of $0.1 billion driven by the sales
growth noted above. This increase was partially offset by higher Selling, general and administrative expenses of $0.2 billion and
higher Research and development costs of $0.1 billion.
The increase in net sales and operating profit due to acquisitions / divestitures, net primarily relates to the acquisition of Rockwell
Collins in 2018 as further discussed in “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this
Form 10-K.
Pratt & Whitney
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 20182020 compared
with 20192019 compared
with 2018
Net Sales $ 16,799 $ 20,902$ 19,402 (20)% 8 %
Operating Profit (564) 1,801 1,402 (131)% 28 %
Operating Profit Margins (3.4)% 8.6 % 7.2 %
2020 Compared with 2019
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicFX
TranslationAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net Sales $ (4,080)$ (23)$ — $ — $ — $ (4,103)
Operating Profit (2,126) (5) — (47) (187) (2,365)
2019 Compared with 2018
 Factors Contributing to Total Change
(dollars in millions) OrganicFX
TranslationAcquisitions /
Divestitures, netRestructuring
Costs Other Total Change
Net Sales $ 1,576 $ (48)$ (28)$ — $ — $ 1,500 
Operating Profit 228 (7) (7) (140) 325 399 
(1)    We provide the organic change in net sales and operating profit for our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney segments. We believe that these measures are
useful to investors because they provide transparency to the underlying performance of our business, which allows for better year-over-year comparability. The
organic change excludes the effect of foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations; acquisitions and divestitures, net; restructuring costs and other significant
non-recurring and non-operational items. A reconciliation of these measures to reported U.S. GAAP amounts is provided in the table above.
(2)    For Pratt & Whitney only, the transactional impact of foreign exchange hedging at Pratt & Whitney Canada (P&WC) has been netted against the translational
foreign exchange impact for presentation purposes in the table above. For all other segments these foreign exchange transactional impacts are included within
the organic/operational caption in their respective tables. Due to its significance to Pratt & Whitney’s overall operating results, we believe it is useful to
segregate the foreign exchange transactional impact in order to clearly identify the underlying financial performance.
2020 Compared with 2019
The organic sales decrease of $4.1 billion in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily reflects lower commercial aftermarket sales of
$3.8 billion, due to a significant reduction in shop visits and related spare part sales, and lower commercial OEM sales of
$1.1 billion, primarily due to a significant reduction in commercial engine deliveries, all principally driven by the current(1) (2)
(1) (2)
47
Table of Contents
economic and operating environment primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic. These declines were partially offset by higher
military sales of $0.8 billion primarily driven by an increase in F135 engine sales and aftermarket growth on multiple platforms.
Included in the lower commercial aftermarket sales is a $0.4 billion impact to sales from the net unfavorable contract adjustments
discussed further below.    
The organic profit decrease of $2.1 billion in 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily driven by lower commercial aftermarket
operating profit of $2.4 billion driven by the sales volume decrease discussed above, unfavorable mix, a $334 million unfavorable
EAC adjustment on a commercial engine aftermarket contract due to lower estimated revenues driven by a change in the estimated
maintenance coverage period, an unfavorable EAC adjustment of $129 million related to lower estimated revenues due to the
restructuring of a customer contract, and $86 million related to an unfavorable EAC adjustment and increased allowances for
warranty for legacy fleet related retrofits. The decrease was also driven by higher Selling, general and administrative expenses of
$0.2 billion primarily driven by $257 million of increased estimates of expected credit losses due to customer bankruptcies and
additional allowances for credit losses. This decrease in organic profit was partially offset by lower Research and development
costs of $0.3 billion, which includes the impact of cost reduction initiatives, and other income of $153 million related to foreign
government wage subsidies due to COVID-19.
Included in organic profit was an increase in net unfavorable EAC adjustments of $544 million, which included the unfavorable
EAC adjustments discussed above and significant net unfavorable EAC adjustments of $62 million based on a portfolio review of
our commercial aftermarket programs in the second quarter of 2020 in consideration of the estimated lower flight hours, a change
in the estimated number of shop visits and the related amount of estimated costs. Also included was an unfavorable EAC
adjustment of $44 million in the second quarter of 2020 on a military program primarily driven by a shift in estimated overhead
costs due to the lower commercial engine activity discussed above.
The decrease in Other operating profit of $187 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily due to an $89 million impairment
of commercial aircraft program assets in the current year and $43 million of reserves related to a commercial financing
arrangement in the current year.
2019 Compared with 2018
The organic sales increase of $1.6 billion primarily reflects higher military sales of $0.8 billion, higher commercial OEM sales of
$0.5 billion, and higher commercial aftermarket sales of $0.2 billion.
The organic profit increase of $0.2 billion was primarily driven by higher military margin contribution of $0.2 billion, driven by the
sales increase noted above and higher commercial OEM margin contribution of $0.1 billion primarily driven by continued year-
over-year cost reduction and favorable mix on large commercial engine shipments. These increases were partially offset by higher
Research and development costs and Selling, general and administrative expenses of $0.1 billion.
The $0.3 billion increase in Other operating profit primarily reflects the absence of a 2018 customer contract settlement.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 20182020 compared
with 20192019 compared
with 2018
Net Sales $ 10,841 — — NM NM
Operating Profit 1,014 — — NM NM
Operating Profit Margins 9.4 % — — 
Bookings $ 10,243 — — NM NM
NM = Not meaningful
The increase in net sales of $10,841 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020.
The increase in operating profit of $1,014 million and the related increase in operating profit margins in 2020 compared to 2019
was due to the Raytheon Merger. Included in operating profit in 2020 were $124 million of unfavorable EAC adjustments for loss
reserves related to a domestic classified fixed price development program in a net loss position, of which $87 million was recorded
in the fourth quarter of 2020.
Backlog and Bookings– Backlog was $18,676 million at December 31, 2020 compared to zero at December 31, 2019. The increase
in backlog of $18,676 million was due to the Raytheon Merger. In 2020, RIS booked $3,294 million on a number of classified
contracts, $236 million to produce and deliver Silent Knight radar systems and spares for the U.S. Special Operations Command,
$229 million to perform operations and sustainment for the U.S. Air Force’s Launch and Test Range System (LTRS), $201 million
on the Development, Operations and Maintenance (DOMino) cyber program for the Department of
48
Table of Contents
Homeland Security (DHS), $193 million on the Global Aircrew Strategic Network Terminal (Global ASNT) program for the U.S.
Air Force, and $157 million for the Military GPS User Equipment Increment 2 Miniature Serial Interface Receiver Card (MGUE
INC 2 MSI) program for the U.S. Air Force.
Raytheon Missiles & Defense
% Change
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 20182020 compared
with 20192019 compared
with 2018
Net Sales $ 11,660 — — NM NM
Operating Profit 890 — — NM NM
Operating Profit Margins 7.6 % — — 
Bookings $ 10,041 — — NM NM
NM = Not meaningful
The increase in net sales of $11,660 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020.
The increase in operating profit of $890 million and the related increase in operating profit margins in 2020 compared to 2019 was
due to the Raytheon Merger. Included in operating profit in 2020 was an unfavorable net impact of $516 million related to certain
international contracts as further described below, and a $25 million net favorable EAC adjustment due to a revised estimate in
costs to complete an industrial cooperation agreement obligation on multiple contracts for an international customer based upon an
agreement signed in the fourth quarter of 2020.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, RMD reversed $119 million of sales for work performed subsequent to the date of the Raytheon
Merger through the end of the third quarter of 2020, and the related operating profit, on our direct commercial sales contracts for
precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, for which we have not yet obtained regulatory approval. As
discussed in the “Other Matters” subsection of the “Business Overview” section above, due to the recent U.S. presidential and
congressional election and the resulting uncertainty surrounding U.S. foreign policy on direct commercial sales for precision guided
munitions with this customer, we determined that it is no longer probable that we will be able to obtain regulatory approvals for
these contracts. RMD also recognized an unfavorable profit impact of $516 million related to these contracts, primarily related to
inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and recognition of supplier related obligations related to termination liability, which
we now do not expect to be utilized or otherwise directed to other customers. In addition, we reversed $755 million of backlog on
these contracts.
Backlog and Bookings– Backlog was $29,593 million at December 31, 2020 compared to zero at December 31, 2019. The increase
in backlog of $29,593 million was due to the Raytheon Merger. In 2020, RMD booked $2,426 million on the Army
Navy/Transportable Radar Surveillance-Model 2 (AN/TPY-2) radar program for the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia (KSA), $351 million
for Standard Missile-3 (SM-3) for the Missile Defense Agency (MDA) and an international customer, $340 million for
StormBreaker for the U.S. Air Force, $268 million for the AN/TPY-2 radar sustainment program for the MDA, and $237 million
for Tube-launched, Optically-tracked, Wireless-guided (TOW) missiles for the U.S. Army and international customers. RMD also
booked $1,503 million on a number of classified contracts, including $354 million on a major contract. In 2020, RMD recorded a
backlog adjustment of $755 million on certain international contracts as discussed above.
Eliminations and other
Eliminations and other reflects the elimination of sales, other income and operating profit transacted between segments, as well as
the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments, including Forcepoint, LLC, which was acquired as part of
the Raytheon Merger and subsequently disposed of in January 2021, as further discussed in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions,
Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
 Net Sales Operating Profit
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Inter-segment eliminations $ (2,528)$ (1,594)$ (1,347)$ (83)$ (208)$ (181)
Other non-reportable segments 527 13 12 (28) 68 112 
Eliminations and other $ (2,001)$ (1,581)$ (1,335)$ (111)$ (140)$ (69)
The increase in inter-segment eliminations sales in 2020 compared to 2019, was primarily due to the Raytheon Merger on April 3,
2020.
49
Table of Contents
The increase in other non-reportable segment sales in 2020 compared to 2019, was primarily related to Forcepoint sales.
The decrease in other non-reportable segments operating profit in 2020 compared to 2019, was primarily due to the impact of
foreign currency translation, partially offset by operating profit related to Forcepoint.
Other non-reportable segment sales in 2019 were relatively consistent with 2018.
The decrease in other non-reportable segments operating profit in 2019 compared to 2018, was primarily due to the impact of
foreign currency translation.
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items consists of costs and certain other unallowable corporate costs not considered part
of management’s evaluation of reportable segment operating performance including restructuring and merger costs related to the
Raytheon Merger, net costs associated with corporate research and development, including the Lower Tier Air and Missile Defense
Sensor (LTAMDS) program which was acquired as part of the Raytheon Merger, and certain reserves. See Restructuring Costs,
above, for a more detailed discussion of our restructuring costs.
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items $ (590)$ (367)$ (340)
The change in Corporate expenses and other unallocated items of $223 million for 2020 compared to 2019 was primarily driven by
increased restructuring costs of $201 million, $130 million of net expenses related to the LTAMDS project acquired as part of the
Raytheon Merger and an increase in merger-related costs for the Raytheon Merger of $82 million, partially offset by $40 million of
merger-related costs for the Rockwell Acquisition in 2019 and other unallocated items with no individual or common significant
driver.
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items in 2019 was relatively consistent with 2018. Included in the change were merger-
related costs for the Raytheon Merger of $83 million in 2019 and a decrease in merger-related costs for the Rockwell Acquisition of
$78 million.
FAS/CAS operating adjustment
The segment results of RIS and RMD only include pension and PRB expense as determined under U.S. government CAS, which
we generally recover through the pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government. The difference between our CAS
expense and the FAS service cost attributable to these segments under U.S. GAAP is the FAS/CAS operating adjustment. The
FAS/CAS operating adjustment results in consolidated pension expense in operating profit equal to the service cost component of
FAS expense under U.S. GAAP. The segment results of Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney include FAS service cost.
The pension and PRB components of the FAS/CAS operating adjustment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
FAS service cost (expense) $ (354)$ — $ — 
CAS expense 1,460 — — 
FAS/CAS operating adjustment $ 1,106 $ — $ — 
The change in our FAS/CAS operating adjustment of $1,106 million in 2020 compared to 2019 was due to the Raytheon Merger on
April 3, 2020.
Acquisition accounting adjustments
Acquisition accounting adjustments include the amortization of acquired intangible assets related to acquisitions, the amortization
of the property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment acquired through acquisitions and the amortization of customer
contractual obligations related to loss making or below market contracts acquired. These adjustments are not considered part of
management’s evaluation of segment results.
50
Table of Contents
The components of Acquisition accounting adjustments were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Goodwill impairment charge $ (3,183)$ — $ — 
Amortization of acquired intangibles (2,142) (1,211) (689)
Amortization of property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment (69) (23) (76)
Amortization of customer contractual obligations related to acquired loss-
making and below-market contracts 294 346 252 
Acquisition accounting adjustments $ (5,100)$ (888)$ (513)
Acquisition accounting adjustments related to acquisitions in each segment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Collins Aerospace Systems $ (3,926)$ (605)$ (235)
Pratt & Whitney (117) (283) (278)
Raytheon Intelligence & Space (394) — — 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense (607) — — 
Total segment (5,044) (888) (513)
Eliminations and other (56) — — 
Acquisition accounting adjustments $ (5,100)$ (888)$ (513)
The change in the Acquisition accounting adjustments of $4,212 million in 2020 compared to 2019, is primarily driven by the
$3.2 billion goodwill impairment in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins Aerospace reporting units and an increase of
$1.1 billion related to the Raytheon Merger, primarily related to the amortization of acquired intangibles. Refer to “Note 2:
Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional information on the
goodwill impairment.
The change in the Acquisition accounting adjustments of $375 million in 2019 compared to 2018, is primarily driven by a change
of $370 million at Collins Aerospace primarily related to the Rockwell Acquisition.
LIQUIDITY AND FINANCIAL CONDITION
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Cash and cash equivalents $ 8,802 $ 4,937 
Total debt 31,823 43,252 
Total equity 73,852 44,231 
Total capitalization (total debt plus total equity) 105,675 87,483 
Total debt to total capitalization 30 % 49 %
We assess our liquidity in terms of our ability to generate cash to fund our operating, investing and financing activities. Our
principal source of liquidity is cash flows from operating activities. In addition to operating cash flows, other significant factors that
affect our overall management of liquidity include: capital expenditures, customer financing requirements, investments in
businesses, dividends, common stock repurchases, pension funding, access to the commercial paper markets, adequacy of available
bank lines of credit, redemptions of debt and the ability to attract long-term capital at satisfactory terms. We had $6.84 billion
available under our various credit facilities at December 31, 2020.
As discussed above in Business Overview, in response to the COVID-19, we have taken actions to preserve capital and protect the
long-term needs of our business. Although our business has been and will continue to be significantly impacted by COVID-19, we
currently believe we have sufficient liquidity to withstand the potential impacts.
The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (CARES Act), along with earlier issued IRS guidance, provides for a net
deferral of payroll tax payments. We did not realize any cash flows benefit in 2020, and do not expect an impact to future years’
cash flows, from a net deferral of payroll tax payments. In addition, deferrals of required estimated federal, foreign and state
income tax payments due to the CARES Act and other similar state and foreign stimulus incentives only impacted the timing of
these payments within the year. The CARES Act, among other things, also contains numerous other provisions which may impact
us. We continue to refine our understanding of the impact of the CARES Act on our business, and ongoing government guidance
related to COVID-19 that may be issued. We may be entitled to recovery for certain costs through the
51
Table of Contents
pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government; however, we do not believe these costs are probable of recovery at this
time, and therefore, have not assumed any recovery within our EACs.
At December 31, 2020, we had cash and cash equivalents of $8.8 billion, of which approximately 45% was held by RTC’s foreign
subsidiaries. We manage our worldwide cash requirements by reviewing available funds among the many subsidiaries through
which we conduct our business and the cost effectiveness with which those funds can be accessed. The Company no longer intends
to reinvest certain undistributed earnings of its international subsidiaries that have been previously taxed in the U.S. As such, we
recorded the taxes associated with the future remittance of these earnings. For the remainder of the Company’s undistributed
international earnings, unless tax effective to repatriate, RTC will continue to permanently reinvest these earnings. We repatriated
$2.3 billion and $1.6 billion of cash for the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
On occasion, we are required to maintain cash deposits with certain banks with respect to contractual obligations related to
acquisitions or divestitures or other legal obligations. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the amount of such restricted cash was
$30 million and $24 million respectively.
Historically, our strong credit ratings and financial position have enabled us to issue long-term debt at favorable market rates.
As of December 31, 2020, our maximum commercial paper borrowing limit was $5.0 billion as the commercial paper is backed by
our $5.0 billion revolving credit agreement. We had $160 million of commercial paper borrowings as of December 31, 2020. The
maximum amount of short-term commercial paper borrowings outstanding at any point in time during the year ended December 31,
2020 was $1,904 million. We use our commercial paper borrowings for general corporate purposes, including the funding of
potential acquisitions, pension contributions, debt refinancing, dividend payments and repurchases of our common stock. The
commercial paper notes outstanding have original maturities of not more than 90 days from the date of issuance.
In preparation for and in anticipation of the Separation Transactions, the Distributions and the Raytheon Merger, the Company
entered into and terminated a number of credit agreements. Refer to “Note 10: Borrowings and Lines of Credit” within Item 8 of
this Form 10-K for additional information.
On March 16, 2020, we entered into a revolving credit agreement with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $5.0
billion which became available upon completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. This credit agreement matures on April
3, 2025. On May 6, 2020, we entered into a revolving credit agreement with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up
to $2.0 billion. This credit agreement matures on May 5, 2021. As of December 31, 2020, we had revolving credit agreements with
various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $7.0 billion, and there were no borrowings outstanding under these
agreements.
We have an existing universal shelf registration statement, which we filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) on
September 27, 2019, for an indeterminate amount of debt and equity securities for future issuance, subject to our internal
limitations on the amount of debt to be issued under this shelf registration statement.
The Company has offered a voluntary supply chain finance (SCF) program with a global financial institution for more than 10
years, which enables our suppliers, at their sole discretion, to sell their receivables from the Company to the financial institution at
a rate that leverages our credit rating, which might be beneficial to them. Our suppliers’ participation in the SCF program does not
impact or change our terms and conditions with those suppliers, and therefore, we have no economic interest in a supplier’s
decision to participate in the program. In addition, we provide no guarantees or otherwise pay for any of the costs of the program
incurred by those suppliers that choose to participate, and have no direct financial relationship with the financial institution, as it
relates to the program. As such, amounts due to suppliers that have elected to participate in the SCF program are included in
Accounts payable on our Consolidated Balance Sheet and all payment activity related to amounts due to suppliers that elected to
participate in the SCF program are reflected in cash flows from operating activities in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flow. As
of December 31, 2020, and December 31, 2019, the amount due to suppliers participating in the SCF program and included in
Accounts payable was approximately $394 million and $460 million, respectively. The decrease from December 31, 2019 to
December 31, 2020 is due to decreases in our underlying supply chain purchases. The SCF program does not impact our overall
liquidity.
We believe our future operating cash flows will be sufficient to meet our future operating cash needs. Further, we continue to have
access to the commercial paper markets and our existing credit facilities, and our ability to obtain debt or equity financing, as well
as the availability under committed credit lines, provides additional potential sources of liquidity should they be required or
appropriate.
52
Table of Contents
Cash Flow—Operating Activities
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net cash flows provided by operating activities from continuing operations $ 4,334 $ 5,821 $ 2,670 
Net cash flows (used in) provided by operating activities from discontinued operations (728) 3,062 3,652 
2020 Compared with 2019 - Continuing Operations
Cash generated from operating activities in 2020 was $1,487 million lower than 2019. This decrease is primarily due to a decrease
in net income after adjustments for depreciation and amortization, the 2020 goodwill impairment charge, the deferred income tax
provision, stock compensation costs and net periodic pension and other post retirement (income) expense of $1,950 million
primarily driven by a decrease at Pratt & Whitney and Collins Aerospace as a result of the current economic environment primarily
driven by COVID-19, partially offset by net income from RIS and RMD following the Raytheon Merger. Included in the decrease
in operating cash flows was an increase in pension contributions, as further discussed below, and an unfavorable impact from
accounts payable primarily at Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney due to a decline in volume principally driven by the current
economic environment primarily driven by COVID-19, which was partially offset by a favorable change in inventory at Collins
Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney due to the decline in volume and a favorable change in accounts receivable and contract assets due
to the timing of billings and collections in 2020 across our segments.
The Company enters into various factoring agreements with third-party financial institutions to sell certain of its receivables.
Factoring activity resulted in a decrease of approximately $1.6 billion in cash flows from operating activities during the year ended
December 31, 2020, as compared to the prior year. This decrease in factoring activity was driven by a decrease in factoring levels at
Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney primarily driven by lower sales volume.
2019 Compared with 2018 - Continuing Operations
Cash generated from operating activities in 2019 was $3.2 billion higher than 2018. The increase is largely driven by an increase in
Net income after adjustments for depreciation and amortization, the deferred income tax provision, stock compensation costs, and
the net periodic pension and other postretirement (income) expense of $2.3 billion and an increase in other long term assets and
liabilities cash flows of $1.1 billion, partially offset by a decrease in working capital cash flows of $0.7 billion.
Factoring activity resulted in a decrease of approximately $200 million in cash generated from operating activities during the year
ended December 31, 2019, as compared to the prior year. This decrease in factoring activity was primarily driven by a decrease in
factoring levels at Pratt & Whitney, partially offset by an increase at Collins Aerospace.
We make both required and discretionary contributions to our pension plans. Required contributions are primarily determined by
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) funding rules, which require us to fully fund our U.S qualified
pension plans over a rolling seven-year period as determined annually based on the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (PPA)
calculated funded status at the beginning of each year. The funding requirements are primarily based on the year’s expected service
cost and amortization of other previously unfunded liabilities, which are dependent upon many factors, including returns on
invested assets, the level of market interest rates and actuarial assumptions. We can contribute cash or RTC shares to our plans at
our discretion, subject to applicable regulations. As of December 31, 2020, the total investment by the U.S. qualified pension plans
in RTC shares was less than 1% of total plan assets.
We made the following contributions to our U.S. qualified and international defined benefit and PRB plans’ trusts during the years
ended December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
U.S. qualified defined benefit plans $ 885 $ 25 $ — 
International defined benefit plans 125 30 79 
PRB plans 15 — — 
Total $ 1,025 $ 55 $ 79 
The contributions to our U.S. qualified defined benefit plans for the year ended December 31, 2020 include a $750 million
discretionary contribution to the Raytheon Company U.S. qualified pension plans’ trust. As a result of this discretionary
contribution, we do not expect to make any required contributions to our U.S. qualified plans’ trust until 2022.
The contributions to our International defined benefit plans for the year ended December 31, 2020 include a $51 million
discretionary contribution. We expect to make total contributions of approximately $50 million to our international defined benefit
plans’ trusts in 2021, which are expected to meet or exceed the current funding requirements.
53
Table of Contents
Global pension and PRB cash funding requirements are expected to be $370 million, $850 million and $750 million in 2021, 2022
and 2023, respectively, which includes benefit payments to be paid directly by the company.
Operating Activities - Discontinued Operations
The $3,790 million decrease in cash flows provided by operating activities from discontinued operations in 2020 compared to 2019
primarily relates to a decrease in net income from discontinued operations driven by the absence of operating activity for the
majority of the year, as the Separation Transactions occurred on April 3, 2020. The $590 million decrease in cash flows provided by
operating activities from discontinued operations in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily relates to a decrease in net income from
discontinued operations, partially offset by an increase in working capital cash inflows.
Cash Flow—Investing Activities
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net cash flows provided by (used in) investing activities from continuing operations $ 3,343 $(2,676)$(17,259)
Net cash flows (used in) provided by investing activities from discontinued operations (241) (416) 286 
Our investing activities primarily include capital expenditures, cash investments in customer financing assets,
investments/dispositions of businesses, payments related to our collaboration intangible assets and contractual rights to provide
product on new aircraft platforms, and settlements of derivative contracts not designated as hedging instruments.
2020 Compared with 2019 - Continuing Operations
The $6.0 billion increase in cash flows used in investing activities in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily relates to cash acquired in
the Raytheon Merger of $3.2 billion, the sale of our Collins Aerospace military GPS and space-based precision optics businesses
for a combined $2.3 billion in gross cash proceeds and a net increase in the source of cash from customer financing assets of $747
million, partially offset by an increase in cash outflows resulting from the Blue Canyon Technologies acquisition of $419 million.
Additions to property, plant and equipment were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Additions to property, plant and equipment $(1,795)$(1,868)$(1,467)
Capital expenditures decreased by $73 million in 2020 compared to 2019 as reductions at Collins Aerospace of $321 million and
Pratt & Whitney of $257 million were largely offset by increased capital expenditures driven by the Raytheon Merger.
Dispositions of businesses in 2020 of $2,556 million primarily related to the sale of our Collins Aerospace military GPS and space-
based precision optics businesses for a combined $2.3 billion in gross cash proceeds.
Increases to customer financing assets is primarily driven by additional Geared Turbofan engines to support customer fleets and
was a use of cash of $280 million and $787 million in 2020 and 2019, respectively. The decline within increases to customer
financing assets is due to fewer engines added in 2020 compared to 2019. The decrease in customer financing assets which
provided a source of cash of $368 million in 2020 compared to $128 million in 2019 is driven by a sale and leaseback transaction
for the sale of equipment in 2020. Refer to “Note 12: Leases” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional discussion of the sale
lease-back transaction.
In 2020, we increased our collaboration intangible assets by approximately $172 million, which primarily relates to payments made
under our 2012 agreement to acquire Rolls-Royce’s collaboration interests in International Aero Engines AG (IAE).
At December 31, 2020, we had commercial aerospace financing and other contractual commitments, including exclusivity and
collaboration payments of approximately $13.4 billion. Refer to “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this
Form 10-K for further details on our commercial aerospace financing and other contractual commitments.
As discussed in “Note 15: Financial Instruments” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, we enter into derivative instruments primarily
for risk management purposes, including derivatives designated as hedging instruments under the Derivatives and Hedging Topic of
the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) and those utilized as economic
hedges. We operate internationally and in the normal course of business, are exposed to fluctuations in interest rates, foreign
exchange rates and commodity prices. These fluctuations can increase the costs of financing, investing and operating the business.
We have used derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options to manage certain foreign currency, interest
rate and commodity price exposures. During the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had net cash receipts of
approximately $32 million and $342 million, respectively, from the settlement of these derivative instruments not designated as
hedging instruments.
54
Table of Contents
In October 2020, we entered into a definitive agreement to sell our Forcepoint business, which we completed in January 2021, for
$1.1 billion in cash.
In December 2020, we completed the acquisition of Blue Canyon Technologies, a leading provider of small satellites and spacecraft
systems components, for $426 million, net of cash received. Blue Canyon Technologies is reported in the Raytheon Intelligence &
Space segment.
2019 Compared with 2018 - Continuing Operations
The $14.6 billion decrease in cash flows used in investing activities in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily relates to the absence of
cash paid to acquire Rockwell Collins of $14.9 billion in November 2018.
Capital expenditures of $1.9 billion for 2019 increased $401 million from 2018. This increase primarily relates to several projects
at Collins Aerospace and investments in production and aftermarket capacity at Pratt & Whitney.
Dispositions of businesses in 2019 of $134 million primarily consisted of the businesses sold in connection with the Rockwell
Acquisition.
Increases to customer financing assets is primarily driven by additional Geared Turbofan engines to support customer fleets and
was a use of cash of $787 million and $988 million in 2019 and 2018, respectively. The decrease in the source of cash related to
customer financing assets of $128 million in 2019 compared to $604 million in 2018 is driven by lower repayments on customer
financing.
In 2019, we increased our collaboration intangible assets by approximately $351 million, which primarily relates to payments made
under our 2012 agreement to acquire Rolls-Royce’s collaboration interests in IAE.
Investing Activities - Discontinued Operations
The $175 million increase in cash flows used in investing activities from discontinued operations in 2020 compared to 2019
primarily relates to a reduction in capital expenditures at Carrier and Otis of approximately $300 million, partially offset by a
reduction in investment cash of approximately $135 million. The $702 million decrease in cash flows provided by investing
activities from discontinued operations in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily relates to the absence of $1.0 billion in proceeds from
the sale of Taylor Company in June 2018 by Carrier, partially offset by a decrease in business acquisition activity.
Cash Flow—Financing Activities
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net cash flows (used in) provided by financing activities from continuing operations $(3,860)$(1,913)$12,209 
Net cash flows used in financing activities from discontinued operations (1,414) (2,651) (4,244)
Our financing activities primarily include the issuance and repayment of short-term and long-term debt, payment of dividends and
stock repurchases.
2020 Compared with 2019 - Continuing Operations
Financing activities were a cash outflow of $3.9 billion in 2020 compared to a cash outflow of $1.9 billion in 2019. This change is
driven by increases in long-term debt repayments of $13.4 billion, a $4.4 billion change in net cash transfers to discontinued
operations, an increase in short-term borrowing repayments of $2.9 billion, and an increase in dividends paid on common stock of
$0.3 billion, partially offset by an increase in long-term debt issuances of $19.2 billion. The 2020 debt issuances reflect debt
incurred by Carrier and Otis of approximately $6 billion and $11 billion, respectively. The net proceeds of these issuances and
draws were primarily utilized by UTC to extinguish Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt in order to not exceed
the maximum applicable net indebtedness required by the Raytheon Merger Agreement.
At December 31, 2020, management had remaining authority to repurchase approximately $5.0 billion of our common stock under
the December 7, 2020 share repurchase program. Under this program, shares may be purchased on the open market, in privately
negotiated transactions, under accelerated share repurchase programs, and under plans complying with Rules 10b5-1 and 10b-18
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. We may also reacquire shares outside of the program from time to time in
connection with the surrender of shares to cover taxes on vesting of restricted stock and as required under our employee savings
plan. We expect to engage in share repurchase activity in 2021. Our ability to repurchase shares is subject to applicable law.
2019 Compared with 2018 - Continuing Operations
Financing activities was a cash outflow of $1.9 billion in 2019 compared to a cash inflow of $12.2 billion in 2018. This change is
driven by the absence of $13.4 billion of long-term debt issuances in the prior year which was primarily utilized to fund the
55
Table of Contents
Rockwell Acquisition, an increase in dividends paid on common stock of $0.3 billion and an increase in debt repayments of $0.2
billion, partially offset by an increase in short term borrowings of $1.3 billion and a reduction in common stock repurchases of $0.2
billion.
Our share repurchases were as follows for the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions; shares in thousands) 2020 2019 2018
$ Shares $ Shares $ Shares
Shares of Common Stock repurchased $ 47 330 $ 151 1,133 $ 325 2,727 
Our Board of Directors authorized the following cash dividends for the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Dividends per share of Common Stock $ 2.160 $ 2.940 $ 2.840 
Total dividends paid $ 2,732 $ 2,442 $ 2,170 
On February 6, 2021, the Board of Directors declared a dividend of $0.475 per share payable March 25, 2021 to shareowners of
record at the close of business on February 26, 2021.
We had the following issuances of long-term debt during 2020 and 2018, which is inclusive of issuances made by Carrier and Otis
which were primarily used by the Company to extinguish certain Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt and,
therefore, were treated as a distribution from discontinued operations within financing activities from continuing operation on our
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows:
Issuance Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
May 18, 2020 2.250% notes due 2030 $ 1,000 
3.125% notes due 2050 $ 1,000 
March 27, 2020 Term Loan due 2023 (Otis) $ 1,000 
Term Loan due 2023 (Carrier) $ 1,750 
February 27, 2020 1.923% notes due 2023 $ 500 
LIBOR plus 0.450% floating rate notes due 2023 $ 500 
2.056% notes due 2025 $ 1,300 
2.242% notes due 2025 $ 2,000 
2.293% notes due 2027 $ 500 
2.493% notes due 2027 $ 1,250 
2.565% notes due 2030 $ 1,500 
2.722% notes due 2030 $ 2,000 
3.112% notes due 2040 $ 750 
3.377% notes due 2040 $ 1,500 
3.362% notes due 2050 $ 750 
3.577% notes due 2050 $ 2,000 
August 16, 2018 3.350% notes due 2021 $ 1,000 
3.650% notes due 2023 $ 2,250 
3.950% notes due 2025 $ 1,500 
4.125% notes due 2028 $ 3,000 
4.450% notes due 2038 $ 750 
4.625% notes due 2048 $ 1,750 
LIBOR plus 0.65% floating rate notes due 2021 $ 750 
May 18, 2018 1.150% notes due 2024 € 750 
2.150% notes due 2030 $ 500 
EURIBOR plus 0.20% floating rate notes due 2020 $ 750 
(1)    The debt issuances and term loan draws reflect debt incurred by Carrier and Otis. The net proceeds of these issuances were primarily utilized to extinguish
Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt in order to not exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness required by the Raytheon Merger
Agreement.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
 (2)
 (2)
(3)
(2)
(4)
(4)
(4)
56
Table of Contents
(2)    The net proceeds received from these debt issuances were used to partially finance the cash consideration portion of the purchase price for Rockwell Collins
and fees, expenses and other amounts related to the Rockwell Acquisition.
(3)    The net proceeds from these debt issuances were used to fund the repayment of commercial paper and for other general corporate purposes.
(4)    The net proceeds received from these debt issuances were used for general corporate purposes.
We had no issuances of long-term debt during 2019.
We made the following repayments of debt during 2020, 2019 and 2018:
Repayment Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
October 15, 2020 3.125% notes due 2020 $ 1,000 
May 19, 2020 3.650% notes due 2023 $ 410 
May 15, 2020EURIBOR plus 0.20% floating rate notes due 2020 (€750 million principal
value) $ 817 
March 29, 2020 4.500% notes due 2020 $ 1,250 
1.125% notes due 2021 (€950 million principal value) $ 1,082 
1.250% notes due 2023 (€750 million principal value) $ 836 
1.150% notes due 2024 (€750 million principal value) $ 841 
1.875% notes due 2026 (€500 million principal value) $ 567 
March 3, 2020 1.900% notes due 2020 $ 1,000 
3.350% notes due 2021 $ 1,000 
LIBOR plus 0.650% floating rate notes due 2021 $ 750 
1.950% notes due 2021 $ 750 
2.300% notes due 2022 $ 500 
3.100% notes due 2022 $ 2,300 
2.800% notes due 2024 $ 800 
March 2, 2020 4.875% notes due 2020 $ 171 
February 28, 2020 3.650% notes due 2023 $ 1,669 
2.650% notes due 2026 $ 431 
November 15, 2019 8.875% notes $ 271 
November 13, 2019 EURIBOR plus 0.15% floating rate notes € 750 
November 1, 2019 LIBOR plus 0.350% floating rate notes $ 350 
1.500% notes $ 650 
July 15, 2019 1.950% notes $ 300 
5.250% notes $ 300 
December 14, 2018 Variable-rate term loan due 2020 (1 month LIBOR plus 1.25%) $ 482 
May 4, 2018 1.778% junior subordinated notes $ 1,100 
February 22, 2018 EURIBOR plus 0.80% floating rate notes € 750 
February 1, 2018 6.80% notes $ 99 
(1)    These notes were assumed in connection with the Raytheon Merger and subsequently repaid.
(2)    In connection with the early repayment of outstanding principal, Raytheon Technologies recorded debt extinguishment costs of $703 million for the year ended
December 31, 2020, which are classified as discontinued operations in our Consolidated Statement of Operations as we would not have had to redeem the debt,
except for the Separation Transactions. No proceeds of the notes issued May 18, 2020 were used to fund the May 19, 2020 redemption.
(3)    Extinguishment of Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt in order to not exceed the maximum net indebtedness required by the Raytheon
Merger Agreement.
(4)    These notes were assumed in connection with the Rockwell Collins Acquisition and subsequently repaid.
Financing Activities - Discontinued Operations
The $1.2 billion decrease in cash flows used in financing activities from discontinued operations in 2020 compared to 2019
primarily relates to $703 million of debt extinguishment costs related to the early repayment of debt in 2020 and cash distributions
made to Carrier and Otis of $2.8 billion, which were more than offset by a change in net transfer activity of $4.5 billion. The $1.6
billion decrease in cash flows used in financing activities from discontinued operations in 2019 compared to 2018 primarily relates
to the change in net transfers to continuing operations.(1)
(2)(3)
(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(4)
(4)
(4)
57
Table of Contents
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES
Preparation of our financial statements requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Management believes the most complex and sensitive judgments, because of their
significance to the Consolidated Financial Statements, result primarily from the need to make estimates about the effects of matters
that are inherently uncertain. The most significant areas involving management judgments and estimates are described below.
Actual results in these areas could differ from management’s estimates.
Long-Term Contract Accounting. We recognize revenue on an over-time basis for substantially all defense contracts and certain
long-term aerospace aftermarket contracts. We measure progress toward completion of these contracts on a percentage of
completion basis, using costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion. Incurred costs represent work
performed, which correspond with and best depict transfer of control to the customer. Contract costs are incurred over a period of
time, which can be several years, and the estimation of these costs requires management’s judgment. We review our Estimate at
Completion (EACs) on significant contracts on a periodic basis and for others, no less than annually or when a change in
circumstances warrant a modification to a previous estimate. Due to the nature of the work required to be performed on many of the
Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex, subject to many variables
and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. As part of this process, management reviews
information including, but not limited to, any outstanding key contract matters, progress towards completion and the related
program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of revenues and costs. The risks and
opportunities relate to management’s judgment about the ability and cost to achieve the schedule, consideration of customer-
directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels, such as flight hours or
aircraft landings, and related variable consideration. Management’s judgment related to these considerations has become
increasingly more significant given the current economic environment primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic. Management
must make assumptions and estimates regarding contract revenue and costs, including estimates of labor productivity and
availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed, the availability and cost of materials, the length of time to
complete the performance obligation, execution by our subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from our customer,
overhead cost rates, and current and past maintenance cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and
estimated useful lives of components, among others. In particular, fixed-price development programs involve significant
management judgment, as development contracts by nature have elements that have not been done before and thus, are highly
subject to future unexpected cost growth. Cost estimates may also include the estimated cost of satisfying our industrial cooperation
agreements, sometimes in the form of either offset obligations or in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements, required
under certain contracts primarily within our RIS and RMD segments. These obligations may or may not be distinct depending on
their nature. If cash is paid to a customer to satisfy our offset obligations it is recorded as a reduction in the transaction price.
Changes in estimates of net sales, cost of sales and the related impact to operating profit are recognized on a cumulative catch-up
basis, which recognizes the cumulative effect of the profit changes on current and prior periods based on a performance obligation’s
percentage of completion in the current period. A significant change in one or more of these estimates could affect the profitability
of one or more of our performance obligations. Our EAC adjustments also include the establishment of loss provisions on our
contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis.
Net EAC adjustments had the following impact on our operating results:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Operating profit (loss) $ (643)$ (69)$ (50)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common
shareowners (508) (55) (40)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable to
common shareowners $ (0.37)$ (0.06)$ (0.05)
(1)    Amounts reflect a U.S. statutory tax rate of 21%, which approximates our tax rate on our EAC adjustments.
As a result of the Raytheon Merger, Raytheon Company’s contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis were reset to
zero percent complete as of the merger date, since only the unperformed portion of the contract at the merger date represents the
obligation of the Company. For additional information related to the Raytheon Merger, see “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions,
Goodwill and Intangible Assets” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Costs incurred for engineering and development of aerospace products under contracts with customers are capitalized as contract
fulfillment costs, to the extent recoverable from the associated contract margin and customer funding, and subsequently amortized
as the OEM products are delivered to the customer. The estimation of contract margin requires management’s judgment. We
regularly assess capitalized contract fulfillment costs for impairment.(1)
(1)
58
Table of Contents
Income Taxes. Management believes that our earnings during the periods when the temporary differences become deductible will
be sufficient to realize the related future income tax benefits, which may be realized over an extended period of time. For those
jurisdictions where the expiration date of tax carryforwards or the projected operating results indicate that realization is not likely, a
valuation allowance is provided.
In assessing the need for a valuation allowance, we estimate future taxable income, considering the feasibility of ongoing tax
planning strategies and the realizability of tax loss carryforwards. Valuation allowances related to deferred tax assets can be
affected by changes to tax laws, changes to statutory tax rates and future taxable income levels. In the event we were to determine
that we would not be able to realize all or a portion of our deferred tax assets in the future, we would reduce such amounts through
an increase to tax expense in the period in which that determination is made or when tax law changes are enacted. Conversely, if we
were to determine that we would be able to realize our deferred tax assets in the future in excess of the net carrying amounts, we
would decrease the recorded valuation allowance through a decrease to tax expense in the period in which that determination is
made.
In the ordinary course of business there is inherent uncertainty in quantifying our income tax positions. We assess our income tax
positions and record tax benefits for all years subject to examination based upon management’s evaluation of the facts,
circumstances and information available at the reporting date. For those tax positions where it is more likely than not that a tax
benefit will be sustained, we have recorded the largest amount of tax benefit with a greater than 50% likelihood of being realized
upon ultimate settlement with a taxing authority that has full knowledge of all relevant information. For those income tax positions
where it is not more likely than not that a tax benefit will be sustained, no tax benefit has been recognized in the financial
statements. In addition, we have entered into certain internal legal entity restructuring transactions necessary to effectuate the
Separation Transactions. We have accrued tax on these transactions based on our interpretation of the applicable tax laws and our
determination of appropriate entity valuations. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” and
“Note 13: Income Taxes” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further discussion.
Management has determined that the distributions of Carrier and Otis on April 3, 2020, and certain related internal business
separation transactions, qualified as tax-free under applicable law. In making these determinations, we applied the tax law in the
relevant jurisdictions to our facts and circumstances and obtained tax rulings from the relevant taxing authorities, tax opinions,
and/or other external tax advice related to the concluded tax treatment. If the completed distributions of Carrier or Otis, in each
case, or certain internal business separation transactions, were to fail to qualify for tax-free treatment, the Company could be
subject to significant liabilities, and there could be material adverse impacts on the Company’s business, financial condition, results
of operations and cash flows in future reporting periods.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets. The assets and liabilities of acquired businesses are recorded under the acquisition method of
accounting at their estimated fair values at the dates of acquisition. Goodwill represents costs in excess of fair values assigned to
the underlying identifiable net assets of acquired businesses. Intangible assets acquired in business combinations consist of patents,
trademarks/tradenames, developed technology, customer relationships, and other intangible assets. The fair value for acquired
customer relationship intangibles is determined as of the acquisition date based on estimates and judgments regarding expectations
for the future after-tax cash flows arising from the follow-on revenue from customer relationships that existed on the acquisition
date over their estimated lives, including the probability of expected future contract renewals and revenue, less a contributory assets
charge, all of which is discounted to present value. The fair value of the trademark and tradename intangible assets are determined
utilizing the relief from royalty method which is a form of the income approach. Under this method, a royalty rate based on
observed market royalties is applied to projected revenue supporting the tradename and discounted to present value using an
appropriate discount rate. See “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form
10-K for further details.
We applied these approaches to the valuation of intangibles for the Raytheon Merger, for which the most significant intangible
assets identified were customer relationships and tradenames. Specific to these intangible assets, our estimates of market participant
future cash flows included forecasted revenue growth rates, remaining developmental effort, operational performance including
company specific synergies, program life cycles, material and labor pricing, and other relevant customer, contractual and market
factors. For the customer relationships, where appropriate, the net cash flows were probability-adjusted to reflect the uncertainties
associated with the underlying assumptions, including cancellation rates related to backlog, government demand for sole-source
and recompete contracts and win rates for recompete contracts, as well as the risk profile of the net cash flows utilized in the
valuation. In addition, the net cash flows were discounted using an appropriate discount rate that requires judgment by
management. The estimated fair value of identifiable intangible assets acquired in connection with the Raytheon Merger was
approximately $19.1 billion.
Also included within intangible assets are exclusivity assets, which are payments made to secure certain contractual rights to
provide products on new commercial aerospace platforms. Such payments are capitalized when there are distinct rights obtained
and there are sufficient incremental cash flows to support the recoverability of the assets established. Otherwise, the applicable
59
Table of Contents
portion of the payments are expensed. The gross value of these contractual commitments at December 31, 2020 was approximately
$11.6 billion, of which approximately $3.3 billion has been paid to date. We regularly assess the recoverability of these intangibles,
which is dependent upon our assumptions around the future success and profitability of the underlying aircraft platforms including
the associated aftermarket revenue streams, and the related future cash flows.
Goodwill and intangible assets deemed to have indefinite lives are not amortized, but are subject to impairment testing annually, or
more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. The impairment test compares carrying
values of the reporting units to its estimated fair values. If the carrying value exceeds the fair value then the carrying value is
reduced to fair value. In developing our estimates for the fair value of our reporting units, significant judgment is required in the
determination of the appropriateness of using a qualitative assessment or quantitative assessment. For the quantitative assessments
that are performed, fair value is primarily based on income approaches using a discounted cash flow method and relief from royalty
method, which have significant assumptions including sales growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates,
discount rates and royalty rates. Such assumptions are subject to variability from year to year and are directly impacted by, among
other things, global market conditions.
We considered the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic to be a
triggering event in the first and second quarters of 2020, requiring an impairment evaluation of goodwill, intangible assets and
other assets in our commercial aerospace businesses, Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney. Beginning in the second quarter of
2020, we observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by airlines, fleet retirements
and repositioning of OEM production schedules and we experienced a significant decline in revenues at our Collins Aerospace and
Pratt & Whitney businesses due to a decline in flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization, shop visits and commercial OEM deliveries.
These factors contributed to a deterioration of our expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight
activity, which further reduced our future sales and cash flows expectations.
In the second quarter of 2020, we evaluated the Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney reporting units for goodwill impairment
and determined that the carrying values of two of the six Collins Aerospace reporting units exceeded the sum of discounted future
cash flows, resulting in goodwill impairments of $3.2 billion. Collins Aerospace discounted future cash flow estimates were
developed for three scenarios: a base case, a downside case, and an upside case. These scenarios included assumptions regarding
future airline flight activity, out of warranty hours on original equipment, expected repairs, upgrades and replacements, future OEM
manufacturing schedules and related environmental assumptions, including individuals’ desire to return to normal travel, business
needs to travel, and potential cures or vaccines to prevent or reduce the effects of COVID-19. These estimates require a significant
amount of judgment and are subject to change based upon factors outside our control. We weighted the three scenarios as follows:
50% for the base case, 40% for the downside case, and 10% for the upside case, and used these weightings, as we believed they
reflected the risks and opportunities relative to our estimates. Goodwill impairment was not indicated for any of the other reporting
units evaluated for impairment in any of these scenarios.
We did not identify any further deterioration to our expectations in the third quarter of 2020, and therefore, did not have a triggering
event.
On October 1, 2020, we changed our annual goodwill impairment testing date from July 1 to October 1 to better align with the
timing of our annual long-term planning process. This change was not material to our Consolidated Financial Statements as it did
not delay, accelerate, or avoid any potential goodwill impairment charges. We completed our annual impairment testing as of
October 1, 2020, where we assessed our Pratt & Whitney, RIS, RMD and one of the Collins Aerospace reporting units using
qualitative factors to determine whether it was more likely than not that any individual reporting unit’s fair value is less than its
carrying value (step 0) and determined that no further testing was required based on there being no significant changes at RIS and
RMD since the acquisition of Raytheon Company and the substantial cushion of fair value over book value at the other reporting
units. For the remainder of our Collins Aerospace reporting units, we compared the fair value of the reporting units to their
respective carrying values (step 1), and determined that no additional adjustments to the carrying value of goodwill were necessary.
Based on our annual impairment analysis as of October 1, 2020, the reporting unit that was closest to impairment was a reporting
unit at Collins Aerospace with a fair value in excess of book value, including goodwill, of $1.2 billion or 7%. All other factors
equal, if the discount rate used for the annual impairment analysis increased by 25 basis points, the fair value in excess of book
value for the Collins Aerospace reporting unit would have been approximately $0.3 billion or 2%. Alternatively, all other factors
equal, if the cash flows were decreased by 10%, the fair value for the Collins Aerospace reporting unit would have decreased by
approximately $1.8 billion. Material changes in these estimates could occur and result in additional impairments in future periods.
The Company continuously monitors for events and circumstances that could negatively impact the key assumptions in
determining the fair value of goodwill, including long-term revenue growth projections, profitability, discount rates, recent market
valuations from transactions by comparable companies, volatility in the Company’s market capitalization, and general
60
Table of Contents
industry, market and macro-economic conditions. It is possible that future changes in such circumstances, including a more
prolonged and/or severe COVID-19 pandemic than originally anticipated, or future changes in the variables associated with the
judgments, assumptions and estimates used in assessing the fair value of our reporting units, including the expected long term
recovery of airline travel to pre-COVID-19 levels, would require the Company to record a non-cash impairment charge.
Contingent Liabilities. Our operating units include businesses which sell products and services and conduct operations throughout
the world. As described in “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K, contractual, regulatory
and other matters in the normal course of business may arise that subject us to claims or litigation. Of note, the design,
development, production and support of new aerospace technologies is inherently complex and subject to risk. Since the PW1000G
Geared Turbofan engine entered into service in 2016, technical issues have been identified and experienced with the engine, which
is typical for new engines and new aerospace technologies. Pratt & Whitney has addressed these issues through various
improvements and modifications. These issues have resulted in financial impacts, including increased warranty provisions,
customer contract settlements, and reductions in contract performance estimates. Additional technical issues, either related to this
program or other programs, may also arise in the normal course, which may result in financial impacts that could be material to the
Company’s financial position, results of operations and cash flows.
Additionally, we have significant contracts with the U.S. government, subject to government oversight and audit, which may
require significant adjustment of contract prices. We accrue for liabilities associated with these matters when it is probable that a
liability has been incurred and the amount can be reasonably estimated. The most likely cost to be incurred is accrued based on an
evaluation of then currently available facts with respect to each matter. When no amount within a range of estimates is more likely,
the minimum is accrued. The inherent uncertainty related to the outcome of these matters can result in amounts materially different
from any provisions made with respect to their resolution.
Employee Benefit Plans. We sponsor domestic and foreign defined benefit pension and PRB plans. Assumptions used to calculate
our funded status are determined based on company data and appropriate market indicators. They are evaluated annually at
December 31 and when significant events require a mid-year remeasurement. A change in any of these assumptions or actual
experience that differs from these assumptions are subject to recognition in pension and postretirement net periodic benefit
(income) expense reported in the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Assumptions used in the accounting for these employee benefit plans require judgement. Major assumptions include the discount
rate and EROA. Other assumptions include mortality rates, demographic assumptions (such as retirement age), rate of increase in
employee compensation levels, and health care cost increase projections.
The weighted-average discount rates used to measure pension and PRB liabilities are based on yield curves developed using high-
quality corporate bonds as well as plan specific cash flows. For our significant plans, we utilize a full yield curve approach in the
estimation of the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit expense by applying the specific spot rates along
the yield curve used in determination of the benefit obligation to the relevant discounted projected cash flows.
The following table shows the sensitivity of our pension and PRB plan liabilities and net periodic benefit income to a 25 basis point
change in the discount rates for benefit obligations, interest cost and service cost as of December 31, 2020:
(dollars in millions)Increase in Discount 
Rate of 25 bpsDecrease in Discount 
Rate of 25 bps
Projected benefit obligation $ (2,072)$ 2,183 
Net periodic benefit income (7) 8 
The discount rate sensitivities assume no change in the shape of the yield curve that will be applied to the projected cash outflows
for future benefit payments in order to calculate interest and service cost. A flattening of the yield curve, results in a narrowing of
the spread between interest and obligation discount rates and would decrease our net periodic benefit income. Conversely, a
steepening of the yield curve would result in an increase in the spread between interest and obligation discount rates and would
increase our net periodic benefit income.
The EROA is the average rate of earnings expected over the long term on assets invested to fund anticipated future benefit payment
obligations. In determining the EROA assumption, we consider the target asset allocation of plan assets, as well as economic and
other indicators of future performance. We may consult with and consider the opinions of financial and other professionals in
determining the appropriate capital market assumptions. Return projections are validated using a simulation model that incorporates
yield curves, credit spreads and risk premiums to project long-term prospective returns. Differences between actual asset returns in
a given year and the EROA do not necessarily indicate a change in the assumption is required, as the EROA represents the expected
average returns over a long-term horizon.
Net periodic benefit income is also sensitive to changes in the EROA. An increase or decrease of 25 basis points in the EROA
would have increased or decreased our 2020 net periodic benefit income by approximately $116 million.
61
Table of Contents
We must apply both Financial Accounting Standards (FAS) requirements under U.S. GAAP (as described above) and U.S.
government Cost Accounting Standards (CAS) requirements to calculate pension and PRB expense. Both FAS and CAS expense
use long term assumptions requiring judgement, but the CAS expense calculation is different from the FAS requirements and
calculation methodology. While the ultimate liability for pension costs under FAS and CAS is similar, the pattern of cost
recognition is different. Our CAS pension expense is comprised primarily of CAS service cost as well as amortization amounts
resulting from demographic or economic experience different than expected, changes in assumptions, or changes in plan
provisions. CAS requires contractors to compare the liability using a discount rate based on the EROA to a liability using a
discount rate based on high-quality corporate bonds, and use the greater of the two liability calculations in developing CAS
expense. Additionally, unlike FAS, CAS expense is only recognized for plans that are not fully funded. Consequently, if plans
become or cease to be fully funded under CAS due to our asset or liability experience, our CAS expense will change accordingly.
ACCOUNTING STANDARDS
For a discussion of recent accounting pronouncements, see the Accounting Pronouncements section in “Note 1: Basis of
Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENTS AND CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
We extend a variety of financial guarantees to third parties in support of unconsolidated affiliates and for potential financing
requirements of commercial aerospace customers. We also have obligations arising from sales of certain businesses and assets,
including indemnities for representations and warranties and environmental, health and safety, tax and employment matters.
Circumstances that could cause the contingent obligations and liabilities arising from these arrangements to come to fruition
include changes in an underlying transaction (e.g., hazardous waste discoveries, etc.), nonperformance under a contract, customer
requests for financing, or deterioration in the financial condition of the guaranteed party.
A summary of our consolidated contractual obligations and commitments as of December 31, 2020 is as follows:
 Payments Due by Period
(dollars in millions) Total 2021 2022-2023 2024-2025 Thereafter
Long-term debt—principal $ 31,470 $ 550 $ 2,805 $ 2,844 $ 25,271 
Long-term debt—future interest 19,915 1,328 2,532 2,390 13,665 
Operating leases 2,470 632 803 389 646 
Purchase obligations 22,111 14,407 6,669 874 161 
Other long-term liabilities 3,642 587 2,001 261 793 
Total contractual obligations $ 79,608 $ 17,504 $ 14,810 $ 6,758 $ 40,536 
Purchase obligations include amounts committed for the purchase of goods and services under legally enforceable contracts or
purchase orders. Where it is not practically feasible to determine the legally enforceable portion of our obligation under certain of
our long-term purchase agreements, we include additional expected purchase obligations beyond what is legally enforceable.
Approximately 60% of our purchase obligations disclosed above represent purchase orders for products to be delivered under firm
contracts with the U.S. government for which we have full recourse under customary contract termination clauses.
Other long-term liabilities primarily include those amounts on our December 31, 2020 balance sheet representing performance and
operating cost guarantees, estimated environmental remediation costs and expected cash funding requirements under employee
benefit programs. Amounts beyond 2023 for cash funding requirements under employee benefits plans are not included. The timing
of expected cash flows associated with these obligations is based upon management’s estimates over the terms of these agreements
and is largely based upon historical experience.
The above table also does not reflect unrecognized tax benefits of $1,225 million, the timing of which is uncertain, except for $36
million that may become payable during 2021. Refer to “Note 13: Income Taxes” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional
discussion on unrecognized tax benefits.
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Refer to “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for discussion on contractual commitments
and contingencies.
62
Table of Contents
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
Our operations are subject to environmental regulation by federal, state and local authorities in the United States and regulatory
authorities with jurisdiction over our foreign operations. As a result, we have established, and continually update, policies relating
to environmental standards of performance for our operations worldwide. We believe that expenditures necessary to comply with
the present regulations governing environmental protection will not have a material effect upon our competitive position, results of
operations, cash flows or financial condition.
We have been identified as a potentially responsible party under the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and
Liability Act (CERCLA), more commonly known as a Superfund, for a number of sites. The nature and extent of environmental
concerns vary from site to site and our share of responsibility varies from sole responsibility to very little responsibility. In
estimating our liability for remediation, we consider our likely proportionate share of the anticipated remediation expense and the
ability of other potentially responsible parties to fulfill their obligations. We also lease certain government-owned properties and
generally are not liable for remediation of preexisting environmental contamination at these sites. As a result, we generally do not
provide for these costs in our Consolidated Financing Statements.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had $835 million and $725 million reserved for environmental remediation, respectively. Cash
outflows for environmental remediation were $53 million in 2020, $44 million in 2019, and $41 million in 2018. We estimate that
ongoing environmental remediation expenditures in each of the next two years will not exceed approximately $100 million.
GOVERNMENT MATTERS
As described above in “Critical Accounting Estimates—Contingent Liabilities,” our contracts with the U.S. government are subject
to audits. Such audits may recommend that certain contract prices should be reduced to comply with various government
regulations, or that certain payments be delayed or withheld. We are also the subject of one or more investigations and legal
proceedings initiated by the U.S. government with respect to government contract matters. See Item 3. Legal Proceedings, within
Part I, and “Note 13: Income Taxes” and “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for further
discussion of these and other government matters.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Our primary market exposures are to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates as it relates to our market
risk sensitive instruments, which are primarily cash, debt and derivative instruments. To quantify our market risk exposure, we
perform a sensitivity analysis based on hypothetical changes in foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates. We changed our
methodology for quantifying our market risk exposure in the second quarter of 2020 to better align with how we manage our risk
exposure. Refer to “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles,” “Note 10: Borrowings and Lines of
Credit” and “Note 15: Financial Instruments” within Item 8 of this Form 10-K for additional discussion of foreign currency
exchange, interest rates and financial instruments.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk. We are subject to foreign currency exchange rate risk relating to receipts from customers
and payments to suppliers in foreign currencies and to various internal or external financing arrangements. We use foreign currency
forward contracts to hedge the price risk associated with firmly committed and forecasted foreign denominated payments and
receipts related to our ongoing business and financing. We actively manage foreign currency exposures that are associated with
committed foreign currency purchases and sales, and other assets and liabilities created in the normal course of business at the
operating unit level. More than insignificant exposures that cannot be naturally offset within an operating unit are hedged with
foreign currency derivatives. Foreign exchange exposures arising from intercompany loan and deposit transactions are also hedged
regularly. The aggregate notional amount of our outstanding foreign currency hedges was $11.6 billion and $13.0 billion at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Foreign currency forward contracts are sensitive to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates. A 10% unfavorable exchange rate movement in our portfolio of foreign currency contracts would have resulted in
an increase in unrealized losses of $0.8 billion and $1.2 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Such losses or gains
would be offset by corresponding gains or losses in the remeasurement of the underlying transactions being hedged. We believe
these foreign currency forward exchange contracts and the offsetting underlying commitments, when taken together, do not create
material market risk
Within our aerospace business, our sales are typically denominated in U.S. Dollars. However, for our non-U.S. based entities, such
as Pratt & Whitney Canada (P&WC), a substantial portion of their costs are incurred in local currencies. Consequently, there is a
foreign currency exchange impact and risk to operational results as U.S. Dollars must be converted to local currencies such as the
Canadian Dollar in order to meet local currency cost obligations. Additionally, we transact business in various foreign currencies
which exposes our cash flows and earnings to changes in foreign currency exchange rates. In order to minimize the exposure that
exists from changes in the exchange rate of the U.S. Dollar against these other currencies, we hedge
63
Table of Contents
a certain portion of sales to secure the rates at which U.S. Dollars will be converted. The majority of this hedging activity occurs at
P&WC and Collins Aerospace, and hedging activity also occurs to a lesser extent at the remainder of Pratt & Whitney. At P&WC
and Collins Aerospace, firm and forecasted sales for both original equipment and spare parts are hedged at varying amounts for up
to 49 months on the U.S. Dollar sales exposure as represented by the excess of U.S. Dollar sales over U.S. Dollar denominated
purchases. Hedging gains and losses resulting from movements in foreign currency exchange rates are partially offset by the
foreign currency translation impacts that are generated on the translation of local currency operating results into U.S. Dollars for
reporting purposes. While the objective of the hedging program is to minimize the foreign currency exchange impact on operating
results, there are typically variances between the hedging gains or losses and the translational impact due to the length of hedging
contracts, changes in the sales profile, volatility in the exchange rates and other such operational considerations.
Interest Rate Risk. We have financial instruments that are subject to interest rate risk, principally fixed-rate debt obligations. A
100 basis points unfavorable interest rate movement would have had an approximate $4 billion impact on the fair value of our
fixed-rate debt at both December 31, 2020 and 2019. The investors in our fixed-rate debt obligations do not generally have the right
to demand we pay off these obligations prior to maturity. Therefore, exposure to interest rate risk is not believed to be material for
our fixed-rate debt. From time to time, we may hedge to floating rates using interest rate swaps. Currently, we do not hold any
derivative contracts that hedge our interest exposures, but may consider such strategies in the future.
64
Table of Contents
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
MANAGEMENT’S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
The management of RTC is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. Internal
control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting
and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America. Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements.
Management has assessed the effectiveness of RTC’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020. In making
its assessment, management has utilized the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission in its Internal Control—Integrated Framework, released in 2013. Management concluded that based on its
assessment, RTC’s internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2020. The effectiveness of RTC’s
internal control over financial reporting, as of December 31, 2020, has been audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an
independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is included herein.
/s/ GREGORY J. HAYES
Gregory J. Hayes
President and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ ANTHONY F. O’BRIEN
Anthony F. O’Brien
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
/s/ MICHAEL J. WOOD
Michael J. Wood
Corporate Vice President and Controller
65
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Shareowners and Board of Directors of Raytheon Technologies Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheet of Raytheon Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the related consolidated statements of operations, of comprehensive income
(loss), of changes in equity and of cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, including the
related notes (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework
(2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position
of the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2020 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company changed the manner in which it accounts for leases in
2019.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the
Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits.
We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and
are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable
rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk.
Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the
66
Table of Contents
company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated
financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate
opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Valuation of Acquired Customer Relationship and Tradename Intangible Assets
As described in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company completed its merger with Raytheon Company
(“Raytheon”) on April 3, 2020 for net consideration of $33.2 billion. The merger was accounted for using the acquisition method of
accounting, and the Company was treated as the accounting acquirer. As a result of this merger, $12.9 billion of customer
relationship intangible assets and $5.4 billion of tradename intangible assets were recorded. Fair value of the customer relationship
intangible assets were estimated using a discounted cash flow valuation method and fair value of the tradename intangible assets
were estimated using a relief from royalty valuation method. Management applied significant judgment in determining the fair
value of the intangible assets, which involved the use of significant assumptions for forecasted revenue growth rates and the
discount rate.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the valuation of acquired customer
relationship and tradename intangible assets arising from the merger with Raytheon is a critical audit matter are the significant
judgment by management when determining the fair value of the these intangible assets, which in turn led to a high degree of
auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence relating to management’s
assumptions for the forecasted revenue growth rates and the discount rate. In addition, the audit effort involved the use of
professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls over
management’s determination of forecasted revenue growth rates and the discount rate assumptions used in the valuation of the
customer relationship and tradename intangible assets. These procedures also included, among others, testing management’s
process for determining the fair value of the customer relationship and tradename intangible assets. Testing management’s process
included evaluating the appropriateness of the valuation methods, testing the completeness, accuracy and relevance of the
underlying data used in the valuations and evaluating the reasonableness of significant assumptions related to the forecasted
revenue growth rates and the discount rate. Evaluating the reasonableness of the forecasted revenue growth rates involved
considering the past performance of Raytheon, as well as economic and industry data. The discount rate was evaluated by
considering the cost of capital of comparable businesses and other industry factors. Professionals with specialized skill and
knowledge were used to assist in the evaluation of the Company’s discount rate assumption.
Tax-free Determinations of Certain Internal Separation Transactions and the Distributions of Carrier Global Corporation and Otis
Worldwide Corporation.
As described in Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements, management has determined that the distributions of Carrier
Global Corporation (“Carrier”) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (“Otis”) on April 3, 2020, and certain related internal business
separation transactions (the distributions and internal separation transactions referred to together as the “Transactions”), qualified as
tax-free under applicable law. In making these determinations, management applied the tax law in the relevant jurisdictions to their
facts and circumstances and obtained tax rulings from the relevant taxing authorities, tax opinions, and/or other external tax advice
related to the concluded tax treatment. If the completed distributions of Carrier or Otis, in each case, or certain internal business
separation transactions, were to fail to qualify for tax-free treatment, the Company could be subject to significant liabilities, and
there could be material adverse impacts on the Company’s business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows in
future reporting periods.
67
Table of Contents
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the tax-free determinations of certain
internal separation transactions and the distributions of Carrier and Otis is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by
management in applying relevant tax laws and regulations and assumptions in determining that certain internal separation
transactions and the distributions of Carrier and Otis qualify for tax-free status, and (ii) the significant impact to the financial
statements if these tax-free determinations were determined to be inappropriate by the relevant taxing authorities. This in turn led to
a significant degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in performing procedures and in evaluating audit evidence relating
to the tax-free determination of certain internal separation transactions and the distributions of Carrier and Otis. In addition, the
audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to the
significant judgments, including inputs and assumptions, relating to the determination of the tax-free nature of the transactions.
These procedures also included, among others, evaluating the information, including tax rulings from relevant taxing authorities,
external opinions and other tax advice, tax law, and other relevant evidence used by management to support management’s position
that the Transactions qualified for tax-free status. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in the
evaluation of the Transactions, related assumptions, and certain representations from management, as well as the application of
relevant tax laws.
Revenue Recognition - Contract Estimates at Completion
As described in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, a significant portion of the Company’s revenues of $56.6 billion for
the year ended December 31, 2020 are from long-term contracts associated with the design, development, manufacture or
modification of complex aerospace or defense equipment or related services. The timing of the satisfaction of performance
obligations varies across the Company’s businesses due to their diverse product and service mix, customer base, and contractual
terms. Substantially all of the Company’s revenues from the Raytheon Intelligence & Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense
segments are recognized over time because of the continuous transfer of control to the customer. The Company’s revenues from
certain long-term aftermarket contracts within its Pratt & Whitney segment are recognized over the contract period as a series of
daily performance obligations to stand ready to provide spare parts, product maintenance and aftermarket services. For the
performance obligations satisfied over time, revenue is recognized on a percentage of completion basis using costs incurred to date
relative to total estimated costs at completion to measure progress. Due to the nature of the work required to be performed on many
of the Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex, subject to many
variables and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. Within the Raytheon Intelligence &
Space and Raytheon Missiles & Defense segments, the variables and significant judgments relate to key contract matters, progress
towards completion and the related program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of
revenues and costs. The risks and opportunities for the contracts relate to management’s ability and cost to achieve the schedule,
consideration of customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels
and related variable consideration. Management also makes judgments about variables related to estimates of labor productivity
and availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed, the availability and cost of materials, the length of time to
complete the performance obligation, execution by the Company’s subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from the
customer, overhead cost rates, and the estimated cost of satisfying the Company’s industrial cooperation agreements required under
certain contracts. Within the Pratt & Whitney segment these variables and significant judgments relate to current and past
maintenance cost and frequency experience. Management reviews contract estimates at completion on a periodic basis and no less
than annually or when a change in circumstances warrant a modification to a previous estimate.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to revenue recognition - contract estimates
at completion is a critical audit matter are the significant judgment by management in developing their estimates of total revenue
and total costs at completion, including significant judgments and assumptions on a contract by contract basis. This in turn led to a
high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and in evaluating audit evidence relating to
management’s estimates of total revenue and total cost at completion for contracts.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to the
revenue recognition process, including controls over the estimates of total revenue and total costs at completion. These procedures
also included, among others, testing management’s process for developing the estimated total revenue and total costs at completion.
Testing management’s process included evaluating on a test basis the reasonableness of certain significant
68
Table of Contents
judgments and variables considered by management specific to each contract or performance obligation. Evaluating the significant
judgments and assumptions related to the estimates of total revenue and total costs at completion involved evaluating whether the
significant judgments and assumptions used were reasonable considering: (i) management’s historical forecasting accuracy, (ii)
evidence to support the relevant aforementioned variables, (iii) the consistent application of accounting policies, and (iv) the timely
identification of circumstances which may warrant a modification to a previous estimate.
Certain Goodwill and Unamortized Intangible Assets Impairment Assessments
As described in Notes 1 and 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company’s consolidated goodwill and intangible asset
balances were $54.3 billion and $40.5 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2020. Intangible assets included unamortized
intangible assets of $8.7 billion as of December 31, 2020. Goodwill and unamortized intangible assets are subject to impairment
testing annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. In the second
quarter of 2020, management observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by
airlines, fleet retirements and repositioning of production schedules. These factors contributed to a deterioration of management’s
expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight activity, which reduced future sales and cash
flows expectations. Management considered these factors to be a triggering event requiring impairment evaluation of goodwill,
intangible assets and other assets in its commercial aerospace businesses. The carrying value of two Collins Aerospace reporting
units exceeded the sum of discounted cash flows resulting in goodwill impairments of $3.2 billion. In developing the estimates for
the fair value of reporting units and unamortized intangible assets, significant judgment is required by management in the
determination of the appropriateness of using a qualitative assessment or quantitative assessment. For the quantitative assessments
that are performed for goodwill and unamortized intangible assets, fair value is primarily based on income approaches using a
discounted cash flow method and relief from royalty method, respectively, which have significant assumptions related to sales
growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates, discount rates and royalty rates. The impairment testing compares
carrying values to estimated fair values. If the carrying value exceeds the fair value, then the carrying value is reduced to fair value.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to certain goodwill and unamortized
intangible assets quantitative impairment assessments is a critical audit matter are the significant judgment by management when
developing the fair value measurements of these assets. This in turn led to a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and
effort in performing procedures to evaluate management’s fair value measurements and the applicable significant assumptions for
both goodwill and unamortized intangible assets relating to sales growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates, and
discount rates. In addition, the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to
management’s goodwill and unamortized intangible assets quantitative impairment assessments, including controls over the
valuation of the Company’s reporting units and unamortized intangible assets. These procedures also included, among others,
testing management’s process for developing the fair value estimates, which included evaluating the appropriateness of the
discounted cash flow and relief from royalty methods; testing the completeness, accuracy, and relevance of underlying data in the
estimates; and evaluating the significant assumptions used by management relating to sales growth rates, projected operating profit,
terminal growth rates and discount rates. Evaluating management’s assumptions related to sales growth rates, projected operating
profit, and terminal growth rates involved evaluating whether the assumptions used by management were reasonable considering (i)
the current and past performance of the reporting units and unamortized intangible assets, (ii) the consistency with external market
and industry data, and (iii) whether these assumptions were consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit.
Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist in the evaluation of the Company’s discounted cash flow and
relief from royalty methods, and terminal growth rate and discount rate assumptions.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 8, 2021
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1947.
69
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net Sales:
Product sales $ 43,319 $ 32,998 $ 24,141 
Service sales 13,268 12,351 10,560 
Total Net Sales 56,587 45,349 34,701 
Costs and Expenses:
Cost of products sold 38,137 26,910 21,083 
Cost of services sold 9,919 7,688 6,382 
Research and development 2,582 2,452 1,878 
Selling, general and administrative 5,540 3,711 2,864 
Total Costs and Expenses 56,178 40,761 32,207 
Goodwill impairment (3,183) — — 
Other income, net 885 326 383 
Operating profit (loss) (1,889) 4,914 2,877 
Non-operating expense (income), net
Non-service pension benefit (902) (829) (659)
Interest expense, net 1,366 1,591 1,032 
Total non-operating expense, net 464 762 373 
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (2,353) 4,152 2,504 
Income tax expense 575 421 1,098 
Net income (loss) from continuing operations (2,928) 3,731 1,406 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries’ earnings from continuing operations 181 221 190 
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners (3,109) 3,510 1,216 
Discontinued operations (Note 3):
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (216) 4,091 5,776 
Income tax expense from discontinued operations 151 1,874 1,528 
Net income (loss) from discontinued operations (367) 2,217 4,248 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries’ earnings from discontinued
operations 43 190 195 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners (410) 2,027 4,053 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (3,519)$ 5,537 $ 5,269 
Earnings (loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - basic
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ (2.29)$ 4.11 $ 1.52 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (0.30) 2.37 5.06 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (2.59)$ 6.48 $ 6.58 
Earnings (loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - diluted
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners $ (2.29)$ 4.06 $ 1.50 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (0.30) 2.35 5.00 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (2.59)$ 6.41 $ 6.50 
Weighted average number of shares outstanding:
Basic shares 1,357.8 854.8 800.4 
Diluted shares 1,357.8 863.9 810.1 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
70
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS)
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) from continuing and discontinued operations $ (3,295)$ 5,948 $ 5,654 
Pension and postretirement benefit plans
Net actuarial loss arising during period (202) (543) (1,819)
Prior service credit (cost) arising during period 2,095 (6) (22)
Amortization of actuarial loss and prior service cost 373 228 344 
Other (51) (93) 105 
Pension and postretirement benefit plans 2,215 (414) (1,392)
Unrealized loss on available-for-sale securities — — (5)
Change in unrealized cash flow hedging 263 18 (323)
Foreign currency translation adjustments 609 268 (518)
Other comprehensive income (loss), before tax 3,087 (128) (2,238)
Income tax (expense) benefit related to items of other comprehensive income (loss) (547) 43 400 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 2,540 (85) (1,838)
Comprehensive income (loss) (755) 5,863 3,816 
Less: comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest 224 399 355 
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (979)$ 5,464 $ 3,461 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
71
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in thousands) 2020 2019
Assets
Current assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 8,802 $ 4,937 
Accounts receivable, net 9,254 8,743 
Contract assets 9,931 4,462 
Inventory, net 9,411 9,047 
Assets related to discontinued operations 64 31,823 
Other assets, current 5,914 2,565 
Total Current Assets 43,376 61,577 
Customer financing assets 3,144 3,463 
Fixed assets, net 14,962 10,322 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 1,880 1,252 
Goodwill 54,285 36,609 
Intangible assets, net 40,539 24,473 
Other assets 3,967 1,919 
Total Assets $ 162,153 $ 139,615 
Liabilities, Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Equity
Current liabilities
Short-term borrowings $ 247 $ 2,293 
Accounts payable 8,639 7,816 
Accrued employee compensation 3,006 1,353 
Other accrued liabilities 10,401 8,417 
Contract liabilities 12,889 9,014 
Liabilities related to discontinued operations 116 14,443 
Long-term debt currently due 550 3,258 
Total Current Liabilities 35,848 46,594 
Long-term debt 31,026 37,701 
Operating lease liabilities, non-current 1,516 1,093 
Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations 10,342 2,487 
Other long-term liabilities 9,537 7,414 
Total Liabilities 88,269 95,289 
Commitments and contingent liabilities (Note 19)
Redeemable noncontrolling interest 32 95 
Shareowners’ Equity:
Capital Stock:
Preferred Stock, $1 par value; 250,000 shares authorized; None issued or outstanding — — 
Common Stock, $1 par value; 4,000,000 shares authorized; 1,706,173 and 1,450,845 shares
issued 36,930 23,019 
Treasury Stock— 186,734 and 586,479 common shares at average cost (10,407) (32,626)
Retained earnings 49,423 61,594 
Unearned ESOP shares (49) (64)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (3,734) (10,149)
Total Shareowners’ Equity 72,163 41,774 
Noncontrolling interest 1,689 2,457 
Total Equity 73,852 44,231 
Total Liabilities, Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Equity $ 162,153 $ 139,615 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
72
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating Activities:
Net income (loss) from continuing operations $ (2,928)$ 3,731 $ 1,406 
Adjustments to reconcile net income from continuing operations to net cash flows provided by operating
activities:
Depreciation and amortization 4,156 2,708 1,896 
Deferred income tax (benefit) provision (99) 38 763 
Stock compensation cost 330 268 169 
Net periodic pension and other postretirement (income) expense (413) (566) (392)
Goodwill impairment charge 3,183 — — 
Change in:
Accounts receivable 1,318 88 (1,147)
Contract assets 63 (679) (651)
Inventory 412 (1,267) (417)
Other current assets (445) (984) (645)
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities (1,666) 1,111 2,738 
Contract liabilities 1,129 1,234 325 
Global pension contributions (1,025) (55) (79)
Canadian government settlement — (38) (429)
Other operating activities, net 319 232 (867)
Net cash flows provided by operating activities from continuing operations 4,334 5,821 2,670 
Investing Activities:
Capital expenditures (1,795) (1,868) (1,467)
Increase in customer financing assets (280) (787) (988)
Decrease in customer financing assets 368 128 604 
Investments in businesses (Note 2) (419) (9) (15,039)
Cash acquired in Raytheon Merger 3,208 — — 
Dispositions of businesses (Note 2) 2,556 134 74 
Increase in collaboration intangible assets (172) (351) (400)
Receipts (payments) from settlements of derivative contracts (32) 342 140 
Other investing activities, net (91) (265) (183)
Net cash flows provided by (used in) investing activities from continuing operations 3,343 (2,676) (17,259)
Financing Activities:
Issuance of long-term debt 2,004 (19) 13,337 
Distribution from discontinued operation 17,207 — — 
Repayment of long-term debt (16,082) (2,693) (2,520)
(Decrease) increase in short-term borrowings, net (2,041) 896 (370)
Proceeds from Common Stock issued under employee stock plans 15 27 36 
Dividends paid on Common Stock (2,732) (2,442) (2,170)
Repurchase of Common Stock (47) (151) (325)
Net transfer (to) from discontinued operations (2,033) 2,387 3,979 
Other financing activities, net (151) 82 242 
Net cash flows (used in) provided by financing activities from continuing operations (3,860) (1,913) 12,209 
Discontinued Operations:
Net cash (used in) provided by operating activities (728) 3,062 3,652 
Net cash (used in) provided by investing activities (241) (416) 286 
Net cash used in financing activities (1,414) (2,651) (4,244)
Net cash flows used in discontinued operations (2,383) (5) (306)
Effect of foreign exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents from continuing operations 54 1 (6)
Effect of foreign exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents from discontinued operations (76) (20) (114)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 1,412 1,208 (2,806)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, beginning of year 4,961 3,731 6,118 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash within assets related to discontinued operations, beginning of year 2,459 2,481 2,900 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, end of year 8,832 7,420 6,212 
Less: Restricted cash, included in Other assets 30 24 38 
Less: Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash for discontinued operations — 2,459 2,481 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 8,802 $ 4,937 $ 3,693 
Supplemental Disclosure of Cash Flow Information:
Interest paid, net of amounts capitalized $ 1,628 $ 1,801 $ 1,027 
Income taxes paid, net of refunds 1,716 1,768 1,714 
(1)    Amounts are inclusive of continuing operations and discontinued operations payments.
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(1)
73
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in thousands) 2020 2019 2018
Equity at January 1 $ 44,231 $ 40,610 $ 31,421 
Common Stock
Balance at January 1 23,019 22,514 17,574 
Common Stock issued under employee plans 417 525 423 
Common Stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock & equity awards 10,897 — — 
Adjustment to Common Stock for the Otis Distribution 2,598 — — 
Common Stock issued for Rockwell Collins outstanding common stock & equity awards — — 4,523 
Purchase of subsidiary shares from noncontrolling interest, net (1) (20) (6)
Balance at December 31 36,930 23,019 22,514 
Treasury Stock
Balance at January 1 (32,626) (32,482) (35,596)
Common Stock issued under employee plans 2 7 6 
Common Stock repurchased (43) (151) (329)
Common Stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock & equity awards 22,269 — — 
Common Stock issued for Rockwell Collins outstanding common stock & equity awards — — 3,437 
Other (9) — — 
Balance at December 31 (10,407) (32,626) (32,482)
Retained Earnings
Balance at January 1 61,594 57,823 55,242 
Net income (loss) (3,519) 5,537 5,269 
Adjustment to retained earnings for the Carrier Distribution (5,805) — — 
Dividends on Common Stock (2,732) (2,442) (2,170)
Dividends on ESOP Common Stock (50) (70) (71)
Redeemable noncontrolling interest fair value adjustment — 4 7 
ASU 2018-02 adoption impact (Note 20) — 745 — 
Revenue Standard adoption impact — — (480)
Other, including the adoption impact of ASU 2016-13 (Note 1) (65) (3) 26 
Balance at December 31 49,423 61,594 57,823 
Unearned ESOP Shares
Balance at January 1 (64) (76) (85)
Common Stock issued under employee plans 15 12 9 
Balance at December 31 (49) (64) (76)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Balance at January 1 (10,149) (9,333) (7,525)
Other comprehensive loss, net of tax 2,540 (71) (1,808)
Separation of Carrier and Otis 3,875 — — 
ASU 2018-02 adoption impact (Note 20) — (745) — 
Balance at December 31 (3,734) (10,149) (9,333)
Noncontrolling Interest
Balance at January 1 2,457 2,164 1,811 
Net income 224 411 385 
Less: Redeemable noncontrolling interest net income (4) 7 (4)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax — (12) (30)
Dividends attributable to noncontrolling interest (159) (268) (315)
Sale (purchase) of subsidiary shares from noncontrolling interest, net 66 70 (23)
Acquisition (disposition) of noncontrolling interest, net 1 (23) (8)
Separation of Carrier and Otis (865) — — 
Capital contributions (distributions) (31) 108 342 
Other — — 6 
Balance at December 31 1,689 2,457 2,164 
Equity at December 31 $ 73,852 $ 44,231 $ 40,610 
Supplemental share information
Shares of Common Stock issued under employee plans, net 2,689 3,883 2,775 
Shares of Common Stock repurchased 330 1,133 2,727 
Shares of Common Stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock & equity awards 652,638 — —
Dividends per share of Common Stock $ 2.16 $ 2.94 $ 2.84 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
74
Table of Contents
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
NOTE 1: BASIS OF PRESENTATION AND SUMMARY OF ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES
The preparation of financial statements requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts
of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Separation Transactions and Distributions. On April 3, 2020, United Technologies Corporation (UTC) (since renamed Raytheon
Technologies Corporation) completed the previously announced separation of its business into three independent, publicly traded
companies – UTC, Carrier Global Corporation (Carrier) and Otis Worldwide Corporation (Otis) (such separations, the Separation
Transactions). UTC distributed all of the outstanding shares of Carrier common stock and all of the outstanding shares of Otis
common stock to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020, the
record date for the distributions (the Distributions). UTC distributed 866,158,910 and 433,079,455 shares of common stock of
Carrier and Otis, respectively in the Distributions, each of which was effective at 12:01 a.m., Eastern Time, on April 3, 2020. The
historical results of Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both
continuing operations and segment results for all periods presented. Unless otherwise indicated, amounts and activity throughout
these Consolidated Financial Statements are presented on a continuing operations basis, and includes the reclassification of certain
long term assets and liabilities to current using the duration of the related contract or program as our operating cycle. Refer to
“Note 3: Discontinued Operations” and “Consolidation and Classification” below for further details.
Raytheon Merger. On April 3, 2020, following the completion of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions, pursuant to an
Agreement and Plan of Merger dated June 9, 2019, as amended, UTC and Raytheon Company (Raytheon) completed their
previously announced all-stock merger of equals transaction (the Raytheon Merger). Upon closing of the Raytheon Merger,
Raytheon Company became a wholly owned subsidiary of UTC, which changed its name to “Raytheon Technologies Corporation.”
Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “the Company,” “Raytheon Technologies,” and “RTC” mean
United Technologies Corporation and its subsidiaries when referring to periods prior to the Raytheon Merger and to the combined
company, Raytheon Technologies Corporation, when referring to periods after the Raytheon Merger. Unless the context otherwise
requires, the terms “Raytheon Company,” or “Raytheon” mean Raytheon Company and its subsidiaries prior to the Raytheon
Merger. UTC was determined to be the accounting acquirer in the merger and, as a result, the financial statements of Raytheon
Technologies as of and for the year ended December 31, 2020 include Raytheon Company’s financial position and results of
operations for the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020.
COVID-19 Pandemic. In March 2020, the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) was declared a pandemic by the World Health
Organization and a national emergency by the U.S. government. The pandemic has negatively affected the U.S. and global
economy, disrupted global supply chains and financial markets, and resulted in significant travel restrictions, mandated facility
closures and shelter-in-place and social distancing orders in numerous jurisdictions around the world. Raytheon Technologies is
taking all prudent measures to protect the health and safety of our employees, such as practicing social distancing, performing deep
cleaning in all of our facilities, temperature screening, health questionnaires and enabling our employees to work from home where
possible. We have also taken appropriate actions to help support our communities in addressing the challenges posed by the
pandemic, including the production and donation of personal protective equipment.
Our business and operations and the industries in which we operate have been significantly impacted by public and private sector
policies and initiatives in the U.S. and worldwide to address the transmission of COVID-19, such as the imposition of travel
restrictions and the adoption of remote working. Additionally, public sentiments regarding air travel have also had a significant
impact. We began to experience issues related to COVID-19 in the first quarter of 2020, primarily related to a limited number of
facility closures, less than full staffing, and disruptions in supplier deliveries, most significantly in our Collins Aerospace Systems
(Collins Aerospace) and Pratt & Whitney businesses.
The continued disruption to air travel and commercial activities and the significant restrictions and limitations on businesses,
particularly within the aerospace and commercial airline industries, have negatively impacted global supply, demand and
distribution capabilities. These conditions, which began in the second quarter of 2020, continued through the remainder of 2020. In
particular, the unprecedented decrease in air travel resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic is adversely affecting our airline and
airframer customers, and their demand for the products and services of our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses.
Based on recent public data, revenue passenger miles (RPMs) declined by approximately 65% in the first eleven months of 2020,
compared to the prior year, due to the pandemic. As a result, our airline customers have reported significant reductions in fleet
utilization, aircraft grounding and unplanned retirements, and have deferred and, in some cases, cancelled new aircraft deliveries.
Airlines have shifted to cash conservation behaviors such as deferring engine maintenance due to lower flight hours and aircraft
utilization, requesting extended payment terms, deferring delivery of new aircraft and spare engines and
75
Table of Contents
requesting discounts on engine maintenance. Some airline customers have filed for bankruptcy due to their inability to meet their
financial obligations. Additionally, we are seeing purchase order declines in line with publicly communicated aircraft production
volumes as original equipment manufacturer (OEM) customers delay and cancel orders. We continue to monitor these trends and
are working closely with our customers. We have been and continue to actively mitigate costs and adjust production schedules to
accommodate these declines in demand. We have also been taking actions to preserve capital and protect the long-term needs of our
businesses, including cutting discretionary spending, significantly reducing capital expenditures and research and development
spend, suspending our share buybacks in 2020, deferring merit increases and implementing temporary pay reductions, freezing
non-essential hiring, repositioning employees to defense work, furloughing employees when needed, and personnel reductions. In
2020, we recorded total restructuring charges of $777 million primarily related to personnel reductions at our Collins Aerospace
and Pratt & Whitney businesses to preserve capital and at our corporate headquarters due to consolidation from the Raytheon
Merger. The former Raytheon Company businesses, although experiencing minor impacts, have not experienced significant facility
closures or other significant business disruptions as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Given the impacts described above that have resulted from the COVID-19 pandemic, we expect our future operating results,
particularly those of our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses to continue to be significantly negatively impacted. Our
expectations regarding the COVID-19 pandemic and its potential financial impact are based on available information and
assumptions that we believe are reasonable at this time; however, the actual financial impact is highly uncertain and subject to a
wide range of factors and future developments. While we believe that the long-term outlook for the aerospace industry remains
positive due to the fundamental drivers of air travel demand, there is significant uncertainty with respect to when commercial air
traffic levels will begin to recover, and whether and at what point capacity will return to and/or exceed pre-COVID-19 levels. Our
latest estimates are that this recovery may occur in 2023 or 2024. New information may emerge concerning the scope, severity and
duration of the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as any worsening of the pandemic, the effect of mutating strains and whether
additional outbreaks of the pandemic will continue to occur, actions to contain the pandemic’s spread or treat its impact, timing of
the availability of vaccines, and their distribution, acceptance and efficacy, and governmental, business and individual personal
actions taken in response to the pandemic (including restrictions and limitations on travel and transportation, and changes in leisure
and business travel patterns and work environments) among others. Some of these actions and related impacts may be trends that
continue in the future even after the pandemic no longer poses a significant public health risk.
We considered the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic to be a
triggering event in the first and second quarters of 2020, requiring an impairment evaluation of goodwill, intangible assets and
other assets in our commercial aerospace businesses, Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney. Beginning in the second quarter of
2020, we observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by airlines, fleet retirements
and repositioning of OEM production schedules and we experienced a significant decline in revenues at our Collins Aerospace and
Pratt & Whitney businesses due to a decline in flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization, shop visits and commercial OEM deliveries.
These factors contributed to a deterioration of our expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight
activity, which further reduced our future sales and cash flows expectations. Based on our updated forecast assumptions in the
second quarter of 2020, we concluded that the carrying values of two of our Collins Aerospace reporting units were greater than
their respective fair values, and accordingly, recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $3.2 billion. We did not identify any further
deterioration to our expectations in the third quarter of 2020, and therefore, did not have a triggering event.
We completed our annual goodwill impairment testing as of October 1, 2020 and determined that no additional adjustments to the
carrying value of our goodwill were necessary. Refer to “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for
additional information.
Additionally, in 2020 we recorded write-downs of non-goodwill assets and significant unfavorable Estimate at Completion (EAC)
adjustments in our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses primarily related to:
•increased estimated credit losses on both our receivables and contract assets of $387 million,
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment on a Pratt & Whitney commercial engine aftermarket contract due to lower estimated
revenues driven by a change in the estimated maintenance coverage period of $334 million,
•contract asset and inventory impairments at Collins Aerospace due to the impact of lower estimated future customer
activity resulting from the expected acceleration of fleet retirements of a commercial aircraft of $146 million,
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment of $129 million related to lower estimated revenues due to the restructuring of a customer
contract at Pratt & Whitney,
•an $89 million impairment of commercial aircraft program assets at Pratt & Whitney,
•the impairment of a Collins Aerospace trade name of $57 million,
76
Table of Contents
•net unfavorable EAC adjustments on commercial aftermarket contracts at Pratt & Whitney based on a change in estimated
future customer activity of $75 million,
•an unfavorable EAC adjustment at Pratt & Whitney related to a shift in overhead costs to military contracts of $44 million,
and
•reserves related to a commercial financing arrangement at Pratt & Whitney of $43 million.
As described further in “Note 8: Commercial Aerospace Industry Assets and Commitments,” we have significant exposure related
to our airline and airframer customers, including significant accounts receivable and contract assets balances. Given the uncertainty
related to the severity and length of the pandemic, as well as any worsening of the pandemic, mutations to the strains of the virus
and the timing and impact of vaccines and whether there will be additional outbreaks of the pandemic and its impact across the
aerospace industry, we may be required to record additional charges or impairments in future periods.
Although the impact of COVID-19 on our commercial business is significant, we currently believe we have sufficient liquidity to
withstand the current estimated impacts.
Summary of Accounting Principles. As a result of the Raytheon Merger and the Separation Transactions, several of our accounting
policies have been modified and certain additional polices have been added. The following represents the significant accounting
principles of Raytheon Technologies Corporation.
Consolidation and Classification. The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Raytheon Technologies
Corporation, and all wholly owned, majority-owned and otherwise controlled domestic and foreign subsidiaries. All intercompany
transactions have been eliminated. For classification of certain current assets and liabilities, the duration of our contracts or
programs is utilized to define our operating cycle, which is generally longer than one year. Included within our current assets and
liabilities are contract assets and liabilities related to our aftermarket and development arrangements, which can generally span up
to fifteen years.
As a result of the Separation Transactions, the Distributions and the Raytheon Merger, certain reclassifications have been made to
the prior year amounts to conform to the current year presentation. These reclassifications include the presentation of current assets
and liabilities based upon the duration of our operating cycle, the reclassification of certain unbilled accounts receivable from
accounts receivable, net to contract assets, reclassifications of lease amortization within our presentation of cash flows,
reclassifications within our segment presentation, and the reclassification of the historical Carrier and Otis results to discontinued
operations.
Use of Estimates. Our Consolidated Financial statements are based on the application of U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting
Principles (GAAP), which require us to make estimates and assumptions about future events that affect the amounts reported in our
Consolidated Financial statements and the accompanying notes. As discussed above, the full extent to which the COVID-19
pandemic will directly or indirectly impact our business, results of operations, financial condition, and cash flows, including sales,
expenses, reserves and allowances, asset recoverability and EAC adjustments, will depend on future developments that are highly
uncertain, including new information that may emerge concerning COVID-19 and related containment and treatment actions, as
well as the economic impact on local, regional, national and international customers and markets. We have made estimates of the
impact of COVID-19 within our financial statements and there may be changes to those estimates in future periods. Other future
events, including COVID-19, and their effects cannot be determined with certainty. Therefore, the determination of estimates
requires the exercise of judgment. Actual results could differ from those estimates, and any such differences may be material to our
Consolidated Financial statements.
Cash and Cash Equivalents. Cash and cash equivalents includes cash on hand, demand deposits and short-term cash investments
that are highly liquid in nature and have original maturities of three months or less. The estimated fair value of cash and cash
equivalents approximates the carrying value due to their short maturities.
On occasion, we are required to maintain cash deposits with certain banks with respect to contractual obligations related to
acquisitions or divestitures or other legal obligations. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the amount of such restricted cash was
approximately $30 million and $24 million, respectively. This restricted cash is excluded from cash and cash equivalents and is
included in other assets, current and other assets on our Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Accounts Receivable. Accounts receivable are stated at the net amount expected to be collected. The allowance for credit losses is
established to provide for the expected lifetime credit losses by evaluating factors such as customer creditworthiness, historical
payment and loss experiences, current economic conditions and the age and status of outstanding receivables. See the Accounting
Pronouncements section below for additional information as to how we develop our allowance for credit losses under Accounting
Standards Update (ASU) 2016-13, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial
Instruments.
77
Table of Contents
Unbilled receivables represent revenues that are not currently billable to the customer under the terms of the contract and include
unbilled amounts under commercial contracts where payment is solely subject to the passage of time. These items are expected to
be billed and collected in the normal course of business. Accounts receivable as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 includes unbilled
receivables of $228 million and $265 million, respectively, which primarily includes unbilled receivables with commercial
aerospace customers. Other unbilled receivables not just subject to the passage of time are included in Contract assets in the
Consolidated Balance Sheet, and are generally classified as current.
Contract Assets and Liabilities. Contract assets and liabilities represent the difference in the timing of revenue recognition from
receipt of cash from our customers. Contract assets reflect revenue recognized and performance obligations satisfied or partially
satisfied in advance of customer billing.
Contract liabilities relate to payments received in advance of the satisfaction of performance under the contract. We receive
payments from customers based on the terms established in our contracts.
Contract assets and contract liabilities are generally classified as current as our operating cycle is generally longer than one year.
See “Note 6: Contract Assets and Liabilities” for further discussion of contract assets and liabilities.
Inventory. Inventory is stated at the lower of cost or estimated realizable value and is primarily based on first-in, first-out (FIFO)
or average cost methods.
Valuation reserves for excess, obsolete, and slow-moving inventory are estimated by comparing the inventory levels of individual
parts to both future sales forecasts or production requirements and historical usage rates in order to identify inventory where the
resale value or replacement value is less than inventoriable cost. Other factors that management considers in determining the
adequacy of these reserves include whether individual inventory parts meet current specifications and can be substituted for a part
currently being sold or used as a service part, overall market conditions, and other inventory management initiatives.
Manufacturing costs are allocated to current production contracts. In our commercial aerospace businesses, excess costs beyond
standard manufacturing costs are expensed when they meet certain thresholds.
Equity Method Investments. Investments in which we have the ability to exercise significant influence, but do not control, are
accounted for under the equity method of accounting and are included in Other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Under
this method of accounting, our share of the net earnings or losses of the investee is included in Other income, net on the
Consolidated Statement of Operations since the activities of the investee are closely aligned with the operations of the business
segment holding the investment. We evaluate our equity method investments whenever events or changes in circumstance indicate
that the carrying amounts of such investments may be impaired. If a decline in the value of an equity method investment is
determined to be other than temporary, a loss is recorded in earnings in the current period. RTC sells products to and purchases
products and services from unconsolidated entities accounted for under the equity method, which are considered related parties.
This activity is not considered material to the Consolidated Statement of Operations nor Consolidated Balance Sheet of RTC.
Customer Financing Assets. Customer financing assets (CFA) relate to our commercial aerospace businesses in which we provide
financing to airline customers. Our financing predominately relates to products under lease, and to a lesser extent, notes and lease
receivables. In certain limited circumstances, we pay deposits on behalf of our airline customers to secure production slots with the
airframers, and such pre-delivery payments are included in our notes receivables. Any unfunded pre-delivery payments are included
within our commercial aerospace financing commitments as further discussed in “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies.” We
record revenue from lease assets by applying Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) Accounting Standards Codification
(ASC) Topic 842: Leases, and from interest income on the notes and lease receivables. Interest income from notes and financing
leases and rental income from operating lease assets is generally included in Other income, net in the Consolidated Statement of
Operations, while gains or losses on sales of operating lease assets are included in product sales and cost of sales. The current
portion of these financing arrangements are aggregated in Other assets, current and the non-current portion of these financing
arrangements are aggregated in CFA in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. The increases and decreases in CFA from funding, receipts
and certain other activity, are generally reflected as Investing Activities in the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Leased assets
are valued at cost and reviewed for impairment when circumstances indicate that the related carrying amounts may not be
recoverable. Notes and lease receivables are valued at the net amount expected to be collected. For notes and lease receivables, we
determine a specific reserve for exposure based on the difference between the carrying value of the receivable and the estimated
fair value of the related collateral in connection with the evaluation of credit risk and collectability. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019 the reserves related to CFA were not material. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we did not have any significant balances that
are considered to be delinquent, on non-accrual status, past due 90 days or more, or considered to be impaired.
78
Table of Contents
Business Combinations. Once a business is acquired, the fair value of the identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed is
determined with the excess cost recorded to goodwill. As required, a preliminary fair value is determined once a business is
acquired, with the final determination of the fair value being completed no later than one year from the date of acquisition.
In connection with the acquisitions of Rockwell Collins in 2018 and Goodrich in 2012, and to a lesser extent the acquisition of
Raytheon Company in 2020, we recorded assumed liabilities related to customer contractual obligations on certain contracts with
economic returns that were lower than what could be realized in market transactions as of the acquisition date. We measured these
assumed liabilities based on the estimated cash flows of the programs plus a reasonable contracting profit margin required to
transfer the contracts to market participants. These liabilities are being amortized in accordance with the underlying pattern of
obligations, as reflected by the expenses incurred on the contracts. The balance of the contractual obligations was $1,243 million
and $1,408 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Total consumption of the contractual obligations for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $295 million, $345 million and $252 million, respectively, with future consumption
expected to be as follows: $223 million in 2021, $119 million in 2022, $96 million in 2023, $115 million in 2024, $130 million in
2025 and $560 million thereafter.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets. Goodwill represents costs in excess of fair values assigned to the underlying net assets of
acquired businesses. Goodwill and intangible assets deemed to have indefinite lives are not amortized, but are subject to
impairment testing annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset might be impaired. The
goodwill impairment test compares carrying values of the reporting units to their estimated fair values. If the carrying value
exceeds the fair value then the carrying value is reduced to fair value. In developing our estimates for the fair value of our reporting
units and unamortized intangible assets, significant judgment is required in the determination of the appropriateness of using a
qualitative assessment or quantitative assessment. For the quantitative assessments that are performed, fair value is primarily based
on income approaches using a discounted cash flow method or relief from royalty method, which have significant assumptions
including sales growth rates, projected operating profit, terminal growth rates, discount rates and royalty rates. Such assumptions
are subject to variability from year to year and are directly impacted by, among other things, global market conditions. Finite-lived
intangible assets are tested for impairment when events occur that indicate that the net book value will not be recovered over future
cash flows.
Intangible assets consist of patents, trademarks/tradenames, customer relationships, exclusivity assets, developed technology and
other intangible assets including collaboration assets. Acquired intangible assets are recognized at fair value in purchase
accounting. Finite-lived intangible assets are amortized to cost of sales and selling, general and administrative expenses over the
applicable useful lives. Exclusivity assets are commercial aerospace payments made to secure certain contractual rights to provide
product on new aircraft platforms. We classify amortization of such payments as a reduction of sales. Such payments are capitalized
when there are distinct rights obtained and there are sufficient incremental cash flows to support the recoverability of the assets
established. Otherwise, the applicable portion of the payments are expensed. In addition, in connection with our 2012 agreement to
acquire Rolls-Royce’s ownership and collaboration interests in International Aero Engines AG (IAE), additional payments are due
to Rolls-Royce contingent upon each hour flown through June 2027 by the V2500-powered aircraft in service as of the acquisition
date. These flight hour payments are being capitalized as collaboration assets and amortized to cost of sales.
Useful lives of finite-lived intangible assets are estimated based upon the nature of the intangible asset and the industry in which
the intangible asset is used. These intangible assets are amortized based on the pattern in which the economic benefits of the
intangible assets are consumed, as represented by the underlying cash flows, which may result in an amortization method other than
straight-line. For both our commercial aerospace collaboration assets and exclusivity arrangements, the pattern of economic benefit
generally results in no amortization during the development period with amortization beginning as programs enter full rate
production and aftermarket cycles. If a pattern of economic benefit cannot be reliably determined or if straight-line amortization
approximates the pattern of economic benefit, a straight-line amortization method may be used. The range of estimated useful lives
is as follows:
Years
Collaboration assets 30
Customer relationships and related programs 3 to 32
Developed technology 15 to 25
Patents and trademarks 4 to 30
Exclusivity assets 5 to 25
Leases. We account for leases in accordance with ASC Topic 842: Leases, which we adopted on January 1, 2019. As a lessee, we
record a right-of-use asset and a lease liability on the Consolidated Balance Sheet for all leases with terms longer than 12
79
Table of Contents
months. Leases are classified as either finance or operating, with classification affecting the pattern of expense recognition in the
Consolidated Statement of Operations.
We enter into lease agreements for the use of real estate space, vehicles, information technology equipment, and certain other
equipment under both operating and finance leases. We determine if an arrangement contains a lease at inception. Operating leases
are included in Operating lease right-of-use assets, Accrued liabilities for the current portion of our operating lease liabilities, and
Operating lease liabilities in our Consolidated Balance Sheet. Finance leases are not considered significant to our Consolidated
Balance Sheet or Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Right-of-use assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent our obligation to
make lease payments arising from the lease. Lease right-of-use assets and liabilities are recognized at commencement date based on
the present value of lease payments over the lease term. As most of our leases do not provide an implicit rate, we use our
incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease
payments, and use the implicit rate when readily determinable. We determine our incremental borrowing rate through market
sources including relevant industry rates. Our lease right-of-use assets also include any initial direct costs and lease pre-payments
made at or before the commencement date and are reduced for any lease incentives received at or before the commencement date.
Certain of our leases include variable payments, which may vary based upon changes in facts or circumstances after the start of the
lease. We exclude variable payments from lease right-of-use assets and lease liabilities, to the extent not considered fixed, and
instead, expense variable payments as incurred. Variable lease expense and lease expense for short duration contracts are not a
material component of lease expense. Some of our leases include the option to extend or terminate the lease. We include these
options in the recognition of our right-of-use assets and lease liabilities when it is reasonably certain that we will exercise the
option. Lease expense is generally recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
In limited instances we act as a lessor, primarily for commercial aerospace engines, the majority of which are classified as
operating leases. These leases are not significant to our Consolidated Balance Sheet or Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Other Long-Lived Assets. We evaluate the potential impairment of other long-lived assets whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the related carrying amounts may not be recoverable. If the carrying value of other long-lived assets
held and used exceeds the sum of the undiscounted expected future cash flows, the carrying value is written down to fair value. In
order for long-lived assets to be considered held for disposal, we must have committed to a plan to dispose of the assets. Once
deemed held for disposal, the assets are stated at the lower of the carrying amount or fair value.
Income Taxes. Future income taxes represent the tax effects of transactions which are reported in different periods for tax and
financial reporting purposes. These amounts consist of the tax effects of temporary differences between the tax and financial
reporting balance sheets and tax carryforwards. Future income tax benefits and payables within the same tax paying component of a
particular jurisdiction are offset for presentation in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. In the ordinary course of business there is
inherent uncertainty in quantifying our income tax positions. We assess our income tax positions and record tax benefits for all
years subject to examination based upon management’s evaluation of the facts, circumstances, and information available at the
reporting date. For those tax positions where it is more-likely-than-not that a tax benefit will be sustained, we have recorded the
largest amount of tax benefit with a greater than 50% likelihood of being realized upon ultimate settlement with a taxing authority
that has full knowledge of all relevant information. For those income tax positions where it is not more-likely-than-not that a tax
benefit will be sustained, no tax benefit has been recognized in the financial statements. Where applicable, associated interest
expense has also been recognized. We recognize accrued interest related to unrecognized tax benefits in interest expense. Penalties,
if incurred, would be recognized as a component of income tax expense. State income tax amounts are generally included in
income tax expense; however state income tax payments related to our Raytheon Intelligence & Space (RIS) and Raytheon Missiles
& Defense (RMD) segments are generally recoverable through the pricing of products and services to the U.S. government.
Accordingly, these state income taxes are generally allocated to contracts and reclassified to Selling, general and administrative
expenses when paid (recovered) or otherwise agreed as allocable with the U.S. government.
We have elected to account for tax on Global Intangible Low-Taxed Income (GILTI) as a period cost, as incurred.
Revenue Recognition. The vast majority of our revenues are from long-term contracts associated with the design, development,
manufacture or modification of complex aerospace or defense equipment or related services. Collins Aerospace and Pratt &
Whitney primarily serve commercial and government customers in both the OEM and aftermarket parts and services markets of the
aerospace industry, while RIS and RMD primarily provide products and services to government customers in the defense industry.
We account for a contract when it has approval and commitment from both parties, the rights of the parties are identified, payment
terms are identified, the contract has commercial substance and collectability of consideration is probable. For certain contracts that
meet the foregoing requirements, primarily contracts that are directly with a foreign government, we are required
80
Table of Contents
to obtain certain regulatory approvals. In these cases, we recognize revenue based on the likelihood of obtaining regulatory
approvals based upon all known facts and circumstances. A performance obligation is a promise in a contract with a customer to
transfer a distinct good or service to the customer. Some of our contracts with customers contain a single performance obligation,
while others contain multiple performance obligations most commonly when a contract contains multiple distinct units (such as
engines or certain aerospace components) or spans multiple phases of the product life-cycle such as production, maintenance and
support. A contract’s transaction price is allocated to each distinct performance obligation and recognized as revenue when, or as
the performance obligation is satisfied. When there are multiple performance obligations within a contract, we allocate the
transaction price to each performance obligation based on its standalone selling price when available. If standalone selling price is
not available, we estimate the standalone selling price of each performance obligation, which is generally based on an expected cost
plus a margin approach.
We consider the contractual consideration payable by the customer and assess variable consideration that may affect the total
transaction price, including contractual discounts, contract incentive payments, estimates of award fees, flight hours, aircraft
landings or other customer usage activities on long term maintenance contracts, and other sources of variable consideration, when
determining the transaction price of each contract. When reasonably able to estimate, we include variable consideration in the
transaction price at the most likely amount to which we expect to be entitled. We include estimated amounts in the transaction price
to the extent it is probable that a significant reversal of cumulative revenue recognized will not occur when the uncertainty
associated with the variable consideration is resolved. These estimates are based on historical experience, anticipated performance
and our best judgment at the time. We also consider whether our contracts contain a significant financing component, which they
generally do not.
Timing of the satisfaction of performance obligations varies across our businesses due to our diverse product and service mix,
customer base, and contractual terms.
Performance obligations are satisfied as of a point in time for certain aerospace components, engines, and spare parts. Revenue is
recognized when control of the product transfers to the customer, generally upon product shipment. Since billing also typically
occurs upon product shipment, we generally do not have contract assets or contract liabilities balances related to point in time sales.
Performance obligations are satisfied over-time if the customer receives the benefits as we perform work, if the customer controls
the asset as it is being produced (continuous transfer of control), or if the product being produced for the customer has no
alternative use and we have a contractual right to payment for performance to date. We recognize revenue on an over-time basis for
substantially all defense contracts and certain long-term aerospace OEM and aftermarket contracts.
Substantially all of our defense business revenue, which primarily relates to our RIS and RMD segments, and to a lesser extent
Pratt & Whitney and Collins Aerospace, is recognized over time because of the continuous transfer of control to our customers. For
performance obligations satisfied over time, revenue is recognized on a percentage of completion basis using costs incurred to date
relative to total estimated costs at completion to measure progress. Incurred costs represent work performed, which correspond with
and best depict transfer of control to the customer. Contract costs can include labor, materials, subcontractors’ costs, or other direct
costs and indirect costs. Our contracts with the U.S. government are typically subject to the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR)
and are priced based on estimated or actual costs of producing goods or providing services. The FAR provides guidance on the
types of costs that are allowable in establishing prices for goods and services provided under U.S. government contracts. The
pricing for non-U.S. government contracts is based on the specific negotiations with each customer. Under the typical payment
terms of our U.S. government fixed-price contracts, the customer pays us either performance-based payments (PBPs) or progress
payments. PBPs are interim payments equal to a negotiated percentage of the contract price based on quantifiable measures of
performance or on the achievement of specified events or milestones. Progress payments are interim payments up to 80-90% of
costs incurred as the work progresses. Because the customer retains a portion of the contract price until completion of the contract,
our U.S. government fixed-price contracts generally result in revenue recognized in excess of billings which we present as Contract
assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. For our U.S. government cost-type contracts, the customer generally pays us for our
costs incurred within a short period of time. For non-U.S. government contracts, we typically receive interim payments as work
progresses, although for some contracts, we may be entitled to receive an advance payment. Such advances are not considered a
significant financing component because they are used to meet working capital demands that can be higher in the early stages of a
contract and to protect us from the other party failing to adequately complete some or all of its obligations under the contract. We
recognize a liability for advance payments in excess of revenue recognized and present it as Contract liabilities on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet.
For certain of our long-term aftermarket contracts, revenue is recognized over the contract period. We generally account for such
contracts as a series of daily performance obligations to stand ready to provide spare parts, product maintenance and aftermarket
services. These arrangements include the sale of spare parts with integral services to our customers, and are generally classified as
Service sales, with the corresponding costs classified in Cost of services sold, within the Consolidated
81
Table of Contents
Statement of Operations. Revenue is primarily recognized on a percentage of completion basis using costs incurred to date relative
to total estimated costs at completion to measure progress, as sufficient historical evidence indicates that the cost of performing
services under the contract is incurred on an other-than-straight-line basis. For some of our long-term aftermarket contracts, we
receive payment prior to delivery of products and services, resulting in a contract liability balance, while for others, we deliver
products or services in advance of payment, resulting in a contract asset balance.
Contracts are often modified to account for changes in contract specifications or requirements. We consider contract modifications
to exist when the modification either creates new or changes existing enforceable rights and obligations. Contract modifications for
goods or services that are not distinct are accounted for as part of the existing contract either on a cumulative catch-up basis or
prospective basis depending on the nature of the modification.
Loss provisions on contracts are recognized to the extent that estimated contract costs exceed the estimated consideration from the
products or services contemplated under the contractual arrangement. For new commitments, we generally record loss provisions at
contract signing except for certain contracts under which losses are recorded upon receipt of the purchase order that obligates us to
perform. For existing commitments, anticipated losses on contractual arrangements are recognized in the period in which losses
become evident. In estimating losses, products contemplated under contractual arrangements include firm quantities of product sold
under contract and, in the commercial engine and wheels and brakes businesses, future highly probable sales of replacement parts
required by regulation that are expected to be sold subsequently for incorporation into the original equipment. In our commercial
engine and wheels and brakes businesses, when the OEM product is sold for a loss, but the combined OEM and aftermarket
arrangement for each individual sales campaign is profitable, we record OEM product losses at the time of product delivery.
We review our Estimate at Completion (EACs) on significant contracts on a periodic basis and for others, no less than annually or
when a change in circumstances warrant a modification to a previous estimate. Due to the nature of the work required to be
performed on many of the Company’s performance obligations, the estimation of total revenue and cost at completion is complex,
subject to many variables and requires significant judgment by management on a contract by contract basis. As part of this process,
management reviews information including, but not limited to, any outstanding key contract matters, progress towards completion
and the related program schedule, identified risks and opportunities and the related changes in estimates of revenues and costs. The
risks and opportunities relate to management’s judgment about the ability and cost to achieve the schedule, consideration of
customer-directed delays or reductions in scheduled deliveries, technical requirements, customer activity levels, such as flight hours
or aircraft landings, and related variable consideration. Management’s judgment related to these considerations has become
increasingly more significant given the current economic environment primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic. Management
must make assumptions and estimates regarding contract revenue and costs, including estimates of labor productivity and
availability, the complexity and scope of the work to be performed, the availability and cost of materials, the length of time to
complete the performance obligation, execution by our subcontractors, the availability and timing of funding from our customer,
overhead cost rates, and current and past maintenance cost and frequency driven by estimated aircraft and engine utilization and
estimated useful lives of components, among others. Cost estimates may also include the estimated cost of satisfying our industrial
cooperation agreements, sometimes in the form of either offset obligations or in-country industrial participation (ICIP) agreements,
required under certain contracts primarily within our RIS and RMD segments. These obligations may or may not be distinct
depending on their nature. If cash is paid to a customer to satisfy our offset obligations it is recorded as a reduction in the
transaction price.
Changes in estimates of net sales, cost of sales and the related impact to operating profit on contracts recognized over time are
recognized on a cumulative catch-up basis, which recognizes the cumulative effect of the profit changes on current and prior
periods based on a performance obligation’s percentage of completion in the current period. A significant change in one or more of
these estimates could affect the profitability of one or more of our performance obligations. Our EAC adjustments also include the
establishment of loss provisions for our contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis.
Net EAC adjustments had the following impact on our operating results:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Operating profit (loss) $ (643)$ (69)$ (50)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common
shareowners (508) (55) (40)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable to
common shareowners $ (0.37)$ (0.06)$ (0.05)
(1)    Amounts reflect a U.S. statutory tax rate of 21%, which approximates our tax rate on our EAC adjustments.
For additional discussion on significant unfavorable EAC adjustments see the COVID-19 Pandemic discussion above. In 2020,
2019 and 2018, revenue was reduced by a net of $407 million, $106 million and increased by $72 million, respectively, for(1)
(1)
82
Table of Contents
performance obligations satisfied (or partially satisfied) in previous periods. This primarily relates to EAC adjustments that
impacted revenue.
As a result of the Raytheon Merger, Raytheon Company’s contracts accounted for on a percentage of completion basis were reset to
zero percent complete as of the date of completion of the Raytheon Merger, since only the unperformed portion of the contract at
such date represents an obligation of the Company. This will have the impact of reducing gross favorable and unfavorable EAC
adjustments for these segments in the short-term, with the exception of EAC adjustments related to loss contracts. For additional
information related to the Raytheon Merger, see “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets.”
In our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses, we incur contract fulfillment costs for engineering and development of
aerospace OEM products directly related to existing or anticipated contracts with customers. Such costs generate or enhance our
ability to satisfy our performance obligations under these contracts. We capitalize these costs as contract fulfillment costs to the
extent the costs are recoverable from the associated contract margin and customer funding, and subsequently amortize the costs as
the related performance obligations are satisfied. In instances where intellectual property does not transfer to the customer, we
generally defer the customer funding of product engineering and development and recognize revenue when the related performance
obligations are satisfied. Capitalized contract fulfillment costs were $1,981 million and $1,519 million as of December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively and are classified in Other assets in our Consolidated Balance Sheet and are included in Other operating
activities, net in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. We regularly assess capitalized contract fulfillment costs for
impairment. We had $111 million of impairment for contract fulfillment costs in 2020, and had no impairment in 2019 or 2018.
Costs to obtain contracts are not material.
In view of the risks and costs associated with developing new engines and the large up-front investments required that often require
returns generated over the full estimated life of the engine, Pratt & Whitney has entered into certain collaboration arrangements in
which sales, costs and risks are shared. Sales generated from engine programs, spare parts sales, and aftermarket business under
these collaboration arrangements are recorded consistent with our revenue recognition policies in our Consolidated Financial
Statements. Amounts attributable to our collaborators for their share of sales are recorded as cost of sales in our Consolidated
Financial Statements based upon the terms and nature of the arrangement. Costs associated with engine programs under
collaborative arrangements are expensed as incurred. Under these arrangements, collaborators contribute their program share of
engine parts, incur their own production costs and make certain payments for shared or joint program costs. The reimbursement
from collaborators of their share of program costs is recorded as a reduction of the related expense item at that time. As of
December 31, 2020, the collaborators’ interests in all commercial engine programs ranged from 13% to 49%, inclusive of a portion
of Pratt & Whitney’s interests held by other participants. Pratt & Whitney is the principal participant in all existing collaborative
arrangements, with the exception of the Engine Alliance (EA), a joint venture with GE Aviation, which markets and manufactures
the GP7000 engine for the Airbus A380 aircraft. There are no individually significant collaborative arrangements, and none of the
collaborators individually have more than a 31% share in an individual program. The following table illustrates the Consolidated
Statement of Operations classification and amounts attributable to transactions arising from the collaborative arrangements between
participants for each period presented.
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Collaborator share of sales:
Cost of products sold $ 1,183 $ 2,097 $ 1,688 
Cost of services sold 1,374 1,674 1,765 
Collaborator share of program costs (reimbursement of expenses incurred):
Cost of products sold (147) (190) (209)
Research and development (177) (219) (225)
Selling, general and administrative (99) (101) (87)
In our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses, we may offer customers incentives to purchase our products, which may
result in payments made to those customers, which are treated as a reduction in sales.
Remaining Performance Obligations (RPO). RPO represents the aggregate amount of total contract transaction price that is
unsatisfied or partially unsatisfied. Total RPO was $150.1 billion as of December 31, 2020. Of the total RPO as of December 31,
2020, we expect approximately 30% will be recognized as sales over the next 12 months. This percentage of RPO to be recognized
as sales over the next 12 months depends on our current estimates of future developments, which are highly uncertain, and cannot
be predicted, including new information which may emerge concerning the scope, severity and duration of the COVID-19
pandemic, actions to contain its spread or treat its impact, and governmental, business and individuals’ actions taken in response to
the pandemic, which may result in customer delays or order cancellations.
83
Table of Contents
Research and Development. Company-sponsored research and development costs, including those costs related to the Company’s
portion in connection with cost-sharing arrangements, are charged to expense as incurred and recovery on these cost-sharing
arrangements is recorded as a reduction to research and development expense as earned. Customer-sponsored research and
development projects performed under contracts with customers are accounted for as contract costs and reported as cost of sales on
the related revenue generating contracts.
Foreign Exchange. We conduct business in many different currencies and, accordingly, are subject to the inherent risks associated
with foreign exchange rate movements. The financial position and results of operations of many of our foreign subsidiaries are
often measured using the local currency as the functional currency. Foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities are
translated into U.S. Dollars at the exchange rates existing at the respective balance sheet dates, and income and expense items are
translated at the average exchange rates during the respective periods. The aggregate effects of translating the balance sheets of
these subsidiaries are deferred as a separate component of accumulated other comprehensive loss (AOCL) in shareowners’ equity.
Derivatives and Hedging Activity. We use derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options, to help manage
certain foreign currency, and from time to time to help manage interest rate and commodity price exposures. Derivative instruments
are viewed as risk management tools by us and are not used for trading or speculative purposes. By their nature, all financial
instruments involve market and credit risks. We enter into derivative and other financial instruments with major investment grade
financial institutions and have policies to monitor the credit risk of those counterparties. We limit counterparty exposure and
concentration of risk by diversifying counterparties. While there can be no assurance, we do not anticipate any material non-
performance by any of these counterparties. We enter into transactions that are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements
or similar agreements with various counterparties. However, we have not elected to offset multiple contracts with a single
counterparty and, as a result, the fair value of the derivative instruments in a loss position is not offset against the fair value of
derivative instruments in a gain position.
Derivatives used for hedging purposes may be designated and effective as a hedge of the identified risk exposure at the inception of
the contract. All derivative instruments are recorded on the balance sheet at fair value. Derivatives used to hedge foreign currency
denominated balance sheet items are reported directly in earnings along with offsetting transaction gains and losses on the items
being hedged. Derivatives used to hedge forecasted cash flows associated with foreign currency commitments or forecasted
commodity purchases may be accounted for as cash flow hedges, as deemed appropriate. Gains and losses on derivatives
designated as cash flow hedges are recorded in other comprehensive income and reclassified to earnings as a component of product
sales or expenses, as applicable, when the hedged transaction occurs. Cash payments or receipts on derivatives designated as cash
flow hedges are recorded in Other operating activities, net within the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. To the extent that a
previously designated hedging transaction is no longer an effective hedge, any ineffectiveness measured in the hedging relationship
is recorded currently in earnings in the period it occurs.
To the extent the hedge accounting criteria are not met, the foreign currency forward contracts are utilized as economic hedges and
changes in the fair value of these contracts are recorded currently in earnings in the period in which they occur. Cash receipts or
payments related to the settlement of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments are recorded as investing cash flows within
the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows. Additional information pertaining to foreign currency forward contracts and net
investment hedging is included in “Note 15: Financial Instruments.”
Environmental. Environmental investigatory, remediation, operating and maintenance costs are accrued when it is probable that a
liability has been incurred and the amount can be reasonably estimated. The most likely cost to be incurred is accrued based on an
evaluation of currently available facts with respect to each individual site, including existing technology, current laws and
regulations and prior remediation experience. Where no amount within a range of estimates is more likely, the minimum is accrued.
For sites with multiple responsible parties, we consider our likely proportionate share of the anticipated remediation costs and the
ability of the other parties to fulfill their obligations in establishing a provision for those costs. Liabilities with fixed or reliably
determinable future cash payments are discounted. A portion of these costs is eligible for future recovery through the pricing of our
products and services to the U.S. government. We regularly assess the probability of recovery of these costs, which requires us to
make assumptions about the extent of cost recovery under our contracts and the amount of future contract activity with the U.S.
government. We consider such recovery probable based on government contracting regulations and our history of receiving
reimbursement for such costs, and accordingly have recorded the future recovery of these costs from the U.S. government within
Other assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Accrued environmental liabilities are not reduced by potential insurance
reimbursements or potential recoveries from pursuing other parties. See “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies” for additional
details on the environmental remediation activities.
Pension and Postretirement Obligations. U.S. GAAP requires balance sheet recognition of the overfunded or underfunded status
of pension and postretirement benefit (PRB) plans. Funded status is measured at least annually in the fourth quarter and represents
the difference between the plans’ projected benefit obligation (PBO) and the fair market value of the plans’ assets.
84
Table of Contents
Changes to our pension and PRB plans’ funded status can result from company actions, such as contributions or changes in plan
provisions, or by gains and losses. Gains and losses are primarily a result of changes in assumptions and actual experience that
differs from these assumptions. Major assumptions include the discount rate and expected return on plan assets (EROA). These
gains or losses are recorded in other comprehensive income, net of tax effects, until they are amortized as a component of net
periodic benefit (income) expense.
A calculated “market-related value” of our plan assets is used to develop the amount of deferred asset gains or losses to be
amortized. The market-related value of assets is equal to the fair value of assets adjusted to reflect the recognition, and subsequent
amortization, of the difference between actual and expected asset returns over a five-year period. The market-related value of assets
is used to calculate the expected return on assets included in the net periodic benefit (income) expense.
The Company has elected to use the “corridor” approach in the amortization of gains and losses, which limits the expense
recognition to the net outstanding gains and losses in excess of the greater of 10% of the PBO or 10% of the market-related value of
assets. Gains and losses exceeding the corridor are amortized in net periodic benefit (income) expense over either the projected
average remaining employee service period or the projected average remaining lifetime of inactive participants depending on the
plan.
Net periodic benefit (income) expense is split between operating profit and non-operating income, whereby only the service cost
component is included in operating profit and the remaining components are included in Non-service pension (income) expense.
Product Performance Obligations. We extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our normal service and
warranty policies for extended periods on some of our products, particularly commercial aircraft engines. Liability under such
guarantees is based upon future product performance and durability. We accrue for such costs that are probable and can be
reasonably estimated. In addition, we incur discretionary costs to service our products in connection with product performance
issues. The costs associated with these product performance and operating cost guarantees require estimates over the full terms of
the agreements, and require management to consider factors such as the extent of future maintenance requirements, interval
between flight and repair time and the future cost of material and labor to perform the services. These cost estimates are largely
based upon historical experience. See “Note 18: Guarantees” for further discussion.
Accounting Pronouncements. In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-13, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326):
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments. This ASU and its related amendments (collectively, the Credit Loss
Standard) modifies the impairment model to utilize an expected loss methodology in place of the incurred loss methodology for
financial instruments, including trade receivables, contract assets and off-balance sheet credit exposures. The Credit Loss Standard
requires consideration of a broader range of information to estimate expected credit losses, including historical information, current
economic conditions and a reasonable forecast period. This ASU requires that the statement of operations reflect estimates of
expected credit losses for newly recognized financial assets as well as changes in the estimate of expected credit losses that have
taken place during the period, which may result in earlier recognition of certain losses.
We adopted this standard effective January 1, 2020 utilizing a modified retrospective approach. A cumulative-effect non-cash
adjustment to retained earnings as of January 1, 2020 was recorded in the amount of $59 million. The adoption of this standard did
not have a material impact on the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements.
We are exposed to credit losses primarily through our sales of products and services to commercial customers which are recorded
as trade receivables, contract assets, long-term receivables, and notes and lease receivables on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. We
do not have any significant exposure for credit losses related to sales of products and services to our government customers. Our
method for developing our allowance for credit losses involves making informed judgments regarding whether an adjustment is
necessary to our historical loss experiences to reflect our expectations around current economic conditions and reasonable and
supportable forecast periods, where applicable. We utilize current economic market data as well as other internal and external
information available to us to inform our decision making. In certain circumstances we may be able to develop reasonable and
supportable forecasts over the contractual term of the financial asset or off-balance sheet exposure. For periods beyond which we
are able to make or obtain reasonable and supportable forecasts, we revert to historical loss experience and information.
We determine credit ratings for each customer in our portfolio based upon public information and information obtained directly
from our customers. We conduct a review of customer credit ratings, published historical credit default rates for different rating
categories, and multiple third-party aircraft value publications as a basis to validate the reasonableness of the allowance for credit
losses on these balances quarterly or when events and circumstances warrant. In addition to credit quality indicators, factors
considered in our evaluation of assessing collectability and risk include: underlying value of any collateral or security interests,
significant past due balances, historical losses, and existing economic conditions, including geographic and political risk. A credit
limit is established for each customer based on the outcome of this review. Customer credit ratings range from
85
Table of Contents
customers with an extremely strong capacity to meet financial obligations, to customers whose uncollateralized receivable is in
default. We may require collateral or prepayment to mitigate credit risk.
To estimate expected credit losses of financial assets with similar risk characteristics, we determine an asset is impaired when,
based on historical experience, current information and a reasonable forecast period, there is risk that we will be unable to collect
amounts due according to the contractual terms of the agreement. We monitor our ongoing credit exposure through reviews of
customer balances against contract terms and due dates, current economic conditions, and dispute resolution. Estimated credit
losses are written off in the period in which the financial asset is no longer collectible.
We can also be exposed to credit losses from off-balance sheet exposures, such as certain financial guarantees and financing
commitments. We have assessed these potential exposures and concluded that there are no material associated credit losses as of
December 31, 2020.
In December 2019, the FASB issued ASU 2019-12, Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes. The
amendments in this update remove certain exceptions of Topic 740 including: exception to the incremental approach for intraperiod
tax allocation when there is a loss from continuing operations and income or gain from other items; exception to the requirement to
recognize a deferred tax liability for equity method investments when a foreign subsidiary becomes an equity method investment;
exception to the ability not to recognize a deferred tax liability for a foreign subsidiary when a foreign equity method investment
becomes a subsidiary; exception to the general methodology for calculating income taxes in an interim period when a year-to-date
loss exceeds the anticipated loss for the year. There are also additional areas of guidance in regards to: franchise and other taxes
partially based on income and the interim recognition of enactment of tax laws and rate changes. The provisions of this ASU are
effective for years beginning after December 15, 2020. We are currently evaluating the impact of this ASU on our Consolidated
Financial Statements.
Other new pronouncements issued but not effective until after December 31, 2020 did not and are not expected to have a material
impact on our financial position, results of operations or liquidity.
NOTE 2: BUSINESS ACQUISITIONS, DISPOSITIONS, GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
Business Acquisitions. Our investments in businesses net of cash acquired in 2020, 2019 and 2018 totaled $35,077 million
(including debt assumed of $4,700 million and stock issued of $33,166 million), $9 million, and $30,783 million (including debt
assumed of $7,784 million and stock issued of $7,960 million) respectively. Our investments in businesses in 2020 and 2018
primarily consisted of the acquisition of Raytheon Company and Rockwell Collins, Inc. (Rockwell Collins), respectively.
Raytheon Merger. As noted above, on April 3, 2020, pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated June 9, 2019, as amended
(the Raytheon Merger Agreement) UTC and Raytheon Company completed their previously announced all-stock merger of equals,
following the completion by UTC of the Separation Transactions and Distributions. Raytheon Company (previously New York
Stock Exchange (NYSE): RTN) shares ceased trading prior to the market open on April 3, 2020, and each share of Raytheon
common stock was converted in the merger into the right to receive 2.3348 shares of UTC common stock previously traded on the
NYSE under the ticker symbol “UTX.” Upon closing of the Raytheon Merger, UTC’s name was changed to “Raytheon
Technologies Corporation,” and its shares of common stock began trading as of April 3, 2020 on the NYSE under the ticker symbol
“RTX.”
Total consideration is calculated as follows:
(dollars in millions) Amount
Fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity
awards $ 33,067 
Fair value attributable to pre-merger service for replacement equity awards 99 
Total merger consideration $ 33,166 
86
Table of Contents
The fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity awards is
calculated as follows:
(dollars and shares in millions, except per share amounts and exchange ratio) Amount
Number of Raytheon Company common shares outstanding as of April 3, 2020 277.3
Number of Raytheon Company stock awards vested as a result of the Raytheon Merger 0.4
Total outstanding shares of Raytheon Company common stock and equity awards entitled to merger consideration 277.7
Exchange ratio 2.3348
Shares of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity awards 648.4
Price per share of RTC common stock $ 51.00 
Fair value of RTC common stock issued for Raytheon Company outstanding common stock and vested equity
awards $ 33,067 
(1)    Represents Raytheon Company stock awards that vested as a result of the Raytheon Merger, which is considered a “change in control” for purposes of the
Raytheon 2010 Stock Plan. Certain Raytheon Company restricted stock awards and Raytheon Company restricted stock unit (RSU) awards, issued under the
Raytheon 2010 Stock Plan vested on an accelerated basis as a result of the Raytheon Merger. Such vested awards were converted into the right to receive RTC
common stock determined as the product of (1) the number of vested awards, and (2) the exchange ratio.
(2)    The exchange ratio is equal to 2.3348 shares of UTC common stock for each share of Raytheon Company common stock in accordance with the Raytheon
Merger Agreement.
(3)    The price per share of RTC common stock is based on the RTC opening stock price as of April 3, 2020.
Preliminary Allocation of Consideration Transferred to Net Assets Acquired. We are accounting for the Raytheon Merger under the
acquisition method and are required to measure identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed of the acquiree (Raytheon
Company) at the fair values on the closing date. The following amounts represent the preliminary determination of the fair value of
identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed from the Raytheon Merger. As of December 31, 2020, the majority of the
valuation studies necessary to determine the fair market value of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed have been reviewed and
finalized; however, our assessment of certain contingencies including environmental liabilities, pension and postretirement benefit
obligations and taxes remain open for completion of the related valuation analyses. We expect to finalize the purchase price
allocation process in the first quarter of 2021 when we finalize our valuations and reviews.(1)
(2)
(3)
87
Table of Contents
Any potential adjustments made could be material in relation to the preliminary values presented below.
(dollars in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,208 
Accounts receivable 1,997 
Inventory 705 
Contract assets 6,023 
Other assets, current 940 
Fixed assets 4,745 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 950 
Intangible assets: 19,130 
Customer relationships 12,900 
Tradenames/trademarks 5,430 
Developed technology 800 
Other assets 1,193 
Total identifiable assets acquired 38,891 
Accounts payable 1,455 
Accrued employee compensation 1,492 
Other accrued liabilities 1,797 
Contract liabilities 2,991 
Long-term debt, including current portion 4,700 
Operating lease liabilities, non-current portion 738 
Future pension and postretirement benefit obligation 11,621 
Other long-term liabilities 2,425 
Total liabilities acquired 27,219 
Total identifiable net assets 11,672 
Goodwill 21,528 
Redeemable noncontrolling interest (34)
Total consideration transferred $ 33,166 
Fair value adjustments to Raytheon Company’s identified assets and liabilities included an increase in fixed assets of $1.1 billion.
Fair value adjustments also included a preliminarily estimated increase to future pension and postretirement benefit obligations of
$3.6 billion, primarily related to remeasurement of the liability based on market conditions on the Raytheon Merger closing date,
which includes an incremental adjustment of $980 million in the fourth quarter of 2020, principally due to a refinement of our
demographic assumptions. For further information, see “Note 11: Employee Benefit Plans.” In determining the fair value of
identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed, a review was conducted for any significant contingent assets or liabilities
existing as of such closing date. The preliminary assessment did not note any significant contingencies related to existing legal or
government action.
The fair values of the customer relationship intangible assets were determined by using a discounted cash flow valuation method,
which is a form of the income approach. Under this approach, the estimated future cash flows attributable to the asset are adjusted
to exclude the future cash flows that can be attributed to supporting assets, such as trade names or fixed assets. Both the amount
and the duration of the cash flows are considered from a market participant perspective. Our estimates of market participant future
cash flows, which require significant management judgment, included forecasted revenue growth rates, remaining developmental
effort, operational performance including company specific synergies, program life cycles, material and labor pricing, and other
relevant customer, contractual and market factors. Where appropriate, the net cash flows are probability-adjusted to reflect the
uncertainties associated with the underlying assumptions, including cancellation rates related to backlog, government demand for
sole-source and recompete contracts and win rates for recompete contracts, as well as the risk profile of the net cash flows utilized
in the valuation. The probability-adjusted future cash flows are then discounted to present value, using an appropriate discount rate
that requires significant judgment by management. The customer relationship intangible assets are being amortized based on the
pattern of economic benefits we expect to realize over the estimated economic life of the underlying programs. The fair value of the
tradename intangible assets were determined utilizing the relief from royalty method which is a form of the income approach.
Under this method, a royalty rate based on observed market royalties is applied to projected revenue supporting the tradename and
discounted to present value, using forecasted revenue growth rate projections and a discount rate, respectively, that requires
significant judgment by management. The
88
Table of Contents
tradename intangible assets have been determined to have an indefinite life. The developed technology intangible assets are being
amortized based on the pattern of economic benefits. The intangible assets included above consist of the following:
(dollars in millions)Estimated
Fair ValueEstimated
Life
Acquired customer relationships $ 12,900 25 years
Acquired tradenames 5,430 Indefinite
Acquired developed technology 800 5 to 7 years
Total identifiable intangible assets $ 19,130 
We also identified customer contractual obligations on loss making programs and recorded liabilities of $222 million related to
these programs based on the difference between the actual expected operating loss and a normalized operating profit. These
liabilities will be liquidated based on the expected pattern of expenses incurred on these contracts.
We recorded $21.5 billion of goodwill as a result of the Raytheon Merger which primarily relates to expected synergies from
combining operations and the value of the existing workforce. The goodwill generated as a result of the Raytheon Merger is
nondeductible for tax purposes.
Merger-Related Costs. Merger-related costs have been expensed as incurred. In 2020, approximately $142 million, of transaction
and integration costs have been incurred which excludes $23 million of transaction costs related to the divestitures required for
regulatory approval discussed further in Dispositions below. These costs were recorded in Selling, general and administrative
expenses within the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Supplemental Pro-Forma Data. Raytheon Company’s results of operations have been included in RTC’s financial statements for
the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. The following unaudited supplemental pro-
forma data presents consolidated information as if the Raytheon Merger had been completed on January 1, 2019. The pro-forma
results were calculated by combining the results of Raytheon Technologies with the stand-alone results of Raytheon Company for
the pre-acquisition periods, which were adjusted to account for certain costs that would have been incurred during this pre-
acquisition period. The results below reflect Raytheon Technologies on a continuing operations basis, in order to more accurately
represent the structure of Raytheon Technologies after completion of the Separation Transactions and the Raytheon Merger.
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts) 2020 2019
Net sales $ 64,087 $ 74,238 
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to common shareowners (2,167) 6,544 
Basic earnings (loss) per share of common stock from continuing operations $ (1.43)$ 4.34 
Diluted earnings (loss) per share of common stock from continuing operations (1.43) 4.31 
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma data above includes the following significant adjustments made to account for certain costs
which would have been incurred if the acquisition had been completed on January 1, 2019, as adjusted for the applicable tax
impact. As the merger was completed on April 3, 2020, the pro-forma adjustments in the table below only include the required
adjustments through April 3, 2020.
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Amortization of acquired Raytheon Company intangible assets, net $ (270)$ (1,048)
Amortization of fixed asset fair value adjustment (9) (38)
Utilization of contractual customer obligation 8 57 
Deferred revenue fair value adjustment (4) (33)
Adjustment to non-service pension (income) expense 239 832 
RTC/Raytheon fees for advisory, legal, accounting services 134 (134)
Adjustment to interest expense related to the Raytheon Merger, net 9 36 
Elimination of deferred commission amortization 5 20 
$ 112 $ (308)
(1)    Reflects the additional amortization of the acquired Raytheon Company’s intangible assets recognized at fair value in purchase accounting and eliminates the
historical Raytheon Company intangible asset amortization expense.
(2)    Reflects the amortization of the fixed asset fair value adjustment as of the acquisition date.
(3)    Reflects the additional amortization of liabilities recognized for certain acquired loss making contracts as of the acquisition date.
(4)    Reflects the difference between prepayments related to extended arrangements and the preliminary fair value of the assumed performance obligations as they
are satisfied.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
 (5)
 (6)
 (7)
(8)
89
Table of Contents
(5)    Represents the elimination of unamortized prior service costs and actuarial losses, as a result of fair value purchase accounting.
(6)    Reflects the elimination of transaction-related fees incurred by RTC and Raytheon Company in connection with the Raytheon Merger and assumes all of the
fees were incurred during the first quarter of 2019.
(7)    Reflects the amortization of the fair market value adjustment related to Raytheon Company.
(8)    Reflects the elimination of amortization recognized on deferred commissions that are eliminated in purchase accounting.
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma financial information does not reflect the potential realization of cost savings related to the
integration of the two companies. Further, the pro-forma data should not be considered indicative of the results that would have
occurred if the acquisition had been consummated on January 1, 2019, nor are they indicative of future results.
In December 2020, we completed the acquisition of Blue Canyon Technologies, a leading provider of small satellites and spacecraft
systems components, for $426 million, net of cash received. Blue Canyon Technologies is reported in the Raytheon Intelligence &
Space segment. In connection with this acquisition, we preliminarily recorded $266 million of goodwill, primarily related to
expected synergies from combining operations and the value of the existing workforce, which is expected to be deductible for tax
purposes, and $141 million of intangible assets, primarily related to customer relationships. The purchase price allocation process is
expected to be complete in 2021 after the conclusion of our final reviews.
Rockwell Collins Acquisition. On November 26, 2018, we completed the acquisition of Rockwell Collins (the Rockwell
Acquisition), a leader in aviation and high-integrity solutions for commercial and military customers as well as leading-edge
avionics, flight controls, aircraft interior and data connectivity solutions. Under the terms of the Rockwell acquisition agreement,
each share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of Rockwell Collins issued and outstanding immediately prior to the
effective time of the Rockwell Acquisition (other than shares held by Rockwell Collins, the Company, Riveter Merger Sub Corp or
any of their respective wholly owned subsidiaries) was converted into the right to receive (1) $93.33 in cash, without interest, and
(2) 0.37525 shares of Company common stock (together, the Acquisition Consideration), less any applicable withholding taxes,
with cash paid in lieu of fractional shares. The total aggregate consideration payable in the Rockwell Acquisition was $15.5 billion
in cash ($14.9 billion net of cash acquired) and 62.2 million shares of Company common stock. In addition, $7.8 billion of
Rockwell Collins debt was outstanding at the time of the Rockwell Acquisition. This equated to a total enterprise value of $30.6
billion, including the $7.8 billion of Rockwell Collins’ outstanding debt.
(dollars in millions) Amount
Cash consideration paid for Rockwell Collins outstanding common stock & equity awards $ 15,533 
Fair value of UTC common stock issued for Rockwell Collins outstanding common stock & equity awards 7,960 
Total consideration transferred $ 23,493 
The cash consideration utilized for the Rockwell Acquisition was partially financed through the issuance of $11.0 billion aggregate
principal notes on August 16, 2018 for net proceeds of $10.9 billion. For the remainder of the cash consideration, we utilized
repatriated cash and cash equivalents and cash flow generated from operating activities.
Acquisition-Related Costs. Acquisition-related costs have been expensed as incurred. In 2019 and 2018, $40 million and $112
million, respectively, of transaction and integration costs have been incurred related to the Rockwell Acquisition. These costs were
recorded in Selling, general and administrative expenses within the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Supplemental Pro-Forma Data. Rockwell Collins’ results of operations have been included in RTC’s financial statements for the
period subsequent to the completion of the acquisition on November 26, 2018. Rockwell Collins contributed sales of approximately
$778 million and operating profit of approximately $11 million for the year ended December 31, 2018. The following unaudited
supplemental pro-forma data presents consolidated information as if the acquisition had been completed on January 1, 2017. The
pro-forma results were calculated by combining the results of RTC with the stand-alone results of Rockwell Collins for the pre-
acquisition periods, which were adjusted to account for certain costs that would have been incurred during this pre-acquisition
period:
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in millions) 2018
Net sales $ 42,336 
Net income attributable to common shareowners from continuing operations 2,011 
Basic earnings per share of common stock from continuing operations $ 2.26 
Diluted earnings per share of common stock from continuing operations 2.24 
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma data above includes the following significant adjustments made to account for certain costs
which would have been incurred if the acquisition had been completed on January 1, 2017, as adjusted for the applicable
90
Table of Contents
tax impact. As our acquisition of Rockwell Collins was completed on November 26, 2018, the pro-forma adjustments in the table
below only include the required adjustments through November 26, 2018:
(dollars in millions) 2018
Amortization of inventory and fixed asset fair value adjustment $ 58 
Amortization of acquired Rockwell Collins intangible assets, net (193)
Utilization of contractual customer obligation 16 
RTC/Rockwell fees for advisory, legal, accounting services 212 
Interest expense incurred on acquisition financing, net (199)
Elimination of capitalized pre-production engineering amortization 63 
Adjustment to net periodic pension cost 42 
Adjustment to reflect the adoption of ASC 606 106 
Elimination of entities held for sale (47)
$ 58 
(1)    Reflects the elimination of the inventory step-up amortization recorded by RTC in 2018 as this would have been completed within the first two quarters of
2017. Additionally, this adjustment reflects the amortization of the fixed asset fair value adjustment as of the acquisition date.
(2)    Reflects the additional amortization of the acquired Rockwell Collins’ intangible assets recognized at fair value in purchase accounting and eliminates the
historical Rockwell Collins intangible asset amortization expense.
(3)    Reflects the additional amortization of liabilities recognized for acquired contracts with terms less favorable than could be realized in market transactions as of
the acquisition date and eliminates Rockwell Collins historical amortization of these liabilities.
(4)    Reflects the elimination of transaction-related fees incurred by RTC and Rockwell Collins in connection with the acquisition and assumes all of the fees were
incurred during the first quarter of 2017.
(5)    Reflects the additional interest expense incurred on debt to finance our acquisition of Rockwell Collins and reduces interest expense for the debt fair value
adjustment which would have been amortized.
(6)    Reflects the elimination of Rockwell Collins capitalized pre-production engineering amortization to conform to RTC policy.
(7)    Reflects adjustments for the elimination of amortization of prior service cost and actuarial loss amortization, which was recorded by Rockwell Collins, as a
result of fair value purchase accounting, net of the impact of the revised pension and post-retirement benefit (expense) as determined under RTC’s plan
assumptions.
(8)    Reflects adjustments to Rockwell Collins revenue recognition as if they adopted the New Revenue Standard as of January 1, 2018 and primarily relates to
capitalization of contract costs and changes in timing of sales recognition for contracts requiring an over time method of revenue recognition, partially offset
by deferral of revenue recognized on OEM product engineering and development.
(9)    Reflects the elimination of entities required to be sold for regulatory approvals.
The unaudited supplemental pro-forma financial information does not reflect the potential realization of cost savings related to the
integration of the two companies. Further, the pro-forma data should not be considered indicative of the results that would have
occurred if the acquisition and related financing had been consummated on January 1, 2017, nor are they indicative of future
results.
Dispositions. In 2020, 2019 and 2018 cash inflows related to dispositions during were $2,556 million, $134 million, and $74
million, respectively.
As discussed further in “Note 3: Discontinued Operations,” on April 2, 2020, Carrier and Otis entered into a Separation and
Distribution Agreement with UTC (since renamed Raytheon Technologies Corporation), pursuant to which, among other things,
UTC agreed to separate into three independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier and Otis and distribute all of the
outstanding common stock of Carrier and Otis to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of
business on March 19, 2020. UTC distributed 866,158,910 and 433,079,455 shares of common stock of Carrier and Otis,
respectively in the Distributions. As a result of the Distributions, Carrier and Otis are now independent publicly traded companies.
In May 2020, in order to meet the requirements for regulatory approval of the Raytheon Merger, we completed the sale of our
airborne tactical radios business for $231 million in cash, net of transaction-related costs. The business was part of our RIS
segment. As the transaction occurred subsequent to the Raytheon Merger, the gain of $199 million was not recorded in the
Consolidated Statement of Operations, but rather was recorded as part of the fair value of net assets acquired in the preliminary
allocation of consideration transferred to net assets acquired in the Raytheon Merger, as discussed further above. Income before
taxes related to the disposed business for the period from the closing of the Raytheon Merger to disposal date was not material.
In the third quarter of 2020, in accordance with conditions imposed for regulatory approval of the Raytheon Merger, we completed
the sale of our Collins Aerospace military Global Positioning System (GPS) and space-based precision optics businesses for
$2.3 billion in cash, resulting in an aggregate pre-tax gain, net of transaction costs, of $564 million ($240 million after tax), of
which $595 million was included in Other income, net partially offset by $23 million of aggregate transaction costs included in
Selling, general and administrative costs and an $8 million expense included in Non-service pension (income)(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(9)
91
Table of Contents
expense within our Consolidated Statement of Operations. Income before taxes for 2020, through the date of sale, and for full year
2019 for these businesses were $94 million and $153 million, respectively.
In October 2020, we entered into a definitive agreement to sell our Forcepoint business, which we completed in January 2021, for
$1.1 billion in cash. At December 31, 2020, the related assets of approximately $1.9 billion and liabilities of approximately
$855 million have been accounted for as held for sale at fair value less cost to sell; however, Forcepoint does not qualify for
presentation as discontinued operations. These held for sale assets and liabilities are presented in Other assets, current and Other
accrued liabilities, respectively, on our Consolidated Balance Sheet. Assets held for sale included $1.4 billion of goodwill and
intangible assets. A further breakout of major classes of assets and liabilities has not been provided as the assets and liabilities held
for sale are not material. We do not expect to recognize a pre-tax gain or loss within the Consolidated Statement of Operations
related to the sale of Forcepoint, as any difference between the fair value, as determined by the purchase price, and the book value
of the net assets has been recorded as part of the fair value of the net assets acquired in the preliminary allocation of consideration
transferred to net assets acquired in the Raytheon Merger. The results of Forcepoint are included in Eliminations and other in our
segment results.
Goodwill. Changes in our goodwill balances for the year ended in 2020 were as follows:
(dollars in millions)Balance as of
January 1,
2020Acquisitions and
DivestituresImpairment
LossesForeign
currency
translation
and otherBalance as of
December 31,
2020
Collins Aerospace Systems $ 35,025 $ (890)$ (3,183)$ 619 $ 31,571 
Pratt & Whitney 1,563 — — — 1,563 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space — 9,236 — 4 9,240 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense — 11,887 — 3 11,890 
Total Segment 36,588 20,233 (3,183) 626 54,264 
Eliminations and other 21 — — — 21 
Total $ 36,609 $ 20,233 $ (3,183)$ 626 $ 54,285 
The Company reviews goodwill for impairment annually or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate the asset
might be impaired.
We considered the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic to be a
triggering event in the first and second quarters of 2020, requiring an impairment evaluation of goodwill, intangible assets and
other assets in our commercial aerospace businesses, Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney. Beginning in the second quarter of
2020, we observed several airline customer bankruptcies, delays and cancellations of aircraft purchases by airlines, fleet retirements
and repositioning of OEM production schedules and we experienced a significant decline in revenues at our Collins Aerospace and
Pratt & Whitney businesses due to a decline in flight hours, aircraft fleet utilization, shop visits and commercial OEM deliveries.
These factors contributed to a deterioration of our expectations regarding the timing of a return to pre-COVID-19 commercial flight
activity, which further reduced our future sales and cash flows expectations.
In the second quarter of 2020, we evaluated the Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney reporting units for goodwill impairment
and determined that the carrying values of two of the six Collins Aerospace reporting units exceeded the sum of discounted future
cash flows, resulting in goodwill impairments of $3.2 billion. Collins Aerospace discounted future cash flow estimates were
developed for three scenarios: a base case, a downside case, and an upside case. These scenarios included assumptions regarding
future airline flight activity, out of warranty hours on original equipment, expected repairs, upgrades and replacements, future OEM
manufacturing schedules and related environmental assumptions, including individuals’ desire to return to normal travel, business
needs to travel, and potential cures or vaccines to prevent or reduce the effects of COVID-19. These estimates require a significant
amount of judgment and are subject to change based upon factors outside our control. We weighted the three scenarios as follows:
50% for the base case, 40% for the downside case, and 10% for the upside case, and used these weightings, as we believed they
reflected the risks and opportunities relative to our estimates. Goodwill impairment was not indicated for any of the other reporting
units evaluated for impairment in any of these scenarios.
We did not identify any further deterioration to our expectations in the third quarter of 2020, and therefore, did not have a triggering
event.
92
Table of Contents
On October 1, 2020, we changed our annual goodwill impairment testing date from July 1 to October 1 to better align with the
timing of our annual long-term planning process. Accordingly, management determined that the change in accounting principle is
preferable under the circumstance. This change has been applied prospectively from October 1, 2020 as retrospective application
would not change the Company’s accounting for goodwill. This change was not material to our Consolidated Financial Statements
as it did not delay, accelerate, or avoid any potential goodwill impairment charges. We completed our annual impairment testing as
of October 1, 2020, where we assessed our Pratt & Whitney, RIS, RMD and one of the Collins Aerospace reporting units using
qualitative factors to determine whether it was more likely than not that any individual reporting unit’s fair value is less than its
carrying value (step 0) and determined that no further testing was required based on there being no significant changes at RIS and
RMD since the acquisition of Raytheon Company and the substantial cushion of fair value over book value at the other reporting
units. For the remainder of our Collins Aerospace reporting units, we compared the fair value of the reporting units to their
respective carrying values (step 1), and determined that no additional adjustments to the carrying value of goodwill were necessary.
Based on our annual impairment analysis as of October 1, 2020, the reporting unit that was closest to impairment was a reporting
unit at Collins Aerospace with a fair value in excess of book value, including goodwill, of $1.2 billion or 7%.
Impairment evaluations at Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney resulted in several other non-goodwill related impairment
charges as further discussed in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles.” These charges were
primarily due to declines in expected future commercial air traffic, airline bankruptcies, or other impacts such as accelerated fleet
retirements, announced program delays and expected changes to contract terms.
The Company continuously monitors for events and circumstances that could negatively impact the key assumptions in
determining the fair value of goodwill, including long-term revenue growth projections, profitability, discount rates, recent market
valuations from transactions by comparable companies, volatility in the Company’s market capitalization, and general industry,
market and macro-economic conditions. It is possible that future changes in such circumstances, including a more prolonged and/or
severe COVID-19 pandemic than originally anticipated, or future changes in the variables associated with the judgments,
assumptions and estimates used in assessing the fair value of our reporting units, including the expected long term recovery of
airline travel to pre-COVID-19 levels, would require the Company to record a non-cash impairment charge.
Intangible Assets. Identifiable intangible assets are comprised of the following:
 2020 2019
(dollars in millions)Gross
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationGross
AmountAccumulated
Amortization
Amortized:
Patents and trademarks $ 48 $ (35)$ 47 $ (34)
Collaboration intangible assets 5,021 (1,024) 4,862 (920)
Exclusivity assets 2,541 (295) 2,386 (275)
Developed technology and other 906 (316) 890 (217)
Customer relationships 30,241 (5,262) 17,750 (3,392)
 38,757 (6,932) 25,935 (4,838)
Unamortized:
Trademarks and other 8,714 — 3,376 — 
Total $ 47,471 $ (6,932)$ 29,311 $ (4,838)
Given the deterioration in general economic and market conditions primarily due to the COVID-19 pandemic, we performed an
assessment of our unamortized intangible assets and recorded $57 million in 2020 related to the impairment of an indefinite-lived
tradename intangible assets at Collins Aerospace. At December 31, 2020, the intangible asset that was closest to impairment was a
tradename at Collins Aerospace with a fair value in excess of book value of approximately $110 million, or 7%. We also evaluated
amortizable intangible assets and identified no impairments. We will continue to evaluate the impact on our customers and our
business in future periods which may result in a different conclusion.
Amortization of intangible assets was $2,125 million, $1,244 million and $736 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The
following is the expected amortization of total intangible assets for 2021 through 2025, which reflects the pattern of expected
economic benefit on certain aerospace intangible assets:
(dollars in millions) 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025
Amortization expense $2,409 $1,924 $2,040 $2,106 $2,020
93
Table of Contents
NOTE 3: DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
As discussed above, on April 2, 2020, Carrier and Otis entered into a Separation and Distribution Agreement with UTC (since
renamed Raytheon Technologies Corporation), pursuant to which, among other things, UTC agreed to separate into three
independent, publicly traded companies – UTC, Carrier and Otis and distribute all of the outstanding common stock of Carrier and
Otis to UTC shareowners who held shares of UTC common stock as of the close of business on March 19, 2020. The Separation
Transactions were completed on April 3, 2020. In 2020, a total of $1,329 million of costs have been incurred related to the
Separation Transactions and recorded in the following financial statement line items: $974 million in Income from discontinued
operations, $86 million of benefit in Income tax expense from discontinued operations, $23 million in Income from continuing
operations and $418 million in Income tax expense.
Carrier and Otis are presented as discontinued operations and, as such, have been excluded from both continuing operations and
segment results for all periods presented. Income (loss) from discontinued operations is as follows:
Year Ended December 31
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Otis $ 187 $ 1,033 $ 1,213 
Carrier 196 1,698 2,840 
Separation related transactions (793) (704) — 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations $ (410)$ 2,027 $ 4,053 
(1)    Reflects debt extinguishment costs in 2020 related to the Company’s paydown of debt to not exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness under the
Raytheon Merger Agreement, and unallocable transaction costs incurred by the Company primarily related to professional services costs pertaining to the
Separation Transactions and the establishment of Carrier and Otis as stand-alone public companies, facility relocation costs, costs to separate information
systems, costs of retention bonuses and tax charges and benefits related to separation activities.(1)
94
Table of Contents
The following summarized financial information related to discontinued operations has been reclassified from Income from
continuing operations and included in Income (loss) from discontinued operations:
Year Ended December 31
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Otis
Product sales $ 1,123 $ 5,669 $ 5,636 
Service sales 1,843 7,444 7,268 
Cost of products sold 913 4,656 4,624 
Cost of services sold 1,157 4,635 4,568 
Research and development 38 163 185 
Selling, general and administrative expense 450 1,906 1,636 
Other income (expense), net (65) (40) 26 
Non-operating (income) expense, net 3 4 (18)
Income from discontinued operations, before income taxes 340 1,709 1,935 
Income tax expense 116 525 561 
Income from discontinued operations 224 1,184 1,374 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries earnings from discontinued
operations 37 151 161 
Income from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners$ 187 $ 1,033 $ 1,213 
Carrier
Product sales $ 3,143 $ 15,337 $ 15,657 
Service sales 741 3,247 3,239 
Cost of products sold 2,239 10,878 11,047 
Cost of services sold 527 2,298 2,281 
Research and development 98 400 399 
Selling, general and administrative expense 669 2,888 2,566 
Other income (expense), net (30) 246 1,156 
Non-operating (income) expense, net 17 (43) (82)
Income from discontinued operations, before income taxes 304 2,409 3,841 
Income tax expense 102 672 967 
Income from discontinued operations 202 1,737 2,874 
Less: Noncontrolling interest in subsidiaries earnings from discontinued
operations 6 39 34 
Income from discontinued operations attributable to common shareowners$ 196 $ 1,698 $ 2,840 
Separation related transactions 
Selling, general and administrative expense $ 151 $ 16 $ — 
Other income (expense), net (709) (11) — 
Loss from discontinued operations, before income taxes (860) (27) — 
Income tax (benefit) expense (67) 677 — 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (793) (704) — 
Total income (loss) from discontinued operations attributable to
common shareowners $ (410)$ 2,027 $ 4,053 
(1)    Reflects debt extinguishment costs related to the Company’s paydown of debt to not exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness under the Raytheon
Merger Agreement, and unallocable transaction costs incurred by the Company primarily related to professional services costs pertaining to the Separation
Transactions and the establishment of Carrier and Otis as stand-alone public companies, facility relocation costs, costs to separate information systems, costs
of retention bonuses and tax charges and benefits related to separation activities.(1)
95
Table of Contents
Selected financial information related to cash flows from discontinued operations is as follows:
Year Ended December 31
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net cash (used in) provided by operating activities $ (728)$ 3,062 $ 3,652 
Net cash (used in) provided by investing activities (241) (416) 286 
Net cash used in financing activities (1,414) (2,651) (4,244)
Net cash provided by operating activities includes the net operating cash flows of Carrier and Otis prior to the Separation
Transactions, as well as cash outflows by the Company primarily related to professional services costs in connection with the
Separation Transactions and the establishment of Carrier and Otis as stand-alone public companies, facility relocation costs, costs
to separate information systems, costs of retention bonuses and tax charges related to separation activities. Net cash used in
financing activities primarily consists of net cash transfers from Carrier and Otis to RTC.
The Separation of Carrier was treated as a return on capital and recorded as a reduction to retained earnings, as it was in a net asset
position, while the Separation of Otis was treated as a return of capital and recorded as an adjustment to Common stock, as it was in
a net liability position. The remaining assets and liabilities related to discontinued operations at December 31, 2020 primarily relate
to trailing tax assets and liabilities of the Company related to the Separation Transactions, including indemnification obligations.
The major components of assets and liabilities related to discontinued operations at December 31, 2019 are provided below:
(dollars in millions) Otis Carrier Total
Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,446 $ 995 $ 2,441 
Accounts receivable, net 2,899 2,728 5,627 
Contract assets, current 530 679 1,209 
Inventories and contracts in progress, net 571 1,332 1,903 
Other assets, current 213 221 434 
Fixed assets, net 747 1,686 2,433 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 529 818 1,347 
Goodwill 1,647 9,807 11,454 
Intangible assets, net 490 1,083 1,573 
Other assets 575 2,827 3,402 
Total assets related to discontinued operations $ 9,647 $ 22,176 $ 31,823 
Liabilities and Redeemable Noncontrolling Interest
Short-term borrowings $ 33 $ 38 $ 71 
Accounts payable 1,321 1,682 3,003 
Accrued employee compensation 516 506 1,022 
Other accrued liabilities 1,135 2,383 3,518 
Contract liabilities, current 2,288 611 2,899 
Long-term debt, currently due 1 237 238 
Long-term debt 5 82 87 
Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations 560 455 1,015 
Operating lease liabilities 383 668 1,051 
Other long-term liabilities 514 1,025 1,539 
Total liabilities related to discontinued operations $ 6,756 $ 7,687 $ 14,443 (1)
96
Table of Contents
NOTE 4: EARNINGS PER SHARE
(dollars in millions, except per share amounts; shares in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners:
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ (3,109)$ 3,510 $ 1,216 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (410) 2,027 4,053 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (3,519)$ 5,537 $ 5,269 
Basic weighted average number of shares outstanding 1,357.8 854.8 800.4 
Stock awards and equity units (share equivalent) — 9.1 9.7 
Diluted weighted average number of shares outstanding 1,357.8 863.9 810.1 
Earnings (Loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - basic
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ (2.29)$ 4.11 $ 1.52 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (0.30) 2.37 5.06 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (2.59)$ 6.48 $ 6.58 
Earnings (Loss) per share attributable to common shareowners - diluted
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ (2.29)$ 4.06 $ 1.50 
Income (loss) from discontinued operations (0.30) 2.35 5.00 
Net income (loss) attributable to common shareowners $ (2.59)$ 6.41 $ 6.50 
It may not be possible to recalculate earnings per share (EPS) attributable to common shareowners by adjusting EPS from
continuing operations by EPS from discontinued operations as each amount is calculated independently.
The computation of diluted EPS excludes the effect of the potential exercise of stock awards, including stock appreciation rights
and stock options, when the average market price of the common stock is lower than the exercise price of the related stock awards
during the period because the effect would be anti-dilutive. In addition, the computation of diluted EPS excludes the effect of the
potential exercise of stock awards when the awards’ assumed proceeds exceed the average market price of the common shares
during the period. For 2020, 2019 and 2018, there were 32.5 million, 8.3 million and 5.1 million anti-dilutive stock awards
excluded from the computation, respectively. All outstanding stock awards are excluded in the computation of diluted EPS in 2020
because their effect was antidilutive due to the loss from continuing operations.
NOTE 5: ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE, NET
Accounts receivable, net consisted of the following:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
U.S. government contracts (including foreign military sales) $ 1,039 $ 551 
Other customers 8,761 8,446 
Allowance for expected credit losses (546) (254)
Total accounts receivable, net $ 9,254 $ 8,743 
The Company enters into various factoring agreements with third-party financial institutions to sell certain of its receivables. Under
these arrangements, the Company factored receivables of $6.4 billion and $7.8 billion in 2020 and 2019, respectively. The cash
received from these arrangements is reflected as cash provided by operating activities in the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows.
In certain of these factoring arrangements, for ease of administration, the Company will collect customer payments related to the
factored receivables, which it then remits to the financial institutions. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had
$10 million and $7 million, respectively, that was collected on behalf of the financial institutions and recorded as restricted cash
and accrued liabilities. The net cash flows relating to these collections are reported as financing activities in the Consolidated
Statement of Cash Flows.
97
Table of Contents
The changes in the allowance for expected credit losses related to Accounts receivable were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ 254 
Current period provision for expected credit losses 277 
Write-offs charged against the allowance for expected credit losses (5)
Other, net 20 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ 546 
(1)    The current provision for expected credit losses for 2020 includes $248 million of reserves driven by customer bankruptcies and additional reserves for credit
losses primarily due to the current economic environment primarily caused by the COVID-19 pandemic.
(2)    Other includes $34 million of impact related to the January 1, 2020 adoption of ASU 2016-13, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement
of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments.
The activity in the allowance for doubtful accounts was not material in 2019 or 2018.
NOTE 6: CONTRACT ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
Contract assets reflect revenue recognized and performance obligations satisfied in advance of customer billing. Contract liabilities
relate to payments received in advance of the satisfaction of performance under the contract. We receive payments from customers
based on the terms established in our contracts. Total contract assets and contract liabilities as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 are
as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Contract assets $ 9,931 $ 4,462 
Contract liabilities (12,889) (9,014)
Net contract liabilities $ (2,958)$ (4,552)
Contract assets increased $5,469 million during the year ended December 31, 2020 primarily due to the Raytheon Merger, which
accounted for an increase of $5.5 billion, net of $335 million of contract asset write-offs or reclassifications related to certain
precision guided munitions contracts with certain Middle Eastern customers as described below. Included in the change in contract
assets was a decrease of $132 million due to the impairments and incremental credit loss reserves related to our commercial
aerospace businesses, as discussed below. Contract liabilities increased $3,875 million during the year ended December 31, 2020
primarily due to the Raytheon Merger, which accounted for an increase of $3.8 billion.
We have direct commercial sales contracts for precision guided munitions with a certain Middle East customer, for which we have
not yet obtained regulatory approval. Due to the result of the U.S. presidential and congressional election, and the resulting
uncertainty surrounding U.S. foreign policy on direct commercial sales for precision guided munitions with this customer, we
determined that it is no longer probable that we will be able to obtain required regulatory approvals for these contracts; however,
this determination could change as the U.S. government’s foreign policy views are clarified. Therefore, in the fourth quarter of
2020, we reversed $119 million of sales for work performed on these specific contracts subsequent to the date of the Raytheon
Merger and through the end of the third quarter of 2020, and the related operating profit. In addition, we recognized an unfavorable
profit impact of $516 million, primarily related to inventory reserves, contract asset impairments and recognition of supplier related
obligations related to termination liability, which we now do not expect to be utilized or otherwise directed to other customers. In
addition, we reversed $755 million of backlog on these contracts. As of December 31, 2020, our contract liabilities include
$405 million of advance payments received from the customer on these contracts, which may become refundable to the customer if
the contracts are ultimately terminated.
Contract assets consisted of the following at December 31: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Unbilled $ 20,336 $ 5,211 
Progress payments (10,405) (749)
Total contract assets $ 9,931 $ 4,462 
The U.S. government has title to the assets related to unbilled amounts on U.S. government contracts that provide progress
payments.
Contract assets include retentions arising from contractual provisions. At December 31, 2020, retentions were $98 million.
Total contract assets include an allowance for credit losses of $177 million as of December 31, 2020. For additional information(1)
(2)
98
Table of Contents
on the adoption of the Credit Loss Standard on January 1, 2020, see “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting
Principles.” The increase in the allowance for 2020 includes incremental credit loss reserves of $132 million related to a number of
airline customers that have filed for bankruptcy and additional reserves due to the current economic environment primarily caused
by the COVID-19 pandemic. In addition, in 2020, we recognized an impairment of $111 million of contract assets at Collins
Aerospace due to the impact of lower estimated future customer activity principally driven by the expected acceleration of fleet
retirements of a commercial aircraft, and we recognized an impairment of $129 million of contract assets as a result of an
unfavorable EAC adjustment related to lower estimated revenues due to the restructuring of a customer contract at Pratt & Whitney.
In 2020, 2019 and 2018, we recognized revenue of $2,763 million, $2,850 million and $2,269 million related to our contract
liabilities at January 1, 2020, January 1, 2019 and January 1, 2018, respectively.
NOTE 7: INVENTORY, NET
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Raw materials $ 3,015 $ 2,984 
Work-in-process 2,924 2,586 
Finished goods 3,472 3,477 
$ 9,411 $ 9,047 
Raw materials, work-in-process and finished goods are net of valuation reserves of $1,788 million and $1,122 million as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
NOTE 8: COMMERCIAL AEROSPACE INDUSTRY ASSETS AND COMMITMENTS
The COVID-19 pandemic’s continued disruption to air travel and commercial activities and the significant restrictions and
limitations on businesses within the aerospace and commercial airline industries have negatively impacted global supply, demand
and distribution capabilities. In particular, the significant decrease in air travel resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic is adversely
affecting our airline and airframer customers, and their demand for the products and services of our Collins Aerospace and Pratt &
Whitney businesses. As described in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles,” in 2020, we recorded
a goodwill impairment charge of $3.2 billion at our Collins Aerospace business, as well as write-downs of assets in both our Collins
Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney businesses primarily related to increased estimated credit losses, impairments of contract assets due
lower estimated future customer activity or revenues on commercial contracts, impairment of commercial aircraft program assets
and the impairment of a Collins Aerospace trade name. We continue to monitor the recoverability of our commercial aerospace
industry assets and assess potential exposures. The following summarizes certain significant assets and off-balance sheet exposures
specifically related to our commercial aerospace customers:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Assets related to commercial aerospace industry customers:
Accounts receivable, net (Note 5) $ 7,239 $ 7,560 
Contract assets (Note 6) 2,559 2,741 
Customer financing assets (Note 1) 3,160 3,476 
Contract fulfillment costs (Note 1) 1,773 1,361 
Guarantees and Commitments related to commercial aerospace industry customers:
Commercial aerospace guarantees (net of reserves and collaboration partners’ share) (Note 18) 174 184 
Commercial aerospace commitments (net of collaboration partners’ share) (Note 19) 8,515 9,708 
(1)     Customer financing assets is inclusive of both the current and long term balances.
We also have goodwill and intangible assets, including exclusivity assets and collaboration assets, associated with our commercial
aerospace business. Refer to “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for further discussion.
NOTE 9: FIXED ASSETS, NET
Fixed assets, net, are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Major improvements are capitalized while expenditures for
maintenance, repairs and minor improvements are expensed. For sales or asset retirements, the assets and related accumulated(1) 
99
Table of Contents
depreciation and amortization are eliminated from the accounts. Gains and losses on sales of our fixed assets, net, are generally
recorded in operating income; however, for our RIS and RMD segments, gains and losses that are allocable to our contracts are
included in overhead, as we are required to allocate gains or losses and generally can recover these costs through the pricing of
products and services to the U.S. government.
(dollars in millions)Estimated
Useful Lives 2020 2019
Land $ 773 $ 292 
Buildings and improvements 12-45 years 7,067 4,978 
Machinery, tools and equipment 3-20 years 15,994 12,936 
Other, including assets under construction  2,512 1,871 
26,346 20,077 
Accumulated depreciation  (11,384) (9,755)
$ 14,962 $ 10,322 
Leasehold improvements are amortized over the lesser of the remaining lease term or the estimated useful life of the improvement.
Depreciation expense related to fixed assets, net is recorded predominantly utilizing the straight-line method and was $1,767
million in 2020, $1,191 million in 2019 and $945 million in 2018.
NOTE 10: BORROWINGS AND LINES OF CREDIT
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Commercial paper $ 160 $ — 
Other borrowings 87 2,293 
Total short-term borrowings $ 247 $ 2,293 
As of December 31, 2020, our maximum commercial paper borrowing limit was $5.0 billion as the commercial paper is backed by
our $5.0 billion revolving credit agreement. We use our commercial paper borrowings for general corporate purposes, including the
funding of potential acquisitions, pension contributions, debt refinancing, dividend payments and repurchases of our common
stock. The commercial paper notes outstanding have original maturities of not more than 90 days from the date of issuance.
In preparation for and in anticipation of the Separation Transactions, the Distributions and the Raytheon Merger, the Company
entered into and terminated a number of credit agreements.
On February 11, 2020 and March 3, 2020, we terminated a $2.0 billion revolving credit agreement and a $4.0 billion term loan
credit agreement, respectively. Upon termination, we repaid the $2.1 billion of borrowings outstanding on the $4.0 billion term loan
credit agreement. On April 3, 2020, upon the completion of the Raytheon Merger, we terminated a $2.20 billion revolving credit
agreement and a $2.15 billion multicurrency revolving credit agreement.
On March 20, 2020 and March 23, 2020, we entered into two $500 million term loan credit agreements and borrowed $1.0 billion
under these agreements in the first quarter of 2020. We terminated these agreements on May 5, 2020 and April 28, 2020,
respectively, upon repayment.
On March 16, 2020, we entered into a revolving credit agreement with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $5.0
billion which became available upon completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020. This credit agreement matures on April
3, 2025. On May 6, 2020, we entered into a revolving credit agreement with various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up
to $2.0 billion. This credit agreement matures on May 5, 2021. As of December 31, 2020, we had revolving credit agreements with
various banks permitting aggregate borrowings of up to $7.0 billion, and there were no borrowings outstanding under these
agreements.
In preparation for and in anticipation of the Separation Transactions and Distributions, the Company, Carrier and Otis issued and
the Company repaid long-term debt during the year ended December 31, 2020, which are shown in the tables below. On February
10, 2020, Otis entered into a term loan credit agreement providing for a $1.0 billion unsecured, unsubordinated 3-year term loan
credit facility. Also on February 10, 2020, Carrier entered into a term loan credit agreement providing for a $1.75 billion unsecured,
unsubordinated 3-year term loan credit facility. On March 27, 2020, Carrier and Otis drew on the full amounts of the term loans and
distributed the full proceeds to Raytheon Technologies in connection with the Separation
100
Table of Contents
Transactions. UTC utilized those amounts to extinguish Raytheon Technologies’ short-term and long-term debt in order to not
exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness required by the Raytheon Merger Agreement.
At December 31, 2020, approximately $1 billion was available under short-term lines of credit with local banks at our various
domestic and international subsidiaries. The weighted-average interest expense rates applicable to short-term borrowings and total
debt were as follows:
2020 2019
Average interest expense rate - average outstanding borrowings during the year:
Short-term borrowings 2.0 % 1.7 %
Total debt 4.0 % 3.6 %
Average interest expense rate - outstanding borrowings as of December 31:
Short-term borrowings 0.6 % 2.3 %
Total debt 4.2 % 3.6 %
We had the following issuances of long-term debt during 2020, which is inclusive of issuances made by Carrier and Otis which
were primarily used by the Company to extinguish certain Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt and, therefore,
were treated as a distribution from discontinued operations within financing activities from continuing operation on our
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows:
Issuance Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
May 18, 2020 2.250% notes due 2030 $ 1,000 
3.125% notes due 2050 1,000 
March 27, 2020 Term Loan due 2023 (Otis) 1,000 
Term Loan due 2023 (Carrier) 1,750 
February 27, 2020 1.923% notes due 2023 500 
LIBOR plus 0.450% floating rate notes due 2023 500 
2.056% notes due 2025 1,300 
2.242% notes due 2025 2,000 
2.293% notes due 2027 500 
2.493% notes due 2027 1,250 
2.565% notes due 2030 1,500 
2.722% notes due 2030 2,000 
3.112% notes due 2040 750 
3.377% notes due 2040 1,500 
3.362% notes due 2050 750 
3.577% notes due 2050 2,000 
(1)    The debt issuances and term loan draws reflect debt incurred by Carrier and Otis. The net proceeds of these issuances were primarily utilized to extinguish
Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt in order to not exceed the maximum applicable net indebtedness required by the Raytheon Merger
Agreement.
We had no issuances of long-term debt during 2019. (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
 (1)
101
Table of Contents
We made the following repayments of debt during 2020 and 2019:
Repayment Date Description of NotesAggregate Principal
Balance (in millions)
October 15, 2020 3.125% notes due 2020 $ 1,000 
May 19, 2020 3.650% notes due 2023 $ 410 
May 15, 2020EURIBOR plus 0.20% floating rate notes due 2020 (€750 million principal
value) $ 817 
March 29, 2020 4.500% notes due 2020 $ 1,250 
1.125% notes due 2021 (€950 million principal value) $ 1,082 
1.250% notes due 2023 (€750 million principal value) $ 836 
1.150% notes due 2024 (€750 million principal value) $ 841 
1.875% notes due 2026 (€500 million principal value) $ 567 
March 3, 2020 1.900% notes due 2020 $ 1,000 
3.350% notes due 2021 $ 1,000 
LIBOR plus 0.650% floating rate notes due 2021 $ 750 
1.950% notes due 2021 $ 750 
2.300% notes due 2022 $ 500 
3.100% notes due 2022 $ 2,300 
2.800% notes due 2024 $ 800 
March 2, 2020 4.875% notes due 2020 $ 171 
February 28, 2020 3.650% notes due 2023 $ 1,669 
2.650% notes due 2026 $ 431 
November 15, 2019 8.875% notes due 2019 $ 271 
November 13, 2019 EURIBOR plus 0.15% floating rate notes due 2019 € 750 
November 1, 2019 LIBOR plus 0.350% floating rate notes due 2019 $ 350 
1.500% notes due 2019 $ 650 
July 15, 2019 1.950% notes due 2019 $ 300 
5.250% notes due 2019 $ 300 
(1)    These notes were assumed in connection with the Raytheon Merger and subsequently repaid.
(2)    In connection with the early repayment of outstanding principal, Raytheon Technologies recorded debt extinguishment costs of $703 million for the year ended
December 31, 2020, which are classified as discontinued operations in our Consolidated Statement of Operations as we would not have had to redeem the debt,
except for the Separation Transactions. No proceeds of the notes issued May 18, 2020 were used to fund the May 19, 2020 redemption.
(3)    Extinguishment of Raytheon Technologies short-term and long-term debt in order to not exceed the maximum net indebtedness required by the Raytheon
Merger Agreement.
(4)    These notes were assumed in connection with the Rockwell Collins Acquisition and subsequently repaid.
On June 10, 2020, we completed an exchange offer with eligible holders of the outstanding notes of Goodrich Corporation
maturing through 2046, Raytheon Company maturing through 2044 and Rockwell Collins Inc. maturing through 2047 (collectively,
the “Subsidiary Notes”). An aggregate principal amount of approximately $8.2 billion of the Subsidiary Notes was exchanged for
approximately $8.2 billion of Raytheon Technologies notes with identical interest rates, maturity dates, and redemption provisions,
if any, as the Subsidiary Notes exchanged. Because the exchange was for substantially identical notes, the change was treated as a
debt modification for accounting purposes with no gain or loss recognized.
Long-term debt consisted of the following as of December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
4.875% notes due 2020 $ — $ 171 
4.500% notes due 2020 — 1,250 
1.900% notes due 2020 — 1,000 
EURIBOR plus 0.20% floating rate notes due 2020 (€750 million principal value) — 831 
8.750% notes due 2021 250 250 
3.100% notes due 2021 250 250 
3.350% notes due 2021 — 1,000 (1)
(2)(3)
(3)
(2)(3)
 (2)(3)
 (2)(3)
 (2)(3)
 (2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(2)(3)
(4)
(4)
102
Table of Contents
LIBOR plus 0.650% floating rate notes due 2021 — 750 
1.950% notes due 2021 — 750 
1.125% notes due 2021 (€950 million principal value) — 1,053 
2.300% notes due 2022 — 500 
2.800% notes due 2022 1,100 1,100 
3.100% notes due 2022 — 2,300 
2.500% notes due 2022 1,100 — 
1.250% notes due 2023 (€750 million principal value) — 831 
3.650% notes due 2023 171 2,250 
3.700% notes due 2023 400 400 
2.800% notes due 2024 — 800 
3.200% notes due 2024 950 950 
1.150% notes due 2024 (€750 million principal value) — 831 
3.150% notes due 2024 300 — 
3.950% notes due 2025 1,500 1,500 
1.875% notes due 2026 (€500 million principal value) — 554 
2.650% notes due 2026 719 1,150 
3.125% notes due 2027 1,100 1,100 
3.500% notes due 2027 1,300 1,300 
7.200% notes due 2027 382 — 
7.100% notes due 2027 141 141 
6.700% notes due 2028 400 400 
7.000% notes due 2028 185 — 
4.125% notes due 2028 3,000 3,000 
7.500% notes due 2029 550 550 
2.150% notes due 2030 (€500 million principal value) 612 554 
2.250% notes due 2030 1,000 — 
5.400% notes due 2035 600 600 
6.050% notes due 2036 600 600 
6.800% notes due 2036 134 134 
7.000% notes due 2038 159 159 
6.125% notes due 2038 1,000 1,000 
4.450% notes due 2038 750 750 
5.700% notes due 2040 1,000 1,000 
4.875% notes due 2040 600 — 
4.700% notes due 2041 425 — 
4.500% notes due 2042 3,500 3,500 
4.800% notes due 2043 400 400 
4.200% notes due 2044 300 — 
4.150% notes due 2045 850 850 
3.750% notes due 2046 1,100 1,100 
4.050% notes due 2047 600 600 
4.350% notes due 2047 1,000 1,000 
4.625% notes due 2048 1,750 1,750 
3.125% notes due 2050 1,000 — 
Other (including finance leases) 292 315 
Total principal long-term debt 31,470 41,274 
Other (fair market value adjustments, (discounts)/premiums and debt issuance costs) 106 (315) (2)
(1)
 (2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
 (2)
 (2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
 (1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
 (2)
 (2)
(1)
 (2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
 (1)
103
Table of Contents
Total long-term debt 31,576 40,959 
Less: current portion 550 3,258 
Long-term debt, net of current portion $ 31,026 $ 37,701 
(1)    We may redeem these notes at our option pursuant to their terms.
(2)    Debt assumed in the Raytheon Merger.
The percentage of total short-term borrowings and long-term debt at variable interest rates was approximately 1% and 9% at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Interest rates on our commercial paper borrowings are considered variable due to their
short-term duration and high-frequency of turnover.
The average maturity of our long-term debt at December 31, 2020 is approximately 14 years. The schedule of principal payments
required on long-term debt for the next five years and thereafter is:
(in millions)
2021 $ 550 
2022 2,224 
2023 581 
2024 1,262 
2025 1,582 
Thereafter 25,271 
Total $ 31,470 
NOTE 11: EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
We sponsor various domestic and foreign employee benefit plans, which are discussed below.
Employee Savings Plans. We sponsor various employee savings plans. Our contributions to employer sponsored defined
contribution plans were $875 million, $485 million and $332 million for 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Our non-union domestic employee savings plan for legacy UTC employees uses an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) for
employer matching contributions. External borrowings were used by the ESOP to fund a portion of its purchase of ESOP stock
from us. The external borrowings have been extinguished and only re-amortized loans remain between RTC and the ESOP Trust.
As ESOP debt service payments are made, common stock is released from an unreleased shares account. ESOP debt may be
prepaid or re-amortized to either increase or decrease the number of shares released so that the value of released shares equals the
value of plan benefit. We may also, at our option, contribute additional common stock or cash to the ESOP.
Shares of common stock are allocated to employees’ ESOP accounts at fair value on the date earned. Cash dividends on common
stock held by the ESOP are used for debt service payments. Participants may choose to have their ESOP dividends reinvested or
distributed in cash. Common stock allocated to ESOP participants is included in the average number of common shares outstanding
for both basic and diluted EPS. At December 31, 2020, 23.4 million common shares had been allocated to employees, leaving 9.4
million unallocated common shares in the ESOP Trust, with a fair value of $672 million.
Pension and Postretirement Plans. We sponsor both funded and unfunded domestic and foreign defined benefit pension plans that
cover a large number of our employees. Our largest plans are generally closed to new participants. We also sponsor both funded and
unfunded PRB plans that provide health care and life insurance benefits to eligible retirees. Our plans use a December 31
measurement date consistent with our fiscal year.
The Separation Transactions included the transfer of certain defined benefit plans from UTC to Carrier and Otis. The plans
transferred were primarily international plans with the majority of the UTC defined benefit liability remaining with Raytheon
Technologies. Upon separation, the employees within Carrier and Otis were effectively terminated from Raytheon Technologies.
The terminations of approximately 3,400 domestic pension plan participants triggered a mid-year remeasurement of the UTC
domestic plans. The remeasurement, which was calculated using discount rates and asset values as of April 3, 2020 (using March
31, 2020 as a practical expedient), resulted in a $2.4 billion increase to our pension liability, primarily due to a decrease in the fair
market value of the plans’ assets since December 31, 2019. All service cost previously associated with Carrier and Otis is included
in discontinued operations. For non-service pension (income) expense and the pension liability, generally only the portion related to
the defined benefit plans transferred to Carrier and Otis as part of the Separation Transactions has been reclassified to discontinued
operations.
104
Table of Contents
Raytheon Company has both funded and unfunded domestic and foreign defined benefit pension and PRB plans. As of the merger
date, the Raytheon Company plans were remeasured at fair value using accounting policies consistent with the UTC plans. Refer to
“Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for additional information. The deferred pension and
PRB plan losses included in Raytheon Company’s accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) as of the merger date were
eliminated and are no longer subject to amortization in net periodic benefit (income) expense. Amounts prior to the merger date of
April 3, 2020, do not include the Raytheon Company pension plan results.
In September 2019, we amended the UTC domestic defined benefit pension plans to cease accrual of additional benefits for future
service and compensation for non-union participants effective December 31, 2019. Beginning January 1, 2020, these participants
began receiving additional contributions under the UTC domestic defined contribution plan. The plan change did not impact
participants’ historical benefit accruals. We utilized the practical expedient and remeasured plan assets and pension benefit
obligations for the affected pension plans as of the nearest month-end, August 31, 2019, resulting in a net actuarial loss of
$425 million. This reflects remeasurement losses of $605 million, partially offset by a benefit obligation gain of $180 million
resulting from the benefit plan change. The remeasurement losses are driven by a reduction of 124 basis points in the PBO discount
rate as of the remeasurement date compared to December 31, 2018, partially offset by actual asset returns of approximately 17% as
of the remeasurement date. We recorded a curtailment gain of $98 million in the Consolidated Statement of Operations, due to the
recognition of previously unrecognized prior service credits for the affected pension plans.
For non-union employees in the UTC domestic pension plans, benefits for service up to December 31, 2014 are generally based on
the employee’s years of service and compensation. Benefits for service after December 31, 2014 and through December 31, 2019
are based on the existing cash balance formula that was adopted in 2003 for newly hired non-union employees and for non-union
employees who made a one-time voluntary election to have future benefit accruals determined under this formula. Benefits for
union employees in the UTC domestic pension plans are generally based on a stated amount for each year of service.
In December 2020, we approved a change to the Raytheon domestic benefit pension plans for non-union participants to cease future
benefit accruals based on an employee’s years of service and compensation effective December 31, 2022. The plan change does not
impact participants’ historical benefit accruals. Benefits for service after December 31, 2022 will be based on a cash balance
formula. We utilized a practical expedient and measured the plan assets and pension benefit obligations for the effected pension
plans as of the nearest month end, December 31, 2020, resulting in a current year prior service credit of $2.1 billion.
We made the following contributions to our pension and PRB plans’ trusts during the years ended December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
U.S. qualified defined benefit plans $ 885 $ 25 $ — 
International defined benefit plans 125 30 79 
PRB plans 15 — — 
The contributions to our U.S. qualified defined benefit plans for the year ended December 31, 2020 include a $750 million
discretionary contribution to the Raytheon Company U.S. qualified pension plans’ trust. As a result of this discretionary
contribution, we do not expect to make any required contributions to our U.S. qualified plans’ trust until 2022.
The contributions to our International defined benefit plans for the year ended December 31, 2020 include a $51 million
discretionary contribution. We expect to make total contributions of approximately $50 million to our international defined benefit
plans’ trusts in 2021, which are expected to meet or exceed the current funding requirements.
105
Table of Contents
Pension PRB
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019
Change in Benefit Obligation:
Beginning balance $ 38,027 $ 34,344 $ 765 $ 810 
Service cost attributable to continuing operations 483 261 6 2 
Service cost attributable to discontinued operations 1 34 — — 
Interest cost 1,650 1,245 37 31 
Actuarial loss (gain) 7,029 4,247 114 (11)
Total benefits paid (3,623) (2,016) (144) (69)
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits (4) (206) (8) — 
Plan amendments (2,088) — (7) — 
Business combinations and divestitures 29,385 (6) 724 — 
Other 397 124 48 2 
Ending balance $ 71,257 $ 38,027 $ 1,535 $ 765 
Change in Plan Assets:
Beginning balance $ 36,225 $ 32,150 $ 20 $ 20 
Actual return on plan assets 9,885 5,873 80 — 
Employer contributions 1,201 137 102 69 
Total benefits paid (3,623) (2,016) (144) (69)
Settlements (32) (17) (8) — 
Business combinations and divestitures 18,310 (10) 286 — 
Other 352 108 45 — 
Ending balance $ 62,318 $ 36,225 $ 381 $ 20 
Funded Status:
Fair value of plan assets $ 62,318 $ 36,225 $ 381 $ 20 
Benefit obligations (71,257) (38,027) (1,535) (765)
Funded status of plan $ (8,939)$ (1,802)$ (1,154)$ (745)
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheet Consist of:
Noncurrent assets $ 424 $ 19 $ — $ — 
Current liability (232) (51) (82) (47)
Noncurrent liability (9,131) (1,770) (1,072) (698)
Net amount recognized $ (8,939)$ (1,802)$ (1,154)$ (745)
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss Consist of:
Net actuarial (gain) loss $ 8,023 $ 8,160 $ (117)$ (181)
Prior service (credit) cost (1,947) 190 (9) (4)
Net actuarial loss and prior service cost related to discontinued
operations — 763 — — 
Net amount recognized $ 6,076 $ 9,113 $ (126)$ (185)
(1)    Includes benefit payments paid directly by the company.
(2)    Consists primarily of liabilities and assets acquired as a part of the Raytheon Merger.
(3)    The amount included in Other primarily reflects the impact of foreign exchange translation, primarily for plans in the U.K. and Canada, and participant
contributions.
The majority of our pension obligations relate to our U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS) qualified pension plans, which comprise
85% and 82% of our pension PBO as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. 3% and 1% of our pension PBO as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, is attributable to our nonqualified domestic pension plans, which provide
supplementary retirement benefits to certain employees in excess of the IRS qualified plan limits. International plans comprise 12%
and 17% of the pension PBO as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, and are considered defined benefit pension plans for
accounting purposes.(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
106
Table of Contents
In addition to the pension and PRB noncurrent liabilities shown above, Future pension and postretirement benefit obligations on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet includes $139 million and $21 million of other pension and PRB related liabilities as of December 31,
2020 and 2019, respectively.
Information for pension plans with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Projected benefit obligation $ 37,215 $ 37,941 
Accumulated benefit obligation 36,150 37,559 
Fair value of plan assets 27,854 36,120 
The accumulated benefit obligation for all defined benefit pension plans was $70.2 billion and $37.7 billion at December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively.
Information for pension plans with projected benefit obligations in excess of plan assets: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Projected benefit obligation $ 37,217 $ 37,943 
Accumulated benefit obligation 36,151 37,600 
Fair value of plan assets 27,855 36,122 
The components of the net periodic pension (income) expense are as follows: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating expense
Service cost $ 483 $ 261 $ 265 
Non-operating expense
Interest cost 1,650 1,245 1,058 
Expected return on plan assets (2,995) (2,252) (2,061)
Amortization of prior service cost (credit) 51 16 (42)
Recognized actuarial net loss 337 245 373 
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits (gain) loss 45 (59) 3 
Non-service pension income (912) (805) (669)
Net periodic pension income $ (429)$ (544)$ (404)
The components of the net periodic PRB (income) expense are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating expense
Service cost $ 6 $ 2 $ 2 
Non-operating expense
Interest cost 37 31 26 
Expected return on plan assets (13) (1) — 
Amortization of prior service credit (3) (42) (6)
Recognized actuarial net gain (12) (12) (10)
Net settlement, curtailment and special termination benefits loss 1 — — 
Non-service pension (income) expense 10 (24) 10 
Net periodic PRB (income) expense $ 16 $ (22)$ 12 
107
Table of Contents
Other changes in pension plan assets and benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive loss in 2020 and 2019 are as
follows: 
2020 2019
(dollars in millions) TotalContinuing
OperationsDiscontinued
Operations Total
Actuarial loss arising during the period $ 155 $ 434 $ 119 $ 553 
Amortization of actuarial loss (337) (245) (20) (265)
Current year prior service cost (credit) (2,088) — 6 6 
Amortization of prior service cost (51) (16) (1) (17)
Net settlement and curtailment (34) 62 (5) 57 
Separation of Carrier and Otis (763) — — — 
Other 81 36 (2) 34 
Total recognized in other comprehensive (income) loss (3,037) 271 97 368 
Net recognized in net periodic benefit (income) cost and other
comprehensive (income) loss $ (3,466)$ (232)$ 97 $ (135)
(1)    The amount included in Other primarily reflects the impact of foreign exchange translation, primarily for plans in the U.K. and Canada.
The Actuarial loss arising during the period in 2020 is primarily due to a decrease in discount rates during 2020, partially offset by
asset returns exceeding our expected return on assets. Current year prior service credit in 2020 was primarily due to the RTC plan
change for non-union participants as discussed above.
The Actuarial loss arising during the period in 2019 was primarily due to a decrease in discount rates during 2019, partially offset
by our asset returns exceeding our expected return on assets.
Other changes in PRB assets and benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive loss in 2020 and 2019 are as follows: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Actuarial (gain) loss arising during the period $ 47 $ (10)
Amortization of actuarial gain 12 12 
Current year prior service cost (credit) (7) — 
Amortization of prior service credit 3 42 
Net settlement and curtailment (1) — 
Other 5 2 
Total recognized in other comprehensive loss 59 46 
Net recognized in net periodic benefit (income) cost and other comprehensive loss $ 75 $ 24 
The Actuarial loss arising during the period in 2020 is primarily due to a decrease in discount rates during 2020, partially offset by
asset returns exceeding our expected return on assets on our funded plans.
The Actuarial gain arising during the period in 2019 was primarily due to demographic gains, partially offset by a decrease in
discount rates in 2019.
The table below reflects the total benefit payments expected to be paid from the plans or from corporate assets.
(dollars in millions) Pension PRB
2021 $ 4,374 $ 128 
2022 4,197 120 
2023 3,831 112 
2024 3,795 106 
2025 3,785 100 
2026-2030 18,311 419 (1)
108
Table of Contents
Major assumptions used in determining the pension benefit obligation and net periodic pension benefit (income) expense are
presented in the following table as weighted-averages: 
Benefit Obligation Net Periodic Benefit (Income) Expense
2020 2019 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate
PBO 2.5 % 3.1 % 3.2 % 4.0 % 3.5 %
Interest cost N/A N/A 2.8 % 3.7 % 3.1 %
Service cost N/A N/A 3.5 % 3.7 % 3.4 %
Salary scale 4.3 % 4.3 % 4.3 % 4.3 % 4.3 %
Expected return on plan assets N/A N/A 6.5 % 6.8 % 6.9 %
Interest crediting rate 3.8 % 3.8 % 3.8 % 3.8 % 3.8 %
(1)    The discount rates used to measure the service cost and interest cost applies to our significant plans. The PBO discount rate is used for the service cost and
interest cost measurements for non-significant plans.
Major assumptions used in determining the PRB benefit obligation and net periodic PRB (income) expense are presented in the
following table as weighted-averages: 
 Benefit Obligation Net Periodic Benefit (Income) Expense
2020 2019 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate 2.4 % 3.0 % 3.1 % 4.0 % 3.4 %
Expected return on assets N/A N/A 5.7 % 7.0 % 7.0 %
Assumed health care cost trend rates used in determining the PRB benefit obligation and net periodic PRB (income) expense are as
follows:
2020 2019
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year 5.0 % 6.5 %
Rate that the cost trend rate gradually declines to 4.3 % 5.0 %
Year that the rate reaches the rate it is assumed to remain at 2026 2026
The weighted-average discount rates used to measure pension and PRB liabilities are based on yield curves developed using high-
quality corporate bonds as well as plan specific cash flows. For our significant plans, we utilize a full yield curve approach in the
estimation of the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit costs by applying the specific spot rates along the
yield curve used in determination of the benefit obligation to the relevant discounted projected cash flows.
In determining the EROA assumption, we consider the target asset allocation of plan assets, as well as economic and other
indicators of future performance. We may consult with and consider the opinions of financial and other professionals in
determining the appropriate capital market assumptions. Return projections are validated using a simulation model that incorporates
yield curves, credit spreads and risk premiums to project long-term prospective returns. As a result of this analysis at year end 2020,
our weighted average pension EROA assumption for 2021 is 6.5%.
Plan Assets. The plans’ investment management objectives include providing the liquidity and asset levels needed to meet current
and future benefit payments, while maintaining a prudent degree of portfolio diversification considering interest rate risk and
market volatility. Globally, investment strategies generally target a mix of 50% to 55% of growth seeking assets and 45% to 50% of
income generating and hedging assets using a wide set of diversified asset types, fund strategies and investment managers. The
growth seeking allocation consists of global public equities in developed and emerging countries, private equity, real estate and
multi-asset class strategies. Growth assets include an enhanced alpha strategy that invests in publicly traded equity and fixed
income securities, derivatives and foreign currency. Investments in private equity are primarily via limited partnership interests in
buy-out strategies with smaller allocations to distressed debt funds. The real estate strategy is principally concentrated in directly
held U.S. core investments with some smaller investments in international, value-added and opportunistic strategies. Within the
income generating assets, the fixed income portfolio consists of mainly government and broadly diversified high quality corporate
bonds.
The plans have continued their pension risk management techniques designed to reduce their interest rate risk. Specifically, the
plans have incorporated liability hedging programs that include the adoption of a risk reduction objective as part of the long-term
investment strategy. Under this objective the interest rate hedge is intended to increase as funded status improves. The hedging
programs incorporate a range of assets and investment tools, each with varying interest rate sensitivities. The(1)
(1)
109
Table of Contents
investment portfolios are currently hedging approximately 30% to 70% of the interest rate sensitivity of the pension plan liabilities,
depending on the funded status of the plan.
The fair values of pension plan assets at December 31, 2020 and 2019 by asset category are as follows:
(dollars in millions)Quoted Prices in
Active Markets
For Identical Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Observable 
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable 
Inputs
(Level 3)Not Subject to
Leveling Total
Asset Category:
Public Equities
Global Equities $ 8,437 $ 5 $ — $ — $ 8,442 
Global Equity Commingled Funds 1 2,686 — — 2,687 
Enhanced Global Equities 56 185 — — 241 
Other Public Equities — — — 9,008 9,008 
Private Equities — — — 3,646 3,646 
Fixed Income Securities
Governments 1,740 1,480 — — 3,220 
Corporate Bonds 3 18,489 2 305 18,799 
Structured Products — 24 — — 24 
Other Fixed Income — — — 6,631 6,631 
Real Estate — — 1,647 1,737 3,384 
Other — 99 — 5,088 5,187 
Cash & Cash Equivalents 9 97 — 154 260 
Subtotal $ 10,246 $ 23,065 $ 1,649 $ 26,569 61,529 
Other Assets & Liabilities    789 
Total at December 31, 2020 $ 62,318 
Public Equities
Global Equities $ 3,588 $ 5 $ — $ — $ 3,593 
Global Equity Commingled Funds — 1,496 — — 1,496 
Enhanced Global Equities 322 393 — — 715 
Other Public Equities — — — 5,332 5,332 
Private Equities — — 202 1,230 1,432 
Fixed Income Securities
Governments 969 116 — — 1,085 
Corporate Bonds 1 13,059 5 — 13,065 
Structured Products — 17 — — 17 
Other Fixed Income — — — 4,755 4,755 
Real Estate — 13 1,464 366 1,843 
Other — 343 — 2,834 3,177 
Cash & Cash Equivalents — 47 — 36 83 
Subtotal $ 4,880 $ 15,489 $ 1,671 $ 14,553 $ 36,593 
Other Assets & Liabilities    (368)
Total at December 31, 2019 $ 36,225 
(1)    Represents commingled funds that invest primarily in common stocks.
(2)    Represents enhanced equity separate account and commingled fund portfolios. A portion of the portfolio may include long-short market neutral and relative
value strategies that invest in publicly traded, equity and fixed income securities, as well as derivatives of equity and fixed income securities and foreign
currency.(8)
(1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (4)
 (5)
 (6)
(7)
(1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (4)
 (5)
 (6)
(7)
110
Table of Contents
(3)    Represents limited partnership investments with general partners that primarily invest in equity and debt.
(4)    Represents investments in real estate including commingled funds and directly held properties.
(5)    Represents global balanced risk commingled funds that invest in multiple asset classes including equity, fixed income and some commodities. “Other” also
includes insurance contracts.
(6)    Represents short-term commercial paper, bonds and other cash or cash-like instruments.
(7)    Represents receivables, payables and certain individually immaterial international plan assets that are not leveled.
(8)    In accordance with ASU 2015-07, Fair Value Measurement (Topic 820), certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share
(or its equivalent) practical expedient have not been classified in the fair value hierarchy. The fair value amounts presented in this table are intended to permit
reconciliation of the fair value hierarchy to the amounts presented for the total pension benefits plan assets.
Derivatives in the plan are primarily used to manage risk and gain asset class exposure while still maintaining liquidity. Derivative
instruments mainly consist of equity futures, interest rate futures, interest rate swaps and currency forward contracts. The fair
market value of the plans’ derivatives through direct or separate account investments was approximately $176 million and $75
million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
We review our assets at least quarterly to ensure we are within the targeted asset allocation ranges and, if necessary, asset balances
are adjusted back within target allocations. We employ a broadly diversified investment manager structure that includes
diversification by active and passive management, style, capitalization, country, sector, industry and number of investment
managers. No individual investment represented more than 5% of the plan assets as of December 31, 2020.
The fair value measurement of plan assets using significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) changed due to the following:
(dollars in millions) Private Equities Corporate Bonds Real Estate Total
Balance, December 31, 2018 $ 133 $ 18 $ 1,387 $ 1,538 
Realized losses — — (2) (2)
Unrealized gains relating to instruments still held in the
reporting period 32 — 27 59 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net 37 (13) 52 76 
Balance, December 31, 2019 202 5 1,464 1,671 
Realized gains — — 7 7 
Unrealized gains relating to instruments still held in the
reporting period 16 — (129) (113)
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net 10 (3) 77 84 
Transfers in/out, net (228) — 228 — 
Balance, December 31, 2020 $ — $ 2 $ 1,647 $ 1,649 
Quoted market prices are used to value investments when available. Investments in securities traded on exchanges, including listed
futures and options, are valued at the last reported sale prices on the last business day of the year or, if not available, the last
reported bid prices. Fixed income securities are primarily measured using a market approach pricing methodology, where
observable prices are obtained by market transactions involving identical or comparable securities of issuers with similar credit
ratings. Mortgages have been valued on the basis of their future principal and interest payments discounted at prevailing interest
rates for similar investments. Investment contracts are valued at fair value by discounting the related cash flows based on current
yields of similar instruments with comparable durations. Real estate investments are valued on a quarterly basis using discounted
cash flow models which consider long-term lease estimates, future rental receipts and estimated residual values. Valuation estimates
are supplemented by third-party appraisals on an annual basis.
Private equity limited partnerships are valued quarterly using discounted cash flows, earnings multiples and market
multiples. Valuation adjustments reflect changes in operating results, financial condition, or prospects of the applicable portfolio
company. Over-the-counter securities and government obligations are valued at the bid prices or the average of the bid and ask
prices on the last business day of the year from published sources or, if not available, from other sources considered reliable,
generally broker quotes. Temporary cash investments are stated at cost, which approximates fair value.
The fair market value of assets related to our PRB benefits was $381 million and $20 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
These assets include $149 million of which are invested in our domestic qualified pension plan trust at December 31, 2020. There
were no PRB assets invested in our domestic qualified pension plan trust at December 31, 2019. The remaining PRB investments
are held within Voluntary Employees’ Beneficiary Association (VEBA) trusts. The VEBA assets are generally invested in mutual
funds and are valued primarily using quoted prices in active markets (Level 1). There were no Level 3 investments in the VEBA
trusts as of December 31, 2020 or 2019.
111
Table of Contents
We have set aside assets in separate trusts, which we expect to be used to pay for certain nonqualified defined benefit and defined
contribution plan obligations in excess of qualified plan limits. These assets are included in Other assets, current in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet. The fair value of marketable securities held in trusts consisted of the following:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Marketable securities held in trusts $ 881 $ — 
NOTE 12: LEASES
Operating lease expense was $497 million and $323 million for 2020 and 2019, respectively. Finance leases and lessor leases are
not considered significant to our Consolidated Balance Sheet or Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Variable least cost and sublease income were immaterial in 2020 and 2019.
In 2020, we entered into a sale and leaseback transaction for the sale of equipment and related maintenance. We subsequently
leased back the equipment sold for a limited timeframe, which is accounted for as an operating lease. The proceeds received as a
result of the equipment sales have been classified in decrease in Customer Financing Assets within the Investing Activities in our
Consolidated statement of cash flows, and the portion related to future maintenance services has been classified within Operating
Activities. The net gain as a result of this transaction was not material. Gains and losses on sale and leaseback transactions were
immaterial in 2019.
Supplemental cash flow information related to operating leases were as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Operating cash flows used in the measurement of operating lease liabilities $ 420 $ 411 
Operating lease right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for operating lease obligations 299 123 
Future lease payments related to our operating lease liabilities as of December 31, 2020 are as follows:
(dollars in millions)
2021 $ 632 
2022 468 
2023 335 
2024 231 
2025 158 
Thereafter 646 
Total undiscounted lease payments 2,470 
Less imputed interest (472)
Total discounted lease payments $ 1,998 
(1)    Total future lease payments excluded approximately $58 million of future lease payments related to leases that were signed but had not yet commenced as of
December 31, 2020.
Our lease liabilities recognized in our Consolidated Balance Sheet were as follows as of December 31:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Operating lease liabilities, current (included in Other accrued liabilities) $ (482)$ (245)
Operating lease liabilities, noncurrent (1,516) (1,093)
Total operating lease liabilities $ (1,998)$ (1,338)
The weighted-average remaining lease term related to our operating leases was 8.0 years and 8.6 years as of December 31, 2020
and December 31, 2019, respectively. The weighted-average discount rate related to our operating leases was 3.1% and 3.5% as of
December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, respectively.(1)
112
Table of Contents
NOTE 13: INCOME TAXES
Income Before Income Taxes. The sources of income from continuing operations before income taxes are:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
United States $ (2,762)$ 1,594 $ 635 
Foreign 409 2,558 1,869 
$ (2,353)$ 4,152 $ 2,504 
The Company no longer intends to reinvest certain undistributed earnings of its international subsidiaries that have been previously
taxed in the U.S. As such, we recorded the taxes associated with the future remittance of these earnings. For the remainder of the
Company’s undistributed international earnings, unless tax effective to repatriate, the Company will continue to permanently
reinvest these earnings. As of December 31, 2020, such undistributed earnings were approximately $12 billion, excluding other
comprehensive income amounts. It is not practicable to estimate the amount of tax that might be payable on the remaining amounts.
Provision for Income Taxes. The income tax expense (benefit) for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 consisted
of the following components:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Current:
United States:
Federal $ 324 $ (100)$ (68)
State 45 (58) 1 
Foreign 305 541 402 
674 383 335 
Future:
United States:
Federal (264) 121 45 
State 258 56 58 
Foreign (93) (139) 660 
 (99) 38 763 
Income tax expense $ 575 $ 421 $ 1,098 
Attributable to items credited (charged) to equity $ (576)$ 40 $ 501 
Reconciliation of Effective Income Tax Rate. Differences between effective income tax rates and the statutory U.S. federal
income tax rate are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
(dollars in millions) Amount Rate Amount Rate Amount Rate
Statutory U.S. federal income tax rate $ (494) 21.0 %$ 872 21.0 %$ 526 21.0 %
Tax on international activities 35 (1.5) 32 0.7 (25) (1.0)
Tax audit settlements — — (290) (7.0) — — 
U.S. tax reform — — — — 744 29.7 
Tax charges related to Separation Transactions and
Raytheon Merger 416 (17.7) — — — — 
Disposals of businesses 177 (7.5) — — — — 
U.S. research and development credit (142) 6.1 (101) (2.4) (73) (2.9)
Goodwill impairment 668 (28.4) — — — — 
State income tax, net (56) 2.4 16 0.4 (6) (0.2)
Foreign Derived Intangible Income (FDII) (83) 3.5 (138) (3.3) (102) (4.1)
Other 54 (2.3) 30 0.7 34 1.3 
Effective income tax rate $ 575 (24.4)%$ 421 10.1 %$ 1,098 43.8 %
113
Table of Contents
The 2020 negative effective tax rate is a result of having tax expense of $575 million on a loss from continuing operations before
income taxes of $2,353 million. The loss from continuing operations before income taxes includes the $3,183 million goodwill
impairment as described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets,” most of which is non-
deductible for tax purposes. Tax expense includes net deferred tax charges of $367 million resulting from the Separation
Transactions and the Raytheon Merger primarily related to the impairment of deferred tax assets, and incremental tax expense of
$177 million related to the disposal of businesses, including the sales of the Collins Aerospace and RIS businesses and the entry
into a definitive agreement to sell Forcepoint, as described in “Note 2: Business Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and
Intangible Assets.” As a result of the Separation Transactions and the restructuring charges recognized in 2020, tax expense also
includes $49 million related to revaluation of the tax benefit for certain international tax incentives, as the Company no longer
expects to meet the incentive requirements. Also included in the 2020 effective tax rate are tax benefits of $142 million associated
with U.S. research and development credits and $83 million associated with FDII.
The 2019 effective tax rate includes tax benefits of $290 million primarily associated with the conclusion of the audit by the
Examination Division of the Internal Revenue Service for the Company’s 2014, 2015 and 2016 tax years and the filing by a
subsidiary of the Company to participate in an amnesty program offered by the Italian Tax Authority. The 2019 effective tax rate
also includes tax benefits of $138 million associated with FDII and $101 million related to U.S. research and development credits.
On December 22, 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (TCJA) was enacted. The 2018 effective tax rate reflects a net charge of
$744 million for TCJA related adjustments. The amount primarily relates to non-U.S. taxes that will become due when previously
reinvested earnings of certain international subsidiaries are remitted. The 2018 effective tax rate also includes tax benefits of
$102 million associated with FDII and $73 million related to U.S. research & development credits.
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities. The tax effects of temporary differences and tax carryforwards which gave rise to future
income tax benefits and payables at December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Future income tax benefits:
Insurance and employee benefits $ 3,004 $ 959 
Inventory and contract balances 822 664 
Warranty provisions 220 208 
Other basis differences 637 614 
Tax loss carryforwards 196 348 
Tax credit carryforwards 959 930 
Valuation allowances (757) (432)
$ 5,081 $ 3,291 
Future income taxes payable:
Goodwill and Intangible assets $ 7,786 $ 4,205 
Fixed assets 1,637 1,016 
Other basis differences 151 638 
$ 9,574 $ 5,859 
Valuation allowances have been established primarily for tax credit carryforwards, tax loss carryforwards, and certain temporary
differences to reduce the future income tax benefits to expected realizable amounts.
114
Table of Contents
Tax Credit and Loss Carryforwards. At December 31, 2020, tax credit carryforwards, principally state and foreign, and tax loss
carryforwards, principally state and foreign, were as follows:
(dollars in millions)Tax Credit
CarryforwardsTax Loss
Carryforwards
Expiration period:
2021-2025 $ 50 $ 126 
2026-2030 38 58 
2031-2040 341 179 
Indefinite 530 801 
Total $ 959 $ 1,164 
Unrecognized Tax Benefits. At December 31, 2020, we had gross tax-effected unrecognized tax benefits of $1,225 million, of
which $1,216 million, if recognized, would impact the effective tax rate. A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amounts of
unrecognized tax benefits and interest expense related to unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018 is as follows: 
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Balance at January 1 $ 1,347 $ 1,619 $ 1,189 
Additions for tax positions related to the current year 125 131 192 
Additions for tax positions of prior years 323 73 344 
Reductions for tax positions of prior years (83) (101) (91)
Settlements (48) (375) (15)
Separation of Carrier and Otis (439)
Balance at December 31 $ 1,225 $ 1,347 $ 1,619 
Gross interest expense related to unrecognized tax benefits $ 50 $ 57 $ 37 
Total accrued interest balance at December 31 141 249 255 
The unrecognized tax benefit table includes discontinued operations in 2018, 2019 and 2020.
As a result of the Separation Transactions and the Distributions in April 2020, we transferred unrecognized tax benefits to Carrier
and Otis of $439 million and associated interest of approximately $165 million. Pursuant to the terms of the separation agreements,
certain other unrecognized tax benefits retained by the Company will be subject to indemnification. Total unrecognized tax benefits
at December 31, 2019 and 2018 include $437 million and $551 million of benefits related to discontinued operations, and
associated interest of approximately $155 million in both periods.
In addition, as a result of the Raytheon Merger in April 2020, unrecognized tax benefits increased by $273 million, and associated
interest of approximately $15 million, due to inclusion of items related to pre-merger Raytheon Company tax periods. The 2018
additions above include amounts related to the Rockwell Acquisition.
Management has determined that the distributions of Carrier and Otis on April 3, 2020, and certain related internal business
separation transactions, qualified as tax-free under applicable law. In making these determinations, we applied the tax law in the
relevant jurisdictions to our facts and circumstances and obtained tax rulings from the relevant taxing authorities, tax opinions,
and/or other external tax advice related to the concluded tax treatment. If the completed distributions of Carrier or Otis, in each
case, or certain internal business separation transactions, were to fail to qualify for tax-free treatment, the Company could be
subject to significant liabilities, and there could be material adverse impacts on the Company’s business, financial condition, results
of operations and cash flows in future reporting periods.
We conduct business globally and, as a result, Raytheon Technologies or one or more of our subsidiaries files income tax returns in
the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various state and foreign jurisdictions. In the normal course of business we are subject to
examination by taxing authorities throughout the world, including such major jurisdictions as Canada, China, France, Germany,
India, Philippines, Poland, Singapore, the United Kingdom and the United States. With few exceptions, we are no longer subject to
U.S. federal, state and local, or non-U.S. income tax examinations for years before 2012.
During the fourth quarter of 2020, the Company recognized a non-cash gain of approximately $25 million, primarily tax, as a result
of the statute of limitations expiration of the 2016 tax year of a subsidiary acquired as part of the RTC’s acquisition of Rockwell
Collins.
During 2019, the Company recognized a net gain of approximately $307 million, including pre-tax interest of approximately $56
million as a result of the conclusion of the IRS audit of the Company’s 2014, 2015 and 2016 tax years as well as an
115
Table of Contents
amnesty filing in Italy made to resolve certain tax litigation. The Company also recognized a non-cash gain of approximately $40
million, primarily tax, as a result of the closure of an IRS audit of the 2014 tax year of a subsidiary acquired as part of RTC’s
acquisition of Rockwell Collins. This gain was partially offset by the unfavorable pre-tax impact of a reversal of a related
indemnity asset of approximately $23 million. Finally, the Company recognized net non-cash gains of approximately $18 million,
including pre-tax interest of approximately $5 million, as a result of various federal, state and non-U.S. statute of limitations
expirations and settlements with tax authorities.
The Examination Division of the IRS is currently auditing Raytheon Technologies tax years 2017 and 2018 and pre-merger
Raytheon Company tax periods 2017, 2018 and 2019 as well as certain refund claims of Raytheon Company for tax years 2014,
2015 and 2016 filed prior to the Raytheon Merger.
The Examination Division of the IRS is also auditing pre-acquisition Rockwell Collins fiscal tax years 2016 and 2017, which is
projected to close within the next six months. As a result of the projected closure of the audit of Rockwell Collins fiscal tax years
2016 and 2017, it is reasonably possible that the Company may recognize non-cash gains in the range of $50 million to
$100 million, primarily tax, within the next six months.
It is reasonably possible that a net reduction within the range of $165 million to $475 million of unrecognized tax benefits may
occur over the next 12 months as a result of the revaluation of uncertain tax positions arising from the issuance of legislation,
regulatory or other guidance or developments in examinations, in appeals, or in the courts, or the closure of tax statutes.
NOTE 14: RESTRUCTURING COSTS
Restructuring costs are generally expensed as incurred. All U.S. government unallowable restructuring costs related to the
Raytheon Merger are recorded within Corporate expenses and other unallocated items, as these costs are not included in
management’s evaluation of the segments’ performance, and as a result, there are no unallowable restructuring costs at the RIS and
RMD segments. During 2020, we recorded net pre-tax restructuring costs totaling $777 million for new and ongoing restructuring
actions. We recorded charges in the segments as follows:
(dollars in millions)
Pratt & Whitney $ 183 
Collins Aerospace Systems 360 
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items 234 
Total $ 777 
Restructuring charges incurred in 2020 primarily relate to actions initiated during 2020 and 2019, and were recorded as follows:
(dollars in millions)  
Cost of sales $ 397 
Selling, general & administrative 371 
Restructuring costs recorded within operating expenses 768 
Non-service pension (benefit) 9 
Total $ 777 
2020 Actions. During 2020, we recorded net pre-tax restructuring costs totaling $770 million for restructuring actions initiated in
2020, consisting of $401 million in Cost of sales, $360 million in Selling, general and administrative expenses and $9 million in
Non-service pension expenses. The 2020 actions primarily relate to severance and restructuring actions at Pratt & Whitney and
Collins Aerospace in response to the impact on our operating results related to the current economic environment primarily caused
by the COVID-19 pandemic, the Raytheon Merger, and ongoing cost reduction efforts, including workforce reductions and
consolidation of field operations.
We are targeting to complete in 2021 the majority of the remaining workforce and all facility related cost reduction actions initiated
in 2020. No specific plans for significant other actions have been finalized at this time. The following table summarizes the accrual
balances and utilization by cost type for the 2020 restructuring actions:
(dollars in millions) SeveranceFacility Exit and
Other Costs Total
Net pre-tax restructuring costs $ 744 $ 26 $ 770 
Utilization, foreign exchange and other costs (410) (20) (430)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 334 $ 6 $ 340 
116
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes expected, incurred and remaining costs for the 2020 restructuring actions by segment:
(dollars in millions) Expected CostsCost Incurred
During 2020Remaining Costs
at December 31,
2020
Pratt & Whitney $ 205 $ (205)$ — 
Collins Aerospace Systems 373 (333) 40 
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items 232 (232) — 
Total $ 810 $ (770)$ 40 
2019 Actions. During 2020, we recorded net pre-tax restructuring costs totaling $10 million for restructuring actions initiated in
2019, consisting of a reversal of $2 million in Cost of sales and $12 million in Selling, general and administrative expenses. The
2019 actions relate to ongoing cost reduction efforts, including workforce reductions and the consolidation of field operations. The
following table summarizes the accrual balances and utilization by cost type for the 2019 restructuring actions:
(dollars in millions) SeveranceFacility Exit and
Other Costs Total
Restructuring accruals at January 1, 2020 $ 47 $ 11 $ 58 
Net pre-tax restructuring costs 6 4 10 
Utilization, foreign exchange and other costs (41) (5) (46)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 12 $ 10 $ 22 
The following table summarizes expected, incurred and remaining costs for the 2019 programs by segment:
(dollars in millions)Expected
CostsCosts
Incurred
During
2019Costs
Incurred
During
2020Remaining
Costs at
December 31,
2020
Pratt & Whitney $ 121 $ (133)$ 12 $ — 
Collins Aerospace Systems 107 (27) (22) 58 
Corporate expenses and other unallocated items 2 (2) — — 
Total $ 230 $ (162)$ (10)$ 58 
2018 and Prior Actions. During 2020, we reversed net pre-tax restructuring costs totaling $3 million for restructuring actions
initiated in 2018 and prior. As of December 31, 2020, we have $45 million of accrual balances remaining related to 2018 and prior
actions.
NOTE 15: FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS
We enter into derivative instruments primarily for risk management purposes, including derivatives designated as hedging
instruments under the Derivatives and Hedging Topic of the FASB ASC and those utilized as economic hedges. We operate
internationally and in the normal course of business, are exposed to fluctuations in interest rates, foreign exchange rates and
commodity prices. These fluctuations can increase the costs of financing, investing and operating the business. We have used
derivative instruments, including swaps, forward contracts and options to manage certain foreign currency, interest rate and
commodity price exposures.
The aggregate notional amount of our outstanding foreign currency hedges was $11.6 billion and $13.0 billion at December 31,
2020 and 2019, respectively. Additional information pertaining to foreign exchange and hedging activities is included in “Note 1:
Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting Principles.”
117
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the fair value and presentation in the Consolidated Balance Sheets for derivative instruments as of
December 31:
(dollars in millions) Balance Sheet Location 2020 2019
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:
Foreign exchange contracts Other assets, current $ 197 $ 23 
Other accrued liabilities 66 166 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:
Foreign exchange contracts Other assets, current 44 23 
Other accrued liabilities 32 116 
The effect of cash flow hedging relationships on accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) for the years ended December 31,
2020 and 2019 are presented in the table below. The amounts of gain or (loss) are attributable to foreign exchange contract activity
and are recorded as a component of Product sales when reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Year Ended December 31,
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Gain (loss) recorded in Accumulated other comprehensive loss $ 181 $ (33)
Loss reclassified from Accumulated other comprehensive loss into Product sales 82 51 
The Company utilizes the critical terms match method in assessing derivatives for hedge effectiveness. Accordingly, the hedged
items and derivatives designated as hedging instruments are highly effective.
We have approximately €500 million of euro-denominated long-term debt, which qualifies as a net investment hedge against our
investments in European businesses. As of December 31, 2020, the net investment hedge is deemed to be effective.
Assuming current market conditions continue, a $23 million pre-tax gain is expected to be reclassified from Accumulated other
comprehensive loss into Product sales to reflect the fixed prices obtained from foreign exchange hedging within the next 12
months. At December 31, 2020, all derivative contracts accounted for as cash flow hedges will mature by January 2028.
The effect of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments within Other income, net, on the Consolidated Statement of
Operations was as follows:
Year Ended December 31,
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Foreign exchange contracts gain (loss) $ (76)$ 91 
NOTE 16: FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
In accordance with the provisions of ASC 820, the following tables provide the valuation hierarchy classification of assets and
liabilities that are carried at fair value and measured on a recurring basis in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of December 31,
2020 and 2019:
December 31, 2020
 (dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Recurring fair value measurements:
Marketable securities held in trusts $ 881 $ 773 $ 108 $ — 
Derivative assets 241 — 241 — 
Derivative liabilities (98) — (98) — 
118
Table of Contents
December 31, 2019
 (dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Recurring fair value measurements:
Available-for-sale securities $ 53 $ 53 $ — $ — 
Derivative assets 46 — 46 — 
Derivative liabilities (282) — (282) — 
Valuation Techniques. Our available-for-sale securities include equity investments that are traded in active markets, either
domestically or internationally, and are measured at fair value using closing stock prices from active markets. Our derivative assets
and liabilities include foreign exchange contracts that are measured at fair value using internal models based on observable market
inputs such as forward rates, interest rates, our own credit risk and our counterparties’ credit risks.
As of December 31, 2020, there has not been any significant impact to the fair value of our derivative liabilities due to our own
credit risk. Similarly, there has not been any significant adverse impact to our derivative assets based on our evaluation of our
counterparties’ credit risks.
The following table provides carrying amounts and fair values of financial instruments that are not carried at fair value in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31:
 2020 2019
(dollars in millions)Carrying
AmountFair
ValueCarrying
AmountFair
Value
Customer financing notes receivable $ 271 $ 264 $ 220 $ 220 
Short-term borrowings (247) (247) (2,293) (2,293)
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) (31,512) (38,615) (40,883) (45,887)
Long-term liabilities (27) (25) (334) (320)
The following table provides the valuation hierarchy classification of assets and liabilities that are not carried at fair value in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2020 and 2019:
December 31, 2020
(dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Customer financing notes receivable $ 264 $ — $ 264 $ — 
Short-term borrowings (247) — (160) (87)
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) (38,615) — (38,540) (75)
Long-term liabilities (25) — (25) — 
December 31, 2019
(dollars in millions) Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Customer financing notes receivable $ 220 $ — $ 220 $ — 
Short-term borrowings (2,293) — — (2,293)
Long-term debt (excluding finance leases) (45,887) — (45,802) (85)
Long-term liabilities (320) — (320) — 
NOTE 17: VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
Pratt & Whitney holds a 61% program share interest in the International Aero Engines AG (IAE) collaboration with MTU Aero
Engines AG (MTU) and Japanese Aero Engines Corporation (JAEC) and a 49.5% ownership interest in IAE. IAE’s business
purpose is to coordinate the design, development, manufacturing and product support of the V2500 engine program through
involvement with the collaborators. Additionally, Pratt & Whitney, JAEC and MTU are participants in International Aero Engines,
LLC (IAE LLC), whose business purpose is to coordinate the design, development, manufacturing and product support for the
PW1100G-JM engine for the Airbus A320neo aircraft and the PW1400G-JM engine for the Irkut MC-21 aircraft. Pratt & Whitney
holds a 59% program share interest and a 59% ownership interest in IAE LLC. IAE and IAE LLC retain limited equity with the
primary economics of the programs passed to the participants. As such, we have determined that IAE and IAE LLC are variable
interest entities with Pratt & Whitney the primary beneficiary. IAE and IAE LLC have,
119
Table of Contents
therefore, been consolidated. The carrying amounts and classification of assets and liabilities for variable interest entities in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Current assets $ 6,652 $ 5,448 
Noncurrent assets 868 894 
Total assets $ 7,520 $ 6,342 
Current liabilities $ 7,365 $ 6,971 
Noncurrent liabilities 89 94 
Total liabilities $ 7,454 $ 7,065 
NOTE 18: GUARANTEES
We extend a variety of financial, market value and product performance guarantees to third parties. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, the following financial guarantees were outstanding:
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(dollars in millions)Maximum
Potential
PaymentCarrying
Amount of
LiabilityMaximum
Potential
PaymentCarrying
Amount of
Liability
Commercial aerospace financing guarantees $ 322 $ 6 $ 333 $ 7 
Performance guarantees 386 3 48 — 
We have made residual value and other guarantees related to various commercial aerospace customer financing arrangements. The
estimated fair market values of the guaranteed assets equal or exceed the value of the related guarantees, net of existing reserves.
Collaborative partner share of these financing guarantees is $142 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
We also have obligations arising from sales of certain businesses and assets, including those from representations and warranties
and related indemnities for environmental, health and safety, tax and employment matters. The maximum potential payment related
to these obligations is not a specified amount as a number of the obligations do not contain financial caps. The carrying amount of
liabilities related to these obligations was $120 million and $166 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. For
additional information regarding the environmental indemnifications, see “Note 19: Commitments and Contingencies.”
We accrue for costs associated with guarantees when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount can be
reasonably estimated. The most likely cost to be incurred is accrued based on an evaluation of currently available facts, and where
no amount within a range of estimates is more likely, the minimum is accrued.
We provide service and warranty policies on our products and extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our
normal service and warranty policies on some of our products, particularly commercial aircraft engines. In addition, we incur
discretionary costs to service our products in connection with specific product performance issues. Liabilities for performance and
operating cost guarantees are based upon future product performance and durability, and are largely estimated based upon historical
experience. Adjustments are made to accruals as claim data and historical experience warrant. The changes in the carrying amount
of service and product warranties and product performance guarantees for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 are as
follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019
Balance as of January 1 $ 1,033 $ 929 
Warranties and performance guarantees issued 311 444 
Settlements (292) (330)
Other 5 (10)
Balance as of December 31 $ 1,057 $ 1,033 
NOTE 19: COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Except as otherwise noted, while we are unable to predict the final outcome, based on information currently available, we do not
believe that resolution of any of the following matters will have a material adverse effect upon our competitive position, results of
operations, cash flows or financial condition.
120
Table of Contents
Environmental. Our operations are subject to environmental regulation by federal, state and local authorities in the United States
and regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over our foreign operations. As described in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and
Summary of Accounting Principles,” we have accrued for the costs of environmental remediation activities, including but not
limited to investigatory, remediation, operating and maintenance costs and performance guarantees, and periodically reassess these
amounts. We believe that the likelihood of incurring losses materially in excess of amounts accrued is remote. As of December 31,
2020 and 2019, we had $835 million and $725 million, respectively, reserved for environmental remediation. Additional
information pertaining to environmental matters is included in “Note 1: Basis of Presentation and Summary of Accounting
Principles.”
Commercial Aerospace Financing and Other Commitments. We had commercial aerospace financing commitments and other
contractual commitments of approximately $13.4 billion and $15.0 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, on a
gross basis before reduction for our collaboration partners’ share. Aircraft financing commitments, in the form of debt or lease
financing, are provided to certain commercial aerospace customers. The extent to which the financing commitments will be utilized
is not currently known, since customers may be able to obtain more favorable terms from other financing sources. We may also
arrange for third-party investors to assume a portion of these commitments. The majority of financing commitments are
collateralized arrangements. We may also lease aircraft and subsequently sublease the aircraft to customers under long-term non-
cancelable operating leases. Our financing commitments with customers are contingent upon maintenance of certain levels of
financial condition by the customers.
Associated risks on these commitments are mitigated due to the fact that interest rates are variable during the commitment term and
are set at the date of funding based on current market conditions, the fair value of the underlying collateral and the credit
worthiness of the customers. As a result, the fair value of these financing commitments is expected to equal the amounts funded.
We also have other contractual commitments, including commitments to make payments to secure certain contractual rights to
provide product on new aircraft platforms, which are included in “Other commercial aerospace commitments” in the table below.
Payments made on these contractual commitments are included within intangible assets as exclusivity assets and are amortized over
the term of underlying economic benefit. We have entered into certain collaboration arrangements, which may include participation
by our collaboration partners in these commitments. In addition, in connection with our 2012 agreement to acquire Rolls-Royce’s
ownership and collaboration interests in IAE, additional payments are due to Rolls-Royce contingent upon each hour flown through
June 2027 by the V2500-powered aircraft in service as of the acquisition date. These flight hour payments, which are also
considered in “Other commercial aerospace commitments” below, are being capitalized as collaboration intangible assets.
The following is the expected maturity of commercial aerospace industry commitments as of December 31, 2020:
(dollars in millions) Committed 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 Thereafter
Commercial aerospace financing
commitments $ 3,883 $ 781 $ 745 $ 1,216 $ 1,024 $ 82 $ 35 
Other commercial aerospace
commitments 9,534 521 533 602 510 410 6,958 
Collaboration partners’ share (4,902) (415) (437) (667) (587) (150) (2,646)
Total commercial aerospace
commitments $ 8,515 $ 887 $ 841 $ 1,151 $ 947 $ 342 $ 4,347 
Other Financing Arrangements. We have entered into standby letters of credit and surety bonds with financial institutions to meet
various bid, performance, warranty, retention and advance payment obligations for us or our affiliates. We enter into these
agreements to assist certain affiliates in obtaining financing on more favorable terms, making bids on contracts and performing
their contractual obligations. The stated values of these letters of credit agreements and surety bonds totaled $4.5 billion as of
December 31, 2020.
Offset Obligations. We have entered into industrial cooperation agreements, sometimes in the form of either offset agreements or
ICIP agreements, as a condition to obtaining orders for our products and services from certain customers in foreign countries. At
December 31, 2020, the aggregate amount of our offset agreements, both agreed to and anticipated to be agreed to, had an
outstanding notional value of approximately $11.0 billion. These agreements are designed to return economic value to the foreign
country by requiring us to engage in activities supporting local defense or commercial industries, promoting a balance of trade,
developing in-country technology capabilities or addressing other local development priorities. Offset agreements may be satisfied
through activities that do not require a direct cash payment, including transferring technology, providing manufacturing, training
and other consulting support to in-country projects, and the purchase by third parties (e.g., our vendors) of supplies from in-country
vendors. These agreements may also be satisfied through our use of cash for activities such as subcontracting with local partners,
purchasing supplies from in-country vendors, providing financial support for in-country
121
Table of Contents
projects and making investments in local ventures. Such activities may also vary by country depending upon requirements as
dictated by their governments. We typically do not commit to offset agreements until orders for our products or services are
definitive. The amounts ultimately applied against our offset agreements are based on negotiations with the customers and typically
require cash outlays that represent only a fraction of the notional value in the offset agreements. Offset programs usually extend
over several or more years and may provide for penalties in the event we fail to perform in accordance with offset requirements.
Historically, we have not been required to pay any penalties of significance.
Government Oversight. In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries and our properties are subject to
regulatory and governmental examinations, information gathering requests, inquiries, investigations and threatened legal actions
and proceedings. For example, we are now, and believe that, in light of the current U.S. government contracting environment, we
will continue to be the subject of one or more U.S. government investigations. Our contracts with the U.S. government are also
subject to audits. Agencies that oversee contract performance include: the Defense Contract Audit Agency (DCAA), the Defense
Contract Management Agency (DCMA), the Inspectors General of the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) and other departments
and agencies, the Government Accountability Office (GAO), the Department of Justice (DOJ), and Congressional Committees.
Other areas of our business operations may also be subject to audit and investigation by these and other agencies. From time to
time, agencies investigate or conduct audits to determine whether our operations are being conducted in accordance with applicable
requirements. Such investigations and audits may be initiated due to a number of reasons, including as a result of a whistleblower
complaint. Such investigations and audits could result in administrative, civil or criminal liabilities, including repayments, fines,
treble or other damages, forfeitures, restitution, or penalties being imposed upon us, the suspension of government export licenses
or the suspension or debarment from future U.S. government contracting. U.S. government investigations often take years to
complete. The U.S. government also reserves the right to debar a contractor from receiving new government contracts for
fraudulent, criminal or other seriously improper conduct. The U.S. government could void any contracts found to be tainted by
fraud. Like many defense contractors, we have received audit reports recommending the reduction of certain contract prices
because, for example, cost or pricing data or cost accounting practices used to price and negotiate those contracts may not have
conformed to government regulations. Some of these audit reports recommend that certain payments be repaid, delayed, or
withheld, and may involve substantial amounts. We have made voluntary refunds in those cases we believe appropriate, have
settled some allegations and, in some cases, continue to negotiate and/or litigate. The Company may be, and has been, required to
make payments into escrow of disputed liabilities while the related litigation is pending. If the litigation is resolved in the
Company’s favor, any such payments will be returned to the Company with interest. Our final allowable incurred costs for each
year are also subject to audit and have, from time to time, resulted in disputes between us and the U.S. government, with litigation
resulting at the Court of Federal Claims (COFC) or the Armed Services Board of Contract Appeals (ASBCA) or their related courts
of appeals. In addition, the DOJ has, from time to time, convened grand juries to investigate possible irregularities by us. We also
provide products and services to customers outside of the U.S., and those sales are subject to local government laws, regulations
and procurement policies and practices. Our compliance with such local government regulations or any applicable U.S. government
regulations (e.g., the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR)) may also be
investigated or audited. In addition, we accrue for liabilities associated with those matters that are probable and can be reasonably
estimated. The most likely liability amount to be incurred is accrued based upon a range of estimates. Where no amount within a
range of estimates is more likely, then we accrue the minimum amount. Other than as specifically disclosed in this Form 10-K, we
do not expect these audits, investigations or disputes to have a material effect on our financial position, results of operations or
liquidity, either individually or in the aggregate.
Legal Proceedings. The Company and its subsidiaries are subject to various litigation matters across jurisdictions, updates to
certain of which are set forth below.
Cost Accounting Standards Claims
As previously disclosed, in April 2019, a Divisional Administrative Contracting Officer (DACO) of the United States DCMA
asserted a claim against Pratt & Whitney to recover overpayments of approximately $1.73 billion plus interest ($681 million at
December 31, 2020). The claim is based on Pratt & Whitney’s alleged noncompliance with Cost Accounting Standards (CAS) from
January 1, 2007 to March 31, 2019, due to its method of allocating independent research and development costs to government
contracts. Pratt & Whitney believes that the claim is without merit and filed an appeal to the ASBCA on June 7, 2019.
As previously disclosed, in December 2013, a DCMA DACO asserted a claim against Pratt & Whitney to recover overpayments of
approximately $177 million plus interest ($113 million at December 31, 2020). The claim is based on Pratt & Whitney’s alleged
noncompliance with CAS from January 1, 2005 to December 31, 2012, due to its method of determining the cost of collaborator
parts used in the calculation of material overhead costs for government contracts. In 2014, Pratt & Whitney filed an appeal to the
ASBCA. An evidentiary hearing was held and completed in June 2019. The parties concluded post-hearing briefing in January
2020, and now await a decision from the ASBCA. We continue to believe that the claim is without
122
Table of Contents
merit. In December 2018, a DCMA DACO issued a second claim against Pratt & Whitney that similarly alleges that its method of
determining the cost of collaborator parts does not comply with the CAS for calendar years 2013 through 2017. This second claim
demands payment of $269 million plus interest ($69 million at December 31, 2020), which we also believe is without merit and
which Pratt & Whitney appealed to the ASBCA in January 2019.
Thales-Raytheon Systems Matter
As previously disclosed, in 2019, Raytheon Company received a subpoena from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)
seeking information in connection with an investigation into whether there were improper payments made by Thales-Raytheon
Systems (TRS) or anyone acting on their behalf in connection with TRS or Raytheon Company contracts in certain Middle East
countries since 2014. In the first quarter of 2020, the DOJ advised Raytheon Company it had opened a parallel investigation. In the
third quarter of 2020, Raytheon Company received an additional subpoena from the SEC, seeking information and documents as
part of its ongoing investigation. Raytheon Company maintains a rigorous anti-corruption compliance program, is cooperating fully
with the SEC’s inquiry, and is examining whether there has been any conduct that is in violation of Raytheon Company policy. At
this time, the Company is unable to predict the outcome of the SEC’s or DOJ’s inquiry. Based on the information available to date,
however, we do not believe the results of this inquiry will have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of
operations or liquidity.
DOJ Investigation
On October 8, 2020, the Company received a criminal subpoena from the DOJ seeking information and documents in connection
with an investigation relating to financial accounting, internal controls over financial reporting, and cost reporting regarding
Raytheon Company’s Missiles & Defense business since 2009. We are cooperating fully with the DOJ’s investigation. At this time,
the Company is unable to predict the outcome of the investigation. Based on the information available to date, however, we do not
believe the results of this inquiry will have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations or liquidity.
Four lawsuits were filed against the Company after the DOJ investigation was first disclosed. A putative securities class action
lawsuit was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Arizona against the Company and certain of its executives
alleging that the defendants violated federal securities laws by making material misstatements in regulatory filings regarding
internal controls over financial reporting in the Missiles & Defense business. Three shareholder derivative lawsuits were filed in the
United States District Court for the District of Delaware against the former Raytheon Company Board of Directors, the Company
and certain of its executives, each alleging that defendants violated federal securities laws and breached their fiduciary duties by
engaging in improper accounting practices, failing to implement sufficient internal financial and compliance controls, and making a
series of false and misleading statements in regulatory filings. We believe that each of these lawsuits lacks merit.
Darnis, et al.
On August 12, 2020, several former employees of UTC or its subsidiaries filed a putative class action complaint in the United
States District Court for the District of Connecticut against the Company, Otis, Carrier, the former members of the UTC Board of
Directors, and the members of the Carrier and Otis Boards of Directors (Geraud Darnis, et al. v. Raytheon Technologies
Corporation, et al.). The complaint challenges the method by which UTC equity awards were converted to Company, Otis, and
Carrier equity awards following the separation of UTC into three independent, publicly-traded companies on April 3, 2020. The
complaint claims that the defendants are liable for breach of certain equity compensation plans and for breach of fiduciary duty, and
also asserts claims under certain provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA). We believe that the
Company has meritorious defenses to these claims. At this time, the Company is unable to predict the outcome, or the possible
range of loss, if any, which could result from this action.
Other. As described in “Note 18: Guarantees,” we extend performance and operating cost guarantees beyond our normal warranty
and service policies for extended periods on some of our products. We have accrued our estimate of the liability that may result
under these guarantees and for service costs that are probable and can be reasonably estimated.
We also have other commitments and contingent liabilities related to legal proceedings, self-insurance programs and matters arising
out of the normal course of business. We accrue contingencies based upon a range of possible outcomes. If no amount within this
range is a better estimate than any other, then we accrue the minimum amount. Of note, the design, development, production and
support of new aerospace technologies is inherently complex and subject to risk. Since the PW1000G Geared TurboFan engine
entered into service in 2016, technical issues have been identified and experienced with the engine, which is usual for new engines
and new aerospace technologies. Pratt & Whitney has addressed these issues through various improvements and modifications.
These issues have resulted in financial impacts, including increased warranty provisions, customer contract settlements, and
reductions in contract performance estimates. Additional technical issues, either related to this program or other programs, may also
arise in the normal course, which may result in financial impacts that could be material to the Company’s financial position, results
of operations and cash flows.
123
Table of Contents
In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries are also routinely defendants in, parties to or otherwise subject
to many pending and threatened legal actions, claims, disputes and proceedings. These matters are often based on alleged violations
of contract, product liability, warranty, regulatory, environmental, health and safety, employment, intellectual property, tax and
other laws. In some instances, claims for substantial monetary damages are asserted against the Company and its subsidiaries and
could result in fines, penalties, compensatory or treble damages or non-monetary relief. We do not believe that these matters will
have a material adverse effect upon our competitive position, results of operations, cash flows or financial condition.
NOTE 20: ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
A summary of the changes in each component of Accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 is provided below:
(dollars in millions)Foreign
Currency
TranslationDefined Benefit
Pension and
Postretirement
PlansUnrealized Gains
(Losses) on
Available-for-
Sale SecuritiesUnrealized
Hedging
(Losses)
GainsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
(Loss) Income
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ (2,950)$ (4,652)$ 5 $ 72 $ (7,525)
Other comprehensive loss before
reclassifications, net (486) (1,736) — (307) (2,529)
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax (2) 344 — (16) 326 
Tax benefit (expense) (4) 326 — 78 400 
ASU 2016-01 adoption impact — — (5) — (5)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (3,442)$ (5,718)$ — $ (173)$ (9,333)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications, net 280 (584) — (33) (337)
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax 2 170 — 51 223 
Tax benefit (expense) (43) 97 — (11) 43 
ASU 2018-02 adoption impact (8) (737) — — (745)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ (3,211)$ (6,772)$ — $ (166)$ (10,149)
Other comprehensive income before
reclassifications, net 609 1,842 — 181 2,632 
Amounts reclassified, pre-tax — 373 — 82 455 
Tax benefit (expense) 25 (510) — (62) (547)
Separation of Carrier and Otis, net of tax 3,287 584 — 4 3,875 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 710 $ (4,483)$ — $ 39 $ (3,734)
In February 2018, the FASB issued ASU 2018-02, Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Topic 220). The standard allows companies to reclassify to retained earnings the stranded tax effects in Accumulated other
comprehensive income (AOCI) from the TCJA. We elected to reclassify the income tax effects of TCJA from AOCI of $745
million to retained earnings, effective January 1, 2019.
In January 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-01, Financial Instruments - Overall: Recognition and Measurement of Financial
Assets and Financial Liabilities. This ASU modifies how entities measure equity investments and present changes in the fair value
of financial liabilities. Upon adoption, investments that do not result in consolidation and are not accounted for under the equity
method generally must be carried at fair value, with changes in fair value recognized in net income. We had approximately $5
million of unrealized gains on these securities recorded in Accumulated other comprehensive loss in our Consolidated Balance
Sheet as of December 31, 2017. We adopted this standard effective January 1, 2018, with these amounts recorded directly to
retained earnings as of that date.
Amounts reclassified that relate to our defined benefit pension and postretirement plans include the amortization of prior service
costs and actuarial net losses recognized during each period presented. These costs are recorded as components of net periodic
pension cost for each period presented.
All noncontrolling interests with redemption features, such as put options, that are not solely within our control (redeemable
noncontrolling interests) are reported in the mezzanine section of the Consolidated Balance Sheet, between liabilities and equity, at
the greater of redemption value or initial carrying value.
124
Table of Contents
NOTE 21: STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
RTC’s long-term incentive plans authorize various types of market and performance based incentive awards that may be granted to
officers and employees. The Raytheon Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2018 LTIP) was approved by
shareowners on April 30, 2018 (formerly the United Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan).
Upon the separation of Carrier and Otis that occurred on April 3, 2020, the shares remaining for future issuance under the 2018
LTIP were adjusted, in accordance with plan rules. With this adjustment, a total of 81.3 million shares have been authorized for
issuance pursuant to awards under the 2018 LTIP. As of December 31, 2020, approximately 48 million shares remain available for
awards under the 2018 LTIP. The 2018 LTIP does not contain an aggregate annual award limit, however, it sets an annual award
limit per participant. Unless shareowners approve a proposal to extend the term of the 2018 LTIP at the Company’s Annual Meeting
on April 26, 2021, the 2018 LTIP will expire after all authorized shares have been awarded or April 30, 2028, whichever is sooner.
If shareowners approve the proposed extension, the 2018 LTIP will expire after all authorized shares have been awarded or April
26, 2031, whichever is sooner.
As a result of the Raytheon Merger, Raytheon Company shares of restricted stock, restricted stock units (RSUs) and performance
share units outstanding prior to the merge, which were issued originally under the Raytheon Company 2010 Stock Plan, as
amended and restated, and the Raytheon Company 2018 Stock Plan (together “legacy Raytheon Company Plans”), were converted
to Raytheon Technologies shares of restricted stock and RSUs, which resulted in 4.5 million new shares of restricted stock and
2.0 million new RSUs. The conversion of the stock awards resulted in de minimis incremental compensation cost. No new equity
awards will be issued under the legacy Raytheon Company Plans.
As a result of the Separation Transactions and Distributions, outstanding awards granted to employees under the 2018 LTIP and
under its predecessor plan (the amended and restated United Technologies Long-Term Incentive Plan) were converted into Carrier,
Otis, and RTC stock-based awards, depending on whether awards were vested or unvested as of April 2, 2020. Vested awards were
converted into vested awards of RTX, Carrier and Otis, and unvested awards were generally converted into unvested awards of the
employee’s post-separation employer. This conversion resulted in an incremental 1.7 million stock options, 47.1 million stock
appreciation rights, 2.7 million performance share units and 5.5 million RSUs. The conversion of the awards resulted in de minimis
incremental compensation cost.
Additionally, concurrent with the Separation Transactions and Distributions, all performance share units outstanding on April 3,
2020 were converted to RSUs using payout metrics based on a combination of actual performance and the target for the remainder
of the performance period. As a result, the performance share units were converted to 4.0 million RSUs, which were then converted
into RTC, Carrier or Otis RSUs, as described above.
Of these converted awards, 1.4 million stock options, 47.9 million stock appreciation rights and 7.1 million RSUs were converted
into Carrier and Otis awards and became obligations of Carrier and Otis due to the Separation Transactions and Distributions.
Under the 2018 LTIP, the exercise price of awards is set on the grant date and may not be less than the fair market value per share
on that date. Generally, stock appreciation rights and stock options have a term of ten years and a three-year vesting period, subject
to limited exceptions. In the event of retirement, annual stock appreciation rights, stock options, and RSUs held for more than one
year may become vested and exercisable, subject to certain terms and conditions. LTIP awards with performance-based vesting
generally have a minimum three-year vesting period and vest based on actual performance against pre-established metrics. In the
event of retirement, performance-based awards held for more than one year, remain eligible to vest based on actual performance
relative to performance goals. We have historically repurchased shares of our common stock in an amount at least equal to the
number of shares issued under our equity compensation arrangements and will continue to evaluate this policy in conjunction with
our overall share repurchase program.
We measure the cost of all share-based payments, including stock options and stock appreciation rights, at fair value on the grant
date and recognize this cost in the Consolidated Statement of Operations, net of expected forfeitures, as follows:
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total compensation cost recognized $ 330 $ 268 $ 169 
The associated future income tax benefit recognized was $63 million, $47 million and $31 million for the years ended December
31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, the amount of cash received from the exercise of stock options was $15
million, $27 million and $36 million, respectively, with an associated tax benefit realized of $48 million, $75 million and $59
million, respectively. In addition, for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, the associated tax benefit realized from
the vesting of performance share units, restricted stock awards and RSUs was $58 million, $36 million and $13 million,
respectively.
125
Table of Contents
At December 31, 2020, there was $315 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to non-vested equity awards
granted under long-term incentive plans. This cost is expected to be recognized ratably over a weighted-average period of 2.6 years.
A summary of the transactions under our long-term incentive plans for the years ended December 31, 2020 follows. The amounts in
the tables and paragraphs below have not been recast for discontinued operations.
 Stock Options Stock Appreciation Rights Performance Share Units Restricted Stock and RSUs
(shares and units in thousands) SharesAverage
Price SharesAverage
Price UnitsAverage
Price UnitsAverage
Price 
Outstanding at:
December 31, 2019 1,568 $106.75 32,713 $108.61 1,919 $120.04 3,319 $119.34 
Granted 262 153.00 6,346 152.45 — — 1,718 119.86 
Exercised / earned (144) 77.02 (3,755) 83.78 (527) 111.17 (2,622) 72.13 
Cancelled (18) 92.36 (991) 95.30 (48) 110.18 (267) 79.66 
Conversion impact -
Separation and
Distribution 276 43.71 (763) 38.00 (1,344) 46.58 2,404 42.69 
Conversion impact -
Raytheon Merger — — — — — — 6,482 51.00 
December 31, 2020 1,944 $ 77.88 33,550 $ 77.93 — $ — 11,034 $ 62.92 
(1)    Weighted-average grant / exercise price.
(2)    Represents UTC awards converted for the Separation and Distribution and conversion of performance share units to RSUs as discussed further above.
(3)    Represents Raytheon Company awards converted to RTC restricted stock and RSUs in accordance with the Raytheon Merger.
The weighted-average grant date fair value of stock options and stock appreciation rights granted during 2020, 2019 and 2018 was
$23.37, $20.81 and $20.24, respectively. The weighted-average grant date fair value of performance share units, which vest upon
achieving certain performance metrics, granted during 2019 and 2018 was $117.87 and $131.55, respectively. The total fair value
of awards vested during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $284 million, $211 million and $149 million,
respectively. The total intrinsic value (which is the amount by which the stock price exceeded the exercise price on the date of
exercise) of stock options and stock appreciation rights exercised during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was
$206 million, $383 million and $283 million, respectively. The total intrinsic value (which is the stock price at vesting multiplied
by the number of underlying shares) of performance share units and other restricted awards vested was $295 million, $188 million
and $74 million during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
The following table summarizes information about equity awards outstanding that are vested and expected to vest as well as equity
awards outstanding that are exercisable at December 31, 2020:
 Equity Awards Vested and Expected to Vest Equity Awards That Are Exercisable
(shares in thousands; aggregate intrinsic
value in millions) AwardsAverage
Price Aggregate
Intrinsic
ValueRemaining
Term AwardsAverage
Price Aggregate
Intrinsic
ValueRemaining
Term 
Stock Options 1,923 $77.82 $ — 6.49 754 $74.28 $2,414 3.86
Stock Appreciation Rights 33,164 77.86 — 6.34 16,766 75.51 42,783 4.45
Restricted Stock and RSUs 10,589 63.07 — 1.63
(1)    Weighted-average exercise price per share.
(2)    Weighted-average contractual remaining term in years.
The fair value of each option award is estimated on the date of grant using a binomial lattice model. The following table indicates
the assumptions used in estimating fair value for awards granted during 2020, 2019 and 2018. Lattice-based option models
incorporate ranges of assumptions for inputs; those ranges are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Expected volatility 18.8% 18.8% - 19.7% 17.5% - 21.1%
Weighted-average volatility 19 % 20 % 18 %
Expected term (in years) 6.5 6.5 - 6.6 6.5 - 6.6
Expected dividend yield 1.9 % 2.4 % 2.2 %
Risk-free rate 1.4% - 1.6% 2.3% - 2.7% 1.3% - 2.7%(1) (1) (1) (1)
(2)
(3)
(1) (2) (1) (2)
126
Table of Contents
Expected volatilities are based on the returns of our stock, including implied volatilities from traded options on our stock for the
binomial lattice model. We use historical data to estimate equity award exercise and employee termination behavior within the
valuation model. The expected term represents an estimate of the period of time equity awards are expected to remain outstanding.
The risk-free rate is based on the term structure of interest rates at the time of equity award grant.
NOTE 22: SEGMENT FINANCIAL DATA
Our operations for the periods presented herein are classified into four principal segments: Collins Aerospace, Pratt & Whitney, RIS
and RMD. The segments are generally based on the management structure of the businesses and the grouping of similar operating
companies, where each management organization has general operating autonomy over diversified products and services. The
results of RIS and RMD reflect the period subsequent to the completion of the Raytheon Merger on April 3, 2020.
Collins Aerospace Systems is a leading global provider of technologically advanced aerospace and defense products and
aftermarket service solutions for aircraft manufacturers, airlines, and regional, business and general aviation, as well as for defense
and commercial space operations. Collins Aerospace’s product lines include integrated avionics systems, communications systems,
navigation systems, electric power generation, management and distribution systems, environmental control systems, flight control
systems, air data and aircraft sensing systems, engine control systems, engine nacelle systems, including thrust reversers and
mounting pylons, interior and exterior aircraft lighting, aircraft seating and cargo systems, landing systems, including landing gear,
wheels and braking systems, hoists and winches, fire and ice detection and protection systems, actuation systems, engine
components, and propeller systems. Collins Aerospace also designs, produces and supports cabin interior, communications and
aviation systems, oxygen systems, food and beverage preparation, storage and galley systems, lavatory and wastewater
management systems. Collins Aerospace solutions support human space exploration with environmental control and power systems
and extravehicular activity suits and support government and defense customer missions by providing airborne intelligence,
surveillance and reconnaissance systems, test and training range systems, crew escape systems, and simulation and training
solutions. Collins Aerospace also provides information management services through worldwide voice and data communication
networks and solutions. Aftermarket services include spare parts, overhaul and repair, engineering and technical support, training
and fleet management solutions, and information management services.
Pratt & Whitney is among the world’s leading suppliers of aircraft engines for commercial, military, business jet and general
aviation customers. Pratt & Whitney’s Commercial Engines and Military Engines businesses design, develop, produce and maintain
families of large engines for wide- and narrow-body and large regional aircraft for commercial customers and for fighter, bomber,
tanker and transport aircraft for military customers. Pratt & Whitney’s small engine business, Pratt & Whitney Canada (P&WC), is
among the world’s leading suppliers of engines powering regional airlines, general and business aviation, as well as helicopters.
Pratt & Whitney also produces, sells and services military and commercial auxiliary power units. Pratt & Whitney provides fleet
management services and aftermarket maintenance, repair and overhaul services in all of these segments.
Raytheon Intelligence & Space is a global leading developer and provider of integrated sensor and communication systems for
advanced missions, advanced training, and cyber and software solutions to intelligence, defense, federal and commercial customers.
RIS capabilities include space-based sensors and data processing systems; multi-domain intelligence solutions; electronic warfare
solutions, including high-energy laser weapons systems; command and control systems; modernization, training and mission
support services; and advanced cyber analytics, systems defense and services.
Raytheon Missiles & Defense is a leading designer, developer, integrator producer and sustainer of integrated air and missile
defense systems; defensive and combat solutions; large land- and sea-based radars; command, control, communications and
intelligence solutions; and naval and undersea sensor solutions for the U.S. and foreign government customers. RMD’s integrated
air and missile defense systems include the proven Patriot missile defense system and next-generation radar systems to defeat
advanced threats. Its defensive solutions include counter-unmanned aircraft systems and ship defense systems. Its combat solutions
include precision munitions, missiles, hypersonics, high power microwave and other weapons. Its command, control,
communications and intelligence solutions include integrated, networked, actionable combat solutions for air and land combat
commanders. RMD’s naval and undersea solutions include combat and ship electronic and sensing systems, as well as undersea
sensing and effects solutions. Its sustainment solutions include maintenance, depot support, training and predictive analytics
services.
Segment Information. Total sales and operating profit by segment include inter-segment sales which are generally recorded at
prices approximating those that the selling entity is able to obtain on external sales for our Collins Aerospace and Pratt & Whitney
segments, and at cost-plus a specified fee, which may differ from what the selling entity would be able to obtain on sales to external
customers, for our RIS and RMD segments.
In conjunction with the Raytheon Merger, we revised our measurement of segment performance to reflect how management now
reviews and evaluates operating performance. Under the new segment performance measurement, certain acquisition
127
Table of Contents
accounting adjustments are now excluded from segments’ results in order to better represent the ongoing operational performance
of those segments. In addition, the majority of Corporate expenses are now allocated to the segments, excluding certain items that
remain at Corporate because they are not included in management’s review of the segments’ results. Historical results, discussion
and presentation of our business segments reflect the impact of these adjustments for all periods presented.
Also as a result of the Raytheon Merger, we now present a FAS/CAS operating adjustment outside of segment results, which
represents the difference between the service cost component of our pension and PRB expense under the Financial Accounting
Standards (FAS) requirements of U.S. GAAP and our pension and PRB expense under U.S. government Cost Accounting Standards
(CAS) primarily related to our RIS and RMD segments. While the ultimate liability for pension and PRB costs under FAS and CAS
is similar, the pattern of cost recognition is different. Over time we generally expect to recover the related RIS and RMD pension
and PRB liabilities through the pricing of our products and services to the U.S. government. Because the Collins Aerospace and
Pratt & Whitney segments generally record pension and PRB expense on a FAS basis, historical results were not impacted by this
change in segment reporting.
Segment information for the years ended December 31 is as follows:
 Net Sales Operating Profit (Loss) Operating Profit (Loss) Margins
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Collins Aerospace Systems$19,288 $26,028 $16,634 $1,466 $4,508 $2,397 7.6 % 17.3 % 14.4 %
Pratt & Whitney 16,799 20,902 19,402 (564) 1,801 1,402 (3.4)% 8.6 % 7.2 %
Raytheon Intelligence &
Space 10,841 — — 1,014 — — 9.4 % — % — %
Raytheon Missiles &
Defense 11,660 — — 890 — — 7.6 % — % — %
Total segment 58,588 46,930 36,036 2,806 6,309 3,799 4.8 % 13.4 % 10.5 %
Eliminations and other (2,001) (1,581) (1,335) (111) (140) (69)
Corporate expenses and
other unallocated items — — — (590) (367) (340)
FAS/CAS operating
adjustment — — — 1,106 — — 
Acquisition accounting
adjustments — — — (5,100) (888) (513)
Consolidated $56,587 $45,349 $34,701 $(1,889)$4,914 $2,877 (3.3)% 10.8 % 8.3 %
(1)    Includes the operating results of certain smaller non-reportable business segments, including Forcepoint, LLC, which was acquired as part of the Raytheon
Merger, and subsequently disposed of in January 2021.
(2)    The net expenses related to the U.S. Army’s Lower Tier Air and Missile Defense Sensor (LTAMDS) project of $130 million in 2020 are included in Corporate
operating profit as they are not included in management’s evaluation of business segment results. No amounts were recorded in 2019 or 2018.
(3)    Operating profit (loss) in 2020 includes the $3.2 billion goodwill impairment charge in the second quarter of 2020 related to two Collins Aerospace reporting
units. Refer to “Note 2: Acquisitions, Dispositions, Goodwill and Intangible Assets” for additional information.
 Total Assets Capital Expenditures Depreciation & Amortization
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Collins Aerospace Systems $68,701 $74,049 $ 638 $ 959 $ 515 $ 736 $ 695 $ 396 
Pratt & Whitney 32,780 31,170 565 822 866 729 614 574 
Raytheon Intelligence & Space 20,911 — 214 — — 152 — — 
Raytheon Missiles & Defense 29,999 — 284 — — 230 — — 
Total segment 152,391 105,219 1,701 1,781 1,381 1,847 1,309 970 
Corporate, eliminations and other 9,698 2,573 94 87 86 155 165 161 
Acquisition accounting adjustments 2,154 1,234 765 
Assets related to discontinued
operations 64 31,823 
Consolidated $162,153 $139,615 $1,795 $1,868 $1,467 $4,156 $2,708 $1,896 
(1)    Total assets include acquired intangible assets and property, plant and equipment fair value adjustment. Related amortization expense is included in Acquisition
accounting adjustments.
Geographic External Sales by Origin and Long-Lived Assets. Geographic external sales are attributed to the geographic regions
based on their location of origin. U.S. external sales include export sales to commercial customers outside the U.S. and sales to the
U.S. government, commercial and affiliated customers, which are known to be for resale to customers outside the U.S. Long-lived
assets are net fixed assets attributed to the specific geographic regions. (1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
128
Table of Contents
 External Net Sales Long-Lived Assets
(dollars in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
United States Operations $48,560 $35,125 $26,646 $11,560 $7,048 
International Operations
Europe 3,696 4,419 3,092 1,371 1,268 
Asia Pacific 1,574 1,989 1,645 893 917 
Middle East and North Africa 103 203 226 137 132 
Other 2,654 3,613 3,092 1,001 957 
Consolidated $56,587 $45,349 $34,701 $14,962 $10,322 
Disaggregation of Revenue. We also disaggregate our contracts from customers by geographic location based on customer
location, by customer and by sales type. Our geographic location based on customer location uses end user customer location where
known or practical to determine, or in instances where the end user customer is not known or not practical to determine, we utilize
“ship to” location as the customer location. In addition, for our RIS and RMD segments, we disaggregate our contracts from
customers by contract type. We believe these categories best depict how the nature, amount, timing and uncertainty of our revenue
and cash flows are affected by economic factors. Historical results have been recast to reflect the presentation of this
disaggregation.
Segment sales disaggregated by geographic region for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 10,132 $ 8,534 $ 8,500 $ 7,110 $ 284 $ 34,560 
Asia Pacific 1,810 4,024 613 1,156 41 7,644 
Middle East and North Africa 421 505 376 2,111 30 3,443 
Europe 4,643 2,726 307 1,031 149 8,856 
Canada and All Other 904 1,001 83 73 23 2,084 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 9,879 11,481 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 962 179 (2,528) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 10,841 $ 11,660 $ (2,001)$ 56,587 
2019
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 12,762 $ 8,622 $ — $ — $ 13 $ 21,397 
Asia Pacific 2,473 5,462 — — — 7,935 
Middle East and North Africa 693 837 — — — 1,530 
Europe 7,051 4,327 — — — 11,378 
Canada and All Other 1,452 1,657 — — — 3,109 
Consolidated net sales 24,431 20,905 — — 13 45,349 
Inter-segment sales 1,597 (3) — — (1,594) — 
Business segment sales $ 26,028 $ 20,902 $ — $ — $ (1,581)$ 45,349 
129
Table of Contents
2018
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
United States $ 7,079 $ 8,575 $ — $ — $ 12 $ 15,666 
Asia Pacific 1,525 5,112 — — — 6,637 
Middle East and North Africa 425 457 — — — 882 
Europe 5,508 4,023 — — — 9,531 
Canada and All Other 748 1,237 — — — 1,985 
Consolidated net sales 15,285 19,404 — — 12 34,701 
Inter-segment sales 1,349 (2) — — (1,347) — 
Business segment sales $ 16,634 $ 19,402 $ — $ — $ (1,335)$ 34,701 
Segment sales disaggregated by customer for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 5,159 $ 5,193 $ 8,309 $ 7,099 $ 202 $ 25,962 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 218 1,229 593 2,545 — 4,585 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 923 583 729 1,736 3 3,974 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 11,610 9,785 248 101 322 22,066 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 9,879 11,481 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 962 179 (2,528) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 10,841 $ 11,660 $ (2,001)$ 56,587 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
2019
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 4,781 $ 4,313 $ — $ — $ — $ 9,094 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 255 1,316 — — — 1,571 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 937 561 — — — 1,498 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 18,458 14,715 — — 13 33,186 
Consolidated net sales 24,431 20,905 — — 13 45,349 
Inter-segment sales 1,597 (3) — — (1,594) — 
Business segment sales $ 26,028 $ 20,902 $ — $ — $ (1,581)$ 45,349 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.(1)
(1)
130
Table of Contents
2018
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
U.S. government $ 2,643 $ 3,917 $ — $ — $ — $ 6,560 
Foreign military sales through the
U.S. government 195 707 — — — 902 
Foreign government direct
commercial sales 737 538 — — — 1,275 
Commercial aerospace and other
commercial 11,710 14,242 — — 12 25,964 
Consolidated net sales 15,285 19,404 — — 12 34,701 
Inter-segment sales 1,349 (2) — — (1,347) — 
Business segment sales $ 16,634 $ 19,402 $ — $ — $ (1,335)$ 34,701 
(1)    Excludes foreign military sales through the U.S. government.
Sales to Airbus primarily relate to Pratt & Whitney and Collins Aerospace products, and prior to discounts and incentives were
approximately $7,299 million, $9,879 million and $10,025 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
Segment sales disaggregated by sales type for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
2020
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Product $ 14,664 $ 10,186 $ 7,531 $ 10,476 $ 462 $ 43,319 
Service 3,246 6,604 2,348 1,005 65 13,268 
Consolidated net sales 17,910 16,790 9,879 11,481 527 56,587 
Inter-segment sales 1,378 9 962 179 (2,528) — 
Business segment sales $ 19,288 $ 16,799 $ 10,841 $ 11,660 $ (2,001)$ 56,587 
2019
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Product $ 19,991 $ 12,994 $ — $ — $ 13 $ 32,998 
Service 4,440 7,911 — — — 12,351 
Consolidated net sales 24,431 20,905 — — 13 45,349 
Inter-segment sales 1,597 (3) — — (1,594) — 
Business segment sales $ 26,028 $ 20,902 $ — $ — $ (1,581)$ 45,349 
2018
(dollars in millions)Collins
Aerospace
Systems Pratt & WhitneyRaytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense Other Total
Product $ 12,708 $ 11,421 $ — $ — $ 12 $ 24,141 
Service 2,577 7,983 — — — 10,560 
Consolidated net sales 15,285 19,404 — — 12 34,701 
Inter-segment sales 1,349 (2) — — (1,347) — 
Business segment sales $ 16,634 $ 19,402 $ — $ — $ (1,335)$ 34,701 (1)
131
Table of Contents
RIS and RMD segment sales disaggregated by contract type for the year ended December 31, 2020 are as follows:
2020
(dollars in millions)Raytheon
Intelligence &
SpaceRaytheon
Missiles &
Defense
Fixed-price $ 4,319 $ 7,287 
Cost-type 5,560 4,194 
Consolidated net sales $ 9,879 $ 11,481 
NOTE 23: QUARTERLY OPERATING RESULTS (UNAUDITED)
2020 Quarters 2019 Quarters
(dollars in millions, except per share
amounts) First Second Third Fourth First Second Third Fourth
Net Sales $11,360 $14,061 $14,747 $16,419 $10,953 $11,329 $11,373 $11,694 
Gross margin 2,788 1,847 1,743 2,153 2,534 2,775 2,864 2,578 
Income (loss) from continuing
operations attributable to common
shareowners 438 (3,844) 151 146 712 1,183 958 657 
Income (loss) from discontinued
operations attributable to common
shareowners (521) 9 113 (11) 634 717 190 486 
Net income (loss) attributable to
common shareowners $ (83)$(3,835)$ 264 $ 135 $1,346 $1,900 $1,148 $1,143 
Earnings per share of Common
Stock - Basic:
Income (loss) from continuing
operations attributable to
common shareowners $ 0.51 $(2.56)$ 0.10 $ 0.10 $ 0.84 $ 1.38 $ 1.12 $ 0.77 
Income (loss) from discontinued
operations (0.61) 0.01 0.08 (0.01) 0.74 0.84 0.22 0.56 
Net income (loss) attributable to
common shareowners $(0.10)$(2.55)$ 0.17 $ 0.09 $ 1.58 $ 2.22 $ 1.34 $ 1.33 
Earnings (loss) per share of
Common Stock - Diluted:
Income (loss) from continuing
operations attributable to
common shareowners $ 0.50 $(2.56)$ 0.10 $ 0.10 $ 0.83 $ 1.37 $ 1.11 $ 0.76 
Income (loss) from discontinued
operations (0.60) 0.01 0.08 (0.01) 0.73 0.83 0.22 0.56 
Net income (loss) attributable to
common shareowners $(0.10)$(2.55)$ 0.17 $ 0.09 $ 1.56 $ 2.20 $ 1.33 $ 1.32 
132
Table of Contents
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
As required by Rule 13a-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, we carried out an evaluation under the
supervision and with the participation of our management, including the President and Chief Executive Officer (CEO), the
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (CFO) and the Corporate Vice President and Controller (Controller), of the
effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures. There are inherent limitations to the
effectiveness of any system of disclosure controls and procedures, including the possibility of human error and the circumvention
or overriding of the controls and procedures. Accordingly, even effective disclosure controls and procedures can only provide
reasonable assurance of achieving their control objectives. Based upon our evaluation, our CEO, CFO and Controller concluded
that our disclosure controls and procedures were effective to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed
by us in the reports that we file or submit under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the applicable rules and forms, and that it is accumulated and
communicated to our management, including our CEO, CFO and Controller, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding
required disclosure.
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. Internal control
over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the
preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in
the U.S. Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Our
management has assessed the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020. In making its
assessment, management has utilized the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission in its 2013 Internal Control – Integrated Framework. Our management has concluded that based on its assessment, our
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2020. The effectiveness of our internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 has been audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public
accounting firm, as stated in its report which is set forth in Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. There were no changes in
our internal control over financial reporting during the quarter ended December 31, 2020 that have materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
Section 13(r)(1)(D)Disclosures
The following activities are disclosed as required by Section 13(r)(1)(D) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended
(Exchange Act):
In the Company’s Form 10-Q report for the quarterly period ended on June 30, 2020, the Company disclosed, under the heading
“Other Matters” in the “Business Overview” section of the “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations” activities as required by Section 13(r)(1)(D) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange
Act). Such disclosure is incorporated herein by reference.
133
Table of Contents
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
The information required by Item 10 with respect to directors, the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors, audit committee
financial experts, and the procedures by which our shareowners may recommend nominees to our Board of Directors is
incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled
“Election of Directors” (including under the subheadings “Nominees” and “Nominating Process”) and “Corporate Governance”
(including under the subheading “Board Committees”).
Information about our Executive Officers
The following persons are executive officers of Raytheon Technologies Corporation:
Name Title Other Business Experience Since 1/1/2016Age as of
2/8/2021
Roy Azevedo President, Raytheon Intelligence &
Space (since April 2020)Vice President of Raytheon Company and President of
its Space and Airborne Systems (SAS) business unit;
Vice President and General Manager of the Intelligence,
Surveillance and Reconnaissance Systems product line
within SAS; Vice President and General Manager of the
Secure Sensor Solutions product line within SAS60
Christopher T. CalioPresident, Pratt & Whitney (since
January 2020)President, Commercial Engines, Pratt & Whitney;
Executive Assistant to the Chairman & CEO, United
Technologies Corporation; Executive Assistant to the
President & CEO, United Technologies Corporation47
Kevin G. DaSilva Corporate Vice President, Treasurer,
Raytheon Technologies Corporation
(since April 2020)Vice President and Treasurer, Raytheon Company 57
Michael R. DumaisExecutive Vice President, Chief
Transformation Officer, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
January 2021)Executive Vice President, Corporate Strategy &
Development, United Technologies Corporation;
Executive Vice President, Operations & Strategy,
United Technologies Corporation; Senior Vice
President, Strategic Planning, United Technologies
Corporation54
Gregory J. Hayes President, Chief Executive Officer
and Director, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation (since November 2014)Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer,
United Technologies Corporation60
Frank R. Jimenez Executive Vice President and
General Counsel, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
April 2020)Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate
Secretary, Raytheon Company56
Thomas A. KennedyExecutive Chair of the Board of
Directors, Raytheon Technologies
Corporation (since April 2020)Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Raytheon
Company65
Wesley D. Kremer President, Raytheon Missiles &
Defense (since April 2020)Vice President of Raytheon Company and President of
its Missile Systems business unit; President, Integrated
Defense Systems, Raytheon Company56
Anthony F. O’BrienExecutive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
April 2020)Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, Raytheon
Company56
134
Table of Contents
Robert K. Ortberg Director (since April 2020), Special
Advisor to the Office of the Chief
Executive Officer, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
February 2020)Chief Executive Officer, Collins Aerospace Systems;
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of
Rockwell Collins, Inc.60
Stephen J. Timm President, Collins Aerospace
Systems (since February 2020)President, Avionics, Collins Aerospace Systems; Vice
President and General Manager, Avionics, Collins
Aerospace Systems; Vice President and General
Manager, Avionics, Rockwell Collins, Inc.; Vice
President & General Manager, Air Transport Systems,
Rockwell Collins, Inc.52
Dantaya M.
WilliamsExecutive Vice President & Chief
Human Resources Officer, Raytheon
Technologies Corporation (since
June 2020)Vice President, Human Resources, Pratt & Whitney
Commercial Engines46
Michael J. Wood Corporate Vice President, Controller,
Raytheon Technologies Corporation
(since April 2020)Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting
Officer, Raytheon Company52
All of the officers serve at the pleasure of the Board of Directors of Raytheon Technologies Corporation or the subsidiary
designated.
Information concerning Section 16(a) compliance is incorporated herein by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the
2021 Annual Meeting of Shareowners titled “Other Important Information” under the heading “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports.”
We have adopted a code of conduct that applies to all our directors, officers, employees and representatives. Information regarding
our Code of Conduct is incorporated herein by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual Meeting of
Shareowners titled “Other Important Information” under the heading “Corporate Governance Information, Code of Conduct and
How to Contact the Board.” This code is publicly available on our website at http://www.rtx.com/Our-Company/ethics-and-
compliance. Amendments to the code of conduct and any grant of a waiver from a provision of the code requiring disclosure under
applicable Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) rules will be disclosed on our website. Our Corporate Governance
Guidelines and the charters of our Board of Directors’ Audit Committee, Compensation Committee, Finance Committee,
Governance and Public Policy Committee and Special Activities Committee are available on our website at
https://www.rtx.com/Our-Company/corporate-governance. These materials may also be requested in print free of charge by writing
to our Investor Relations Department at Raytheon Technologies Corporation, 870 Winter Street, Investor Relations, Waltham, MA
02451.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information required by Item 11 is incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Executive Compensation,” “Compensation of Directors” and “Report of the Compensation
Committee.”
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The information relating to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and the Equity Compensation Plan
Information required by Item 12 is incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Share Ownership,” “Executive Compensation” and “Approve Amendment to the Raytheon
Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan.”
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information required by Item 13 is incorporated herein by reference to the sections of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Corporate Governance” (under the subheading “Director Independence”) and “Other Important
Information” (under the subheading “Transactions with Related Persons”).
135
Table of Contents
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The information required by Item 14 is incorporated by reference to the section of our Proxy Statement for the 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareowners titled “Appoint an Independent Auditor for 2021,” including the information provided in that section with
regard to “Audit Fees,” “Audit-Related Fees,” “Tax Fees” and “All Other Fees.”
136
Table of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)    Financial Statements and Schedules
(1)    The following financial statements of Raytheon Technologies Corporation, supplemental information and report of
independent registered public accounting firm are included in this Form 10-K:
Consolidated Statement of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP dated February 8, 2021 on the Company’s financial statements filed as a
part hereof for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 and on the Company’s internal control
over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 is included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-
K. The independent registered public accounting firm’s consent with respect to this report appears in Exhibit 23
of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(2)    List of financial statement schedules:
 Page Number in
Form 10-K
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Financial Statement
Schedule I
SCHEDULE II—Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the three years ended
December 31, 2020 II
All schedules have been omitted because they are not required, not applicable or the information is otherwise included.
(b)    Exhibits:
The following list of exhibits includes exhibits submitted with this Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) and those incorporated by reference to other filings.
2.1Separation and Distribution Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation,
Otis Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 of the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
3(i)Restated Certificate of Incorporation, restated as of April 3, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1(b) to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020.
3(ii)Bylaws as amended and restated effective April 3, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020.
4.1Amended and Restated Indenture, dated as of May 1, 2001, between UTC and The Bank of New York, as trustee,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a) to the Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Commission file
number 333-60276) filed with the SEC on May 4, 2001. The Company hereby agrees to furnish to the Commission
upon request a copy of each other instrument defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Company and its
consolidated subsidiaries and any unconsolidated subsidiaries.
4.2Description of Securities.*
137
Table of Contents
10.1United Technologies Corporation Annual Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit A to the Company’s Proxy Statement for the 1975 Annual Meeting of Shareowners, Amendment No. 1
thereto, effective January 1, 1995, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 1995, and Amendment No. 2 thereto,
effective January 1, 2009, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.
10.2United Technologies Corporation Pension Preservation Plan, as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2020*
10.3United Technologies Corporation Senior Executive Severance Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(vi) to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
1992, as amended by Amendment thereto, effective December 10, 2003, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2003, and Amendment thereto, effective June 11, 2008, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2008, and
Amendment thereto, effective February 10, 2011, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.
10.4United Technologies Corporation Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2011,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number
1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2018.
10.5United Technologies Corporation Executive Leadership Group Program, as amended and restated, effective October
15, 2013, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.11 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission
file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2013; United Technologies Executive Leadership
Group Program, effective April 1, 2019; and Raytheon Technologies Corporation Executive Leadership Group
Program, effective April 3, 2020.*
10.6Schedule of Terms for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation
Executive Leadership Group Program (referred to above in Exhibit 10.6), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.12
to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended
September 30, 2013; and Schedule of Terms of Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United
Technologies Leadership Group Program, effective April 1, 2019 (referred to above in Exhibit 10.5).
10.7Form of Award Agreement for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating to the United Technologies
Corporation Executive Leadership Group Program (referred to above in Exhibit 10.6), incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.13 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly
period ended September 30, 2013; and Form of Award Agreement for Restricted Share Unit Retention Awards relating
to the United Technologies Leadership Group Program, effective April 1, 2019 (referred to above in Exhibit 10.5).
10.8United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors Deferred Stock Unit Plan, as Amended and Restated, effective as
of April 29, 2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.9Retainer Payment Election Form for United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors Deferred Stock Unit Plan
(referred to above in Exhibit 10.8), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to the Company’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.10Form of Deferred Restricted Stock Unit Award relating to the United Technologies Corporation Board of Directors
Deferred Stock Unit Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.8), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2018.
10.11United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended and restated effective April 28, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-
812) filed with the SEC on May 2, 2014, as further amended by Amendment No. 1, effective as of February 5, 2016,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.12 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015.
10.12Schedule of Terms for restricted stock awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive
Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.13 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
138
Table of Contents
10.13Schedule of Terms for non-qualified stock option awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
10.14Form of Award Agreement for non-qualified stock option awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation
Long-Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2016.
10.15Schedule of Terms for performance share unit awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to
the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2015.
10.16Schedule of Terms for stock appreciation rights awards relating to the United Technologies Corporation 2005 Long-
Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) (Rev. January 2016), incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.18 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended
December 31, 2015.
10.17Form of Award Agreement for restricted stock unit, performance share unit and stock appreciation rights awards
relating to the United Technologies Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11),
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.18 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016.
10.18United Technologies Corporation LTIP Performance Share Unit Deferral Plan, relating to the Long-Term Incentive
Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.11) as amended and restated, effective January 1, 2020.*
10.19United Technologies Corporation International Deferred Compensation Replacement Plan, effective January 1, 2005,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.35 of the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number
1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2008.
10.20United Technologies Corporation Company Automatic Contribution Excess Plan, as amended and restated, effective
January 1, 2020.*
10.21United Technologies Corporation Savings Restoration Plan executed July 16, 2018 (amended and restated as of
January 1, 2011), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2018.
10.22Amendment No. 1, effective as of December 6, 2020, to the UTC 2018 Long-Term Incentive Plan, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with
the SEC on May 3, 2018.*
10.23Schedule of Terms for restricted stock unit award relating to the United Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2020.
10.24Schedule of Terms for stock appreciation rights award relating to the United Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-
Term Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2020.
10.25Schedule of Terms for performance share unit award relating to the United Technologies Corporation 2018 Long-Term
Incentive Plan (referred to above in Exhibit 10.22), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.25 to the Company’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.26Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan, incorporated by reference to Appendix B to Rockwell Collins’
Notice and Proxy Statement (Commission file number 0001-16445) dated December 17, 2014.
139
Table of Contents
10.27Form of Performance Share Agreement under Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan (referred to above
in Exhibit 10.26), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-a-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017.
10.28Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under Rockwell Collins’ 2015 Long-Term Incentives Plan (referred to
above in Exhibit 10.26), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-a-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017.
10.29Compensation Recovery Policy acknowledgment and agreement, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-c-1 to
Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period
ended December 31, 2012.
10.30Rockwell Collins’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-f-2 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2007; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10-f-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.31Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated as of June 27, 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10-f-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2017; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred
Compensation Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-f-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
(Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2017; Amendment No. 2 to
Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-f-6 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018.
10.32Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Savings Plan, as amended, incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-g-2 to Rockwell
Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30,
2007; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Savings Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-g-
2 Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018.
10.33Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-Qualified Retirement Savings Plan, as amended and restated as of July 17, 2018,
incorporated by referenced to Exhibit 10-g-6 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file
number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.34Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-h-1 to
Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period
ended June 30, 2012; Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Non-Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10-h-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number 0001-
16445) for the quarterly period ended December 31, 2015; Amendment No. 2 to Rockwell Collins’ 2005 Non-
Qualified Pension Plan, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-h-3 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report
on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.35Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-i-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2007;
Amendment No. 1 to Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-i-2 to
Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the fiscal year ended
September 30, 2018; Amendment No. 2 to Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended; and Amendment No.3 to
Rockwell Collins’ Master Trust, as amended, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.35 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K (Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
10.36Rockwell Collins’ Short-term Relocation Benefit to Rockwell Collin’s CEO, CFO and two other executive officers,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10-e-1 to Rockwell Collins’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file
number 0001-16445) for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2018; Description of the Extension to the Short-Term
Relocation Benefit for the Company’s CEO, CFO and two other executive officers, incorporated by referenced to
Exhibit 10-j-2 to Rockwell Collins’ Annual Report on Form 10-K/A (Commission file number 0001-16445) for the
fiscal year ended September 30, 2018.
10.37Compensation & Covenants Agreement between United Technologies Corporation and Robert K. Ortberg, effective as
of November 26, 2018, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.37 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
(Commission file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018.
140
Table of Contents
10.38Employment Agreement, dated as of June 9, 2019, by and between United Technologies Corporation and Gregory J.
Hayes, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file
number 1-812) filed with the SEC on June 10, 2019.
10.39United Technologies Corporation Merger Severance Plan for Corporate Office Executives and Other Key Employees,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q (Commission file number
1-812) for the quarterly period ended June 30, 2019.
10.40Amendment dated February 3, 2020, to the terms of certain awards granted under the Company’s Long Term
Incentive Plans referred to above in Exhibit 10.11 and 10.22, by and between, United Technologies Corporation and
Judy Marks incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.40 of the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K (Commission
file number 1-812) for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019.
10.41Transition Services Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.42Tax Matters Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis Worldwide
Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.43Employee Matters Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.44First Amendment to Employee Matters Agreement, dated as of May 22, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 of the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on May 29,
2020).
10.45Intellectual Property Agreement, dated as of April 2, 2020, by and among United Technologies Corporation, Otis
Worldwide Corporation and Carrier Global Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of the Company’s
Current Report on Form 8-K (Commission file number 1-812) filed with the SEC on April 8, 2020).
10.46Employment Agreement, dated as of June 9, 2019, by and between United Technologies Corporation and Thomas A.
Kennedy.*
10.47Raytheon Company 2010 Stock Plan, as amended as of May 24, 2017, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended July 2, 2017.
10.48Raytheon Company Excess Savings Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further amended
effective January 1, 2010 and November 1, 2013, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to Raytheon Company’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.49Raytheon Company Excess Pension Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further amended
effective January 1, 2009, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.50Raytheon Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1,
2009, as further amended effective January 1, 2011, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.11 to Raytheon
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.51Raytheon Company Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective as of January 1, 2009, as further
amended effective January 1, 2009, January 1, 2010, May 6, 2010 and November 1, 2013, incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.12 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10.52Raytheon 2019 Stock Plan, incorporated by reference to Appendix A to Raytheon Company’s definitive proxy
statement, filed on April 16, 2019.
10.53Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and certain executive officers
(providing for benefits in the event of a qualified termination upon a change in control of two times base salary and
bonus), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.22 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009.
10.54Form of Amendment to Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and its executive
officers, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.60 to Raytheon Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009.
141
Table of Contents
10.55Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between Raytheon Company and certain executive officers
(providing for benefits in the event of a qualified termination upon a change in control of one times base salary and
bonus), incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended April 3, 2016.
10.56Letter Agreement dated January 21, 2015 by and between Raytheon Company and Anthony F. O’Brien, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 3,
2016.
10.57Letter Agreement dated December 16, 2014 by and between Raytheon Company and Frank R. Jimenez, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended April 3,
2016.
10.58Amendment to Letter Agreement dated January 23, 2015 by and between Raytheon Company and Frank R. Jimenez,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended April 3, 2016.
10.59Enhanced Severance Plan for Senior Leadership Team Members, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019.
10.60Letter Agreement, dated July 23, 2015, by Raytheon Company and Wesley D. Kremer, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2019.
10.61Amendment to Letter Agreement, dated March 21, 2019, by Raytheon Company and Wesley D. Kremer, incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Raytheon Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
14Code of Conduct. The RTC Code of Conduct may be accessed via RTC’s website at https://www.rtx.com/our-
company/ethics-and-compliance.
18Preferability Letter from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.*
21Subsidiaries of Raytheon Technologies Corporation.*
23Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.*
24Powers of Attorney of Thomas A. Kennedy, Tracy A. Atkinson, Marshall O. Larsen, George R. Oliver, Robert K.
Ortberg, Margaret L. O’Sullivan, Dinesh C. Paliwal, Ellen M. Pawlikowski, Denise L. Ramos, Fredric G. Reynolds,
Brian C. Rogers, James A. Winnefeld, Jr. and Robert O. Work.*
31.1Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
31.2Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
31.3Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification.*
32Section 1350 Certifications.*
101.INSeXtensible Business Reporting Language (XBRL) Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the
Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document.*
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document.*
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document.*
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document.*
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document.*
104The cover page from the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, formatted
in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.
(Exhibits marked with an asterisk (*) are filed electronically herewith.)
142
Table of Contents
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
Not applicable.
143
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
(Registrant)
Dated:February 8, 2021 By: /s/ ANTHONY F. O’BRIEN
Anthony F. O’Brien
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(on behalf of the Registrant and as the Registrant’s Principal
Financial Officer)
Dated:February 8, 2021 By: /s/ MICHAEL J. WOOD
Michael J. Wood
 Corporate Vice President and Controller
(on behalf of the Registrant and as the Registrant’s Principal
Accounting Officer)
144
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ GREGORY J. HAYES Director, President and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)February 8, 2021
(Gregory J. Hayes)
/s/ ANTHONY F. O’BRIEN Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 8, 2021
(Anthony F. O’Brien)
/s/ MICHAEL J. WOOD Corporate Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 8, 2021
(Michael J. Wood)
/s/ THOMAS A. KENNEDY * Executive Chair of the Board of Directors February 8, 2021
(Thomas A. Kennedy)
/s/ TRACY A. ATKINSON * Director February 8, 2021
(Tracy A. Atkinson)
/s/ MARSHALL O. LARSEN * Director February 8, 2021
(Marshall O. Larsen)
/s/ GEORGE R. OLIVER * Director February 8, 2021
(George R. Oliver)
/s/ ROBERT K. ORTBERG * Director February 8, 2021
(Robert K. Ortberg)
/s/ MARGARET L. O’SULLIVAN * Director February 8, 2021
(Margaret L. O’Sullivan)
/s/ DINESH C. PALIWAL * Director February 8, 2021
(Dinesh C. Paliwal)
/s/ ELLEN M. PAWLIKOWSKI * Director February 8, 2021
(Ellen M. Pawlikowski)
/s/ DENISE L. RAMOS * Director February 8, 2021
(Denise L. Ramos)
/s/ FREDRIC G. REYNOLDS * Director February 8, 2021
(Fredric G. Reynolds)
/s/ BRIAN C. ROGERS * Director February 8, 2021
(Brian C. Rogers)
/s/ JAMES A. WINNEFELD, JR. * Director February 8, 2021
(James A. Winnefeld, Jr.)
/s/ ROBERT O. WORK * Director February 8, 2021
(Robert O. Work)
*By: /s/ FRANK R. JIMENEZ
Frank R. Jimenez
Executive Vice President and General Counsel
Date: February 8, 2021
145
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Financial Statement Schedule
To the Shareowners and Board of Directors of Raytheon Technologies Corporation
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements referred to in our report dated February 8, 2021 appearing in the 2020 Annual
Report to Shareowners of Raytheon Technologies Corporation (which report and consolidated financial statements are incorporated
by reference in this Annual Report on Form 10-K) also included an audit of the financial statement schedule listed in Item 15(a)(2)
of this Form 10-K. In our opinion, this financial statement schedule presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth
therein when read in conjunction with the related consolidated financial statements.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 8, 2021
I
Table of Contents
RAYTHEON TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
Three years ended December 31, 2020
(Millions of Dollars)
 
Future Income Tax Benefits—Valuation allowance:
Balance, December 31, 2017 $ 582 
Additions charged to income tax expense 61 
Additions charged to goodwill, due to acquisitions 25 
Reductions credited to income tax expense (25)
Other adjustments (38)
Balance, December 31, 2018 605 
Additions charged to income tax expense 117 
Additions charged to goodwill, due to acquisitions 2 
Reductions credited to income tax expense (15)
Other adjustments (93)
Balance, December 31, 2019 616 
Additions charged to income tax expense 581 
Additions charged to goodwill, due to acquisitions 29 
Reductions credited to income tax expense (36)
Other adjustments, including the Separation of Carrier and Otis (433)
Balance, December 31, 2020 $ 757 
(1)    Amounts prior to 2020 within this schedule include valuation allowances related to discontinued operations.(1)
(1)
(1)
II
